





CIBC - Home











Skip to content








Français 
Español 
Contact Us
CIBC Websites
CIBC.com



Sign On

 
 












 What We Do



	                                 Access to Capital



                     Debt Financing



                     Equity Financing



                    Corporate Lending



                     Securitization



                     Prime Brokerage



                     Margin Financing



                     Securities Lending



                     Capital Introduction





                     Correspondent Brokerage





	                                 Advisory



                    Mergers & Acquisitions



                    A&D Advisory – CIBC Griffis & Small 



                    Current Public Mandates



                    Asset Overview - Husky Oil Operations 



                    Asset Overview - Insignia Energy



                    Asset Overview - Cenovus Energy





                    What's in the Market



                    Contact Us



                    Email Alerts







	                                Investing & Risk Management



                     Asset Classes



                     Fixed Income



                     Foreign Exchange



                     Commodities



                     Equities



                     Growth Markets





                     Sales & Trading



                     Idea Generation



                     Execution



                     Electronic Execution



                     Electronic Trading



                    Algorithmic Trading



                    Smart Order Routing



                    Fast Filters



                    Co-Location



                    Broker Services



                    Analytics & Market Structure





                     Tailored Products



                    Investment Funds



                     Structured Notes



                     Trading & Hedging Solutions









	                                Treasury



                     Cash Management & Deposits



                    Global Trade & Banking: Payments & Trade Finance Solutions



                    Risk Management Solutions





	                                Research 





Business Groups



	                                Global Markets



	                                Corporate Banking



	                                Global Investment Banking





Products & Services



	                                Capital Introduction



	                                Cash Management & Deposits



	                                Commodities



	                                Correspondent Brokerage



	                                Corporate Lending



	                                Debt Financing



	                                Electronic Execution



	                                Equities



	                                Equity Financing



	                                Fixed Income



	                                Foreign Exchange



	                                Global Trade & Banking



	                                Growth Markets



	                                Investment Funds



	                                Mergers & Acquisitions



	                                Prime Brokerage



	                                Research 



	                                Risk Management Solutions



	                                Sales & Trading



	                                Securitization



	                                Structured Notes



	                                Trading & Hedging Solutions



	                                Securities Lending





Industry Expertise



	                                Consumer, Industrials & Telecommunications



	                                Energy



	                                Financial Institutions



	                                Governments



	                                Mining



	                                Power & Utilities 



	                                Private Capital



	                                Infrastructure



	                                Real Estate



	                                Technology & Innovation





 About Us



	                                 Executives



	                                 Accomplishments



	                                 Group Awards



	                                 Community



	                                 News



	                                 Locations



	                                 Company History



	                                 Conferences





Careers



	                                Life at CIBC Capital Markets



	                                 Diversity & Inclusion



	                                 Campus Opportunities



	                                 Career Profiles





Home












 

Welcome to CIBC Capital Markets1
In today’s fast moving world, you need ready access to a wide range of capabilities to power your growth strategies.
Our seasoned team of professionals partners with corporations, governments and institutional clients in key financial centres around the world to develop customized solutions that enable them to access capital, expand their operations and actively invest. See how we can put the strength of our business to work for you.
Your Dedicated Partner
CIBC ranked among the Top 10 Safest Banks in North America in 2016.2 We are dedicated to meeting our clients’ needs today and into the future to help them keep pace with the ever-changing market.  

What We Do
Let us help you respond to the right opportunities at the right moment with a set of capabilities specifically designed to address your business objectives.



Business Groups
Our Global Markets, Corporate Banking and Global Investment Banking teams strive to forge strong and deep relationships with our clients.



Products
Our talented professionals draw on a comprehensive set of products and services to meet your short- and long-term needs. 



Industry Expertise
With deep industry expertise, we understand the numerous issues that shape your business and what it takes to gain a competitive edge. 




View Our Awards

View Our Conferences

Related Links

Access to Capital
Advisory
Investing & Risk Management
Products & Services
Research
Treasury


Press Releases


 







    Terms of Use

    CIBC Capital Markets owns and maintains this website (the "Site"). 
    By accessing or using the Site, you signify your agreement with and understanding 
    of the following terms and conditions of use ("Terms of Use"). If you do not agree 
    with any of the Terms of Use, do not access or use the Site. We reserve the right, 
    in our sole discretion, to modify, alter or otherwise update these Terms of Use at 
    any time and you agree to be bound by such revisions, modifications, alterations or updates. 
    You agree to review these Terms of Use on a regular basis and your continued use of the
     Site means that you agree with any revisions, modifications, alterations or other
      updates made to the Terms of Use.
    
    
    

    Access to Research Sites

    You may be provided with a login and password to access to certain restricted research 
    related content on certain parts of the Site (the "Research Sites"). Your use of the
     Research Sites is subject to these Terms of Use in addition to any supplementary terms 
     or conditions of use that apply specifically to the use of the Research Sites as may 
     be found on the Research Sites.
    
    

    General

CIBC Capital Markets is a trademark brand name under which different legal entities provide different services under this umbrella brand. Products and/or services offered through CIBC Capital Markets include products and/or services offered by the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce and various of its subsidiaries. Services offered by the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce include corporate lending services, foreign exchange, money market instruments, structured notes, interest rate products and OTC derivatives. Other products and services, such as exchange-traded equity and equity options, fixed income securities, are offered through directly or indirectly held subsidiaries of CIBC as indicated below. 


CIBC World Markets Inc. is a member of the Canadian Investor Protection Fund and the Investment Industry Regulatory Organization of Canada. In the United States, CIBC World Markets Corp. is a member of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority and the Securities Investor Protection Fund. CIBC World Markets plc is authorized by the Prudential Regulation Authority and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority and Prudential Regulation Authority. CIBC World Markets Securities Ireland Limited is regulated by the Central Bank of Ireland. CIBC Australia Ltd is regulated by the Australia Securities and Investment Commission. CIBC World Markets (Japan) Inc. is a member of the Japanese Securities Dealer Association. Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce, Hong Kong Branch, is a registered institution under the Securities and Futures Ordinance, Cap 571. Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce, Singapore Branch, is an offshore bank licensed and regulated by the Monetary Authority of Singapore. 



    No Warranty

    The materials found on the Site are provided "as is" without warranty of any kind, either express
     or implied, to the fullest extent permissible pursuant to applicable law, including but not
      limited to the implied warranties of merchantability, operation, usefulness, completeness,
       accuracy, currentness, reliability, fitness for a particular purpose or non-infringement.
        CIBC Capital Markets assumes no responsibility for, and makes no warranties that (i) 
        the information on the Site is complete, accurate and suitable for your purposes; (ii)
         functions contained on the Site will be uninterrupted or error-free; (iii) the 
         Site may be accessed at all times and in an uninterrupted manner; (iv) that defects
          and errors on the Site will be corrected; and (v) that the Site or the server that
           makes it available will be free of viruses or other harmful components. The information
            and content contained on the Site may be changed without notice and CIBC Capital 
            Markets has no duty to update or correct any information on the Site, nor to update
             you regarding any changes or updates that have been made. CIBC Capital Markets will
              not be liable for any damages to, viruses that may infect, or services, repairs or 
              corrections that must be performed on your computer or other property on account of
               your accessing or use of this site. Please note that some jurisdictions do not allow 
               the exclusion of implied warranties, so some or all of the above exclusion may not apply to you.
    
    
    

    Liability Waiver

    Your use of the Site is not intended to and shall be deemed not to create a legal relationship of any 
    kind between yourself and CIBC Capital Markets, nor to amend or vary any existing legal relationship. 
    Under no circumstances, including, but not limited to, negligence, will CIBC Capital Markets be liable 
    for any special or consequential damages that result from the access, reliance, use of, or the
     inability to access or use the Site or the materials on the Site, even if CIBC Capital Markets or an
      authorized representative of CIBC Capital Markets has been advised of the possibility of such damages.
       In no event shall CIBC Capital Markets’ total liability for any and all damages and causes of 
       action exceed the amount paid by you, if any, for the access to and use of the Site.
    
    
    

    Global Dealing Restrictions

    The Site contains material regarding our offerings and such material, depending on the jurisdiction, 
    may not be applicable or available in all jurisdictions. Every jurisdiction has specific laws 
    regarding the types of products that may be offered to its residents, therefore not all products
     and services shown on the Site may be available in all jurisdictions. Accordingly, CIBC Capital 
     Markets makes no representations that materials found on the Site are appropriate for use in all
      locations, or that transactions, securities, products, instruments, services or other offerings 
      discussed on the Site are available or appropriate for sale or use in all jurisdictions, or by 
      all investors or counterparties. Please be aware of the laws of your country or that otherwise
       apply to you in respect of any of the matters described on the Site. Those who access the Site 
       do so of their own initiative, and are responsible for compliance with the laws that are
        applicable in their jurisdiction. Users of the Site may not necessarily be able to deal 
        directly with all entities whose material is available on the Site. No software or information
         on the Site may be downloaded or otherwise exported in contravention of any applicable 
         laws or regulations, including all applicable export control laws and regulations.
    
    
    

    No Offer of Securities - Disclosure of Interests

    Under no circumstances should any material on the Site be used or considered as an offer to 
    sell or a solicitation of any offer to buy the securities, products or any other instruments
     of CIBC World Markets Inc. or any other issuer or subsidiary of Canadian Imperial Bank of
      Commerce. The material found on the Site is not intended to constitute financial, legal, 
      tax, investment, professional or expert advice and is only intended for general circulation 
      purposes to users of the Site.


    Disclosure of Interests

    CIBC Capital Markets may make a market or deal as principal in the securities, commodities or 
    instruments mentioned in materials at this site or in options or other derivative instruments
     based thereon. In addition, CIBC Capital Markets, or its shareholders, directors, officers,
      employees and/or other affiliates, may from time to time have long or short positions in 
      such securities or in options, futures or other derivative instruments based thereon.
      One or more of CIBC Capital Markets’ directors, officers and/or employees may be a director
       of the issuer of the securities mentioned on the Site. CIBC Capital Markets or its 
       affiliates may have managed or co-managed a public offering of, or acted as initial 
       purchaser or placement agent for a private placement of, any of the securities of 
       any issuer mentioned on the Site, or may from time to time perform investment banking
        or other services for, or solicit investment banking or other business from,
         mentioned companies. CIBC Capital Markets and/or any of its affiliates may have
          received remuneration in connection with any of the activities described immediately above.
    
    
    

    Price Information/Valuations

    Actionable prices may only be obtained on a real-time, expressly agreed upon basis.
     Any indicative valuations or estimates in materials on the Site are provided for
      informational purposes only. Any information regarding any valuations with respect 
      to any materials does not constitute an offer to enter into, transfer and assign or 
      terminate any transaction, or a commitment by CIBC Capital Markets to make such an offer. 
      Indicative valuations on the Site may vary significantly from indicative valuations 
      available from other sources. While CIBC Capital Markets has obtained the information 
      on which these valuations are based from sources believed to be reliable, 
      CIBC Capital Markets makes no representations or warranties with respect to the
       correctness, accuracy or completeness of any indicative valuations.
    
    
    

    Hypothetical or Past Performance

   Hypothetical or simulated performance results have inherent limitations. Unlike an actual
    performance record, simulated results do not represent actual trading. Also, since the
     trades have not actually been executed, the results may have under or over-compensated 
     for the impact, if any, of certain market factors, such as lack of liquidity. Simulated 
     trading programs in general are designed with the benefit of hindsight. Past performance 
     is not in any way indicative of any future results and no representation is being made 
     with respect to past performances being in any way indicative of future performance.
    
    

    Material to be Consulted in its Entirety

    All materials at this site are meant to be reviewed in their entirety, including any footnotes,
     legal disclaimers, restrictions or disclosures, and any copyright or proprietary notices. 
     You are deemed to have notice of all appropriate disclaimers, notifications, footnotes or
      disclosures through use of the Site. All products or services that are provided by CIBC 
      Capital Markets are subject to the terms of any applicable agreements. Any disclaimers,
       restrictions, disclosure or hedge clauses apply to any partial document or material in 
       the same manner as they do the whole, and will be deemed incorporated in the portion of 
       any material or document that you consult or download. 


    Linked Sites

    For purposes of providing users with convenience, various links to third party sites 
    ("Third Party Sites") may be found on the Site. CIBC Capital Markets has no control over 
    any of the material found on these Third Party Sites. Your use of any Third Party Site is
     at your own risk. CIBC Capital Markets does not review, endorse, approve or control any 
     of the Third Party Sites linked to the Site, and are not responsible for the content of 
     any other websites linked to the Third Party Sites. CIBC Capital Markets makes no 
     representations and are not responsible for the quality of any Third Party Site. 
     The inclusion of links to these Third Party Sites should not be taken in any way to be
      an endorsement by CIBC Capital Markets of any information found upon the Third Party
       Site and does not imply that CIBC Capital Markets has verified any of the information
        provided on the Third Party Sites. It is up to you to take precautions to ensure that
         whatever you select for your use is free of such items as viruses, worms, trojan 
         horses and other items of a destructive nature.
    
    

    Trademarks

    Trademarks, logos, titles, phrases, icons, graphics, designs and service marks ("Trademarks")
    displayed at this site are registered or unregistered trademarks of Canadian Imperial
    Bank of Commerce and of other parties. Nothing at this site shall be construed as
    granting, by implication, estoppel or otherwise, any license or right to use any
    of Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce Trademarks. Anything that you transmit to
    the Site becomes the property of Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce, and its subsidiaries
    and may be used by Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce and its subsidiaries for any
    lawful purpose, and is further subject to disclosure as deemed appropriate by us,
    including to any legal or regulatory authority to which we are subject. Canadian
    Imperial Bank of Commerce and its subsidiaries reserves all rights with respect
    to copyright and trademark ownership of all material on the Site, and will enforce
    such rights to the full extent of the law. Any unauthorized use of any of the Trademarks
    will be a violation of Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce and its subsidiaries'
    statutory or common law rights and may result in legal action being taken against
    those who are using the Trademarks without authorization.

    The following marks include registered or unregistered trademarks or trade names
    of Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce in Canada and/or its subsidiaries in other
    jurisdictions:





                    CIBC
                






                    CIBC World Markets
                





                    Wood Gundy
                






                    CIBC Griffis & Small
                







    Applicable Law

    The Site is administered by by CIBC Capital Markets from Toronto, Canada. This agreement
    shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the substantive and procedural
    laws of the Province of Ontario and the laws of Canada applicable therein, without
    giving effect to any principles of conflicts of laws. You submit and attorn to the
    exclusive jurisdiction of the courts of the Province of Ontario to finally adjudicate
    or determine any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or in connection with
    your use of the Site.

close

Back to top






CIBC World Markets Corp.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg










































  





















































































July 22, 2017 5:44 PM ET
Capital Markets

Company Overview of CIBC World Markets Corp.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
CIBC World Markets Corp. provides a range of credit and capital market products, investment banking, and merchant banking services in North America and worldwide. It primarily offers a range of advisory services, as well as underwrites debt, credit, and equity products for corporate, government, and institutional clients. The company also provides equity products and services, fixed income services, foreign exchange products and solutions, and securitization and credit structuring services, as well as trades and distributes short-term debt instruments. In addition, CIBC World originates financial solutions, including credit products for medium-sized businesses in Canada, as well as provides ...
CIBC World Markets Corp. provides a range of credit and capital market products, investment banking, and merchant banking services in North America and worldwide. It primarily offers a range of advisory services, as well as underwrites debt, credit, and equity products for corporate, government, and institutional clients. The company also provides equity products and services, fixed income services, foreign exchange products and solutions, and securitization and credit structuring services, as well as trades and distributes short-term debt instruments. In addition, CIBC World originates financial solutions, including credit products for medium-sized businesses in Canada, as well as provides private equity, mezzanine, and bridge financing to companies in North America, Europe, and Australia. The company is based in New York, New York. CIBC World Markets Corp. operates as a subsidiary of Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce.
Detailed Description


300 Madison AvenueNew York, NY 10017United States36,741 Employees



Phone: 212-856-4000

www.cibcwm.com







Key Executives for CIBC World Markets Corp.




Mr. Gerald T. McCaughey


      	President of Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce and CEO of Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce
      


Age: 61
        







Mr. Ronald D. Munkley BSc Hon (Eng)


      	Head of CIBC World Markets Power and Utilities Group
      


Age: 71
        







Mr. Paul B. Spafford


      	Vice Chairman, Managing Director, and Head of Mergers & Acquisitions
      








Mr. James R. McSherry


      	Executive VP of CIBC World Markets and MD of Commercial Banking -CIBC World Markets
      








Mr. David B. Clifford


      	MD of CIBC World Markets & Head of Merchant Banking of CIBC World Markets
      





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 

CIBC World Markets Corp. Key Developments

CIBC World Markets Corp. Presents at Platts 17th Annual Caribbean Energy Conference, Jan-27-2017 11:55 AM
Jan 4 17
CIBC World Markets Corp. Presents at Platts 17th Annual Caribbean Energy Conference, Jan-27-2017 11:55 AM. Venue: Renaissance Santo Domingo Jaragua Hotel & Casino, George Washington Ave. 367, Apto. Postal 769-2, Santo Domingo, Dominican Republic. Speakers: Andrew J. Lee, Managing Director, Head of US Private Placements.


CIBC World Markets Corp. Presents at EnerCom's The Oil & Gas Conference 2016, Aug-16-2016 01:30 PM
Jun 17 16
CIBC World Markets Corp. Presents at EnerCom's The Oil & Gas Conference 2016, Aug-16-2016 01:30 PM. Venue: Westin Denver Downtown Hotel, Denver, Colorado, United States. Speakers: Avery Shenfeld.


CIBC World Markets Corp. Presents at Platts 17th Annual Financing US Power conference, Oct-29-2015 09:15 AM
Sep 18 15
CIBC World Markets Corp. Presents at Platts 17th Annual Financing US Power conference, Oct-29-2015 09:15 AM. Venue: New York Marriott Marquis, New York, New York, United States. Speakers: Andrew Cleary, Executive Director.


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 @Visory LLC United States 1 Road Partners LLC United States 11T Partners, LLC United States 123Jump.com, Inc. United States 1509225 Ontario, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact CIBC World Markets Corp., please visit www.cibcwm.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close


























﻿






























Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. (APD) Position Increased by Culbertson A N & Co. Inc. - Chaffey Breeze













































 
















 



  
 
 
























Daily Ratings & News for Air Products and Chemicals Inc.

        
	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Air Products and Chemicals Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:










Follow @chaffeybreeze












Recent Posts

Hugoton Royalty Trust Announces Dividend of $0.00 (HGT)
Highland Capital Management LLC Invests $607,000 in Live Nation Entertainment, Inc. (NYSE:LYV)
AMERIPRISE FINANCIAL SERVICES, INC. (NYSE:AMP) Position Maintained by Sit Investment Associates Inc.
Highland Capital Management LLC Buys Shares of 16,084 Aramark (ARMK)
Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. (APD) Position Increased by Culbertson A N & Co. Inc.
Moneygram International, Inc. (MGI) Downgraded by BidaskClub
Ituran Location and Control Ltd. (ITRN) Downgraded by BidaskClub to “Hold”
Wendell David Associates Inc. Has $1.92 Million Stake in Marathon Petroleum Corporation (MPC)
Highland Capital Management LLC Buys 990 Shares of Smith & Nephew SNATS, Inc. (NYSE:SNN)
3,792 Shares in Athene Holding Ltd. (ATH) Acquired by North Star Investment Management Corp.
Independent Bank Group, Inc (IBTX) Downgraded by BidaskClub to “Sell”
Louisiana State Employees Retirement System Maintains Stake in Delphi Automotive PLC (DLPH)
Louisiana State Employees Retirement System Increases Stake in Consolidated Edison Inc (ED)
Highland Capital Management LLC Takes Position in Lincoln Electric Holdings, Inc. (LECO)
Lonza Group Ag (OTC:LZAGY) Forecasted to Earn FY2021 Earnings of $1.65 Per Share
$670.82 Million in Sales Expected for Public Storage (PSA) This Quarter
Head-To-Head Comparison: J & J Snack Foods Corp. (JJSF) & Amplify Snack Brands, inc. (BETR)
Contrasting Diamond Foods (DMND) and J & J Snack Foods Corp. (JJSF)
Head-To-Head Comparison: TJX Companies, Inc. (The) (TJX) & Tuesday Morning Corp. (TUES)
Brookfield Renewable Partners L.P. (BEP) Stake Cut by Bank of Montreal Can







Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. (APD) Position Increased by Culbertson A N & Co. Inc.


					Posted by Lucas Kauffman on Jul 22nd, 2017 // No Comments




Culbertson A N & Co. Inc. raised its position in shares of  Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. (NYSE:APD) by 0.2% during the second quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The firm owned 27,387 shares of the basic materials company’s stock after buying an additional 60 shares during the period. Culbertson A N & Co. Inc.’s holdings in Air Products and Chemicals were worth $3,918,000 at the end of the most recent quarter. 
Several other hedge funds and other institutional investors have also made changes to their positions in the stock. BlackRock Inc. raised its position in shares of  Air Products and Chemicals by 1,973.1% in the first quarter. BlackRock Inc. now owns 14,149,340 shares of the basic materials company’s stock worth $1,914,263,000 after buying an additional 13,466,808 shares during the period.  First Eagle Investment Management LLC raised its position in shares of  Air Products and Chemicals by 243.2% in the first quarter. First Eagle Investment Management LLC now owns 1,789,910 shares of the basic materials company’s stock worth $242,157,000 after buying an additional 1,268,305 shares during the period.  Vanguard Group Inc. raised its position in shares of  Air Products and Chemicals by 5.5% in the first quarter. Vanguard Group Inc. now owns 16,888,770 shares of the basic materials company’s stock worth $2,284,882,000 after buying an additional 887,369 shares during the period.  Barrow Hanley Mewhinney & Strauss LLC raised its position in shares of  Air Products and Chemicals by 6.8% in the first quarter. Barrow Hanley Mewhinney & Strauss LLC now owns 9,651,446 shares of the basic materials company’s stock worth $1,305,744,000 after buying an additional 611,672 shares during the period.  Finally, Cibc World Markets Corp raised its position in shares of  Air Products and Chemicals by 59.3% in the first quarter. Cibc World Markets Corp now owns 1,524,806 shares of the basic materials company’s stock worth $206,291,000 after buying an additional 567,786 shares during the period. Hedge funds and other institutional investors own  89.20% of the company’s stock. 


 Get Air Products and Chemicals Inc. alerts:



Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. (NYSE:APD) traded down 0.25% on Friday, reaching $145.64. The company had a trading volume of 1,226,559 shares. The company has a market capitalization of $31.71 billion, a PE ratio of 10.07 and a beta of 1.26. Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. has a 52-week low of $129.00 and a 52-week high of $150.45. The company’s 50-day moving average is $144.53 and its 200-day moving average is $141.82. 





Air Products and Chemicals (NYSE:APD) last posted its earnings results on Thursday, April 27th. The basic materials company reported $1.43 EPS for the quarter, topping the Zacks’ consensus estimate of $1.38 by $0.05. The company had revenue of $1.98 billion for the quarter, compared to the consensus estimate of $1.84 billion. Air Products and Chemicals had a return on equity of 19.26% and a net margin of 36.19%. Air Products and Chemicals’s quarterly revenue was up 11.4% compared to the same quarter last year. During the same period in the previous year, the business earned $1.82 earnings per share.  Equities analysts anticipate that  Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. will post $6.16 EPS for the current fiscal year. 
The company also recently announced a quarterly dividend, which will be paid on Monday, November 13th. Shareholders of record on Tuesday, October 10th will be given a dividend of $0.95 per share. The ex-dividend date is Friday, October 6th. This represents a $3.80 dividend on an annualized basis and a yield of 2.61%. Air Products and Chemicals’s payout ratio is 26.28%. 
TRADEMARK VIOLATION WARNING: “Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. (APD) Position Increased by Culbertson A N & Co. Inc.” was  posted by Chaffey Breeze and is the sole property of of Chaffey Breeze. If you are viewing this piece on another website, it was illegally copied and reposted in violation of United States and international copyright and trademark laws. The original version of this piece can be accessed at https://www.chaffeybreeze.com/2017/07/22/air-products-and-chemicals-inc-apd-position-increased-by-culbertson-a-n-co-inc.html. 
A number of research analysts have recently issued reports on APD shares. Deutsche Bank AG upgraded Air Products and Chemicals from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating and increased their target price for the company from $148.00 to $160.00 in a research report on Monday, May 1st. Zacks Investment Research lowered Air Products and Chemicals from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating in a research report on Monday, May 1st. BidaskClub lowered Air Products and Chemicals from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a research report on Friday, June 23rd. Finally, Jefferies Group LLC  reiterated a “hold” rating and set a $155.00 target price on shares of Air Products and Chemicals in a research report on Tuesday, May 2nd. Two analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, five have given a hold rating and seven have issued  a buy rating to the company. The company  has a consensus rating of “Hold” and an average price target of $152.85.
About Air Products and Chemicals
Air Products and Chemicals, Inc, is an industrial gases company. The Company’s Industrial Gases business provides atmospheric and process gases and related equipment to manufacturing markets, including refining and petrochemical, metals, electronics, and food and beverage. The Company is also a supplier of liquefied natural gas process technology and equipment.
Want to see what other hedge funds are holding APD? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. (NYSE:APD).







Receive News & Ratings for Air Products and Chemicals Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Air Products and Chemicals Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.








 






















Latest News





Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website












 

 











































﻿






























Brown Advisory Securities LLC Sells 475 Shares of Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. (NYSE:APD) - Chaffey Breeze













































 
















 



  
 
 
























Daily Ratings & News for Air Products and Chemicals Inc.

        
	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Air Products and Chemicals Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:










Follow @chaffeybreeze












Recent Posts

BTIM Corp. Boosts Position in Avery Dennison Corporation (AVY)
Intuit Inc. (INTU) Shares Bought by Gradient Investments LLC
Wellington Management Group LLP Cuts Stake in Owens-Illinois, Inc. (NYSE:OI)
Wellington Management Group LLP Has $22.27 Million Stake in Harmonic Inc. (NASDAQ:HLIT)
Redmond Asset Management LLC Maintains Stake in PPG Industries, Inc. (NYSE:PPG)
Great Western Bancorp, Inc. (NYSE:GWB) Position Boosted by Fmr LLC
Intra-Cellular Therapies Inc. (NASDAQ:ITCI) Position Increased by Fmr LLC
Discovery Communications, Inc. (NASDAQ:DISCA) Stake Raised by Fmr LLC
Advantus Capital Management Inc Has $269,000 Stake in Urban Outfitters, Inc. (NASDAQ:URBN)
Advantus Capital Management Inc Has $273,000 Position in Globus Medical, Inc. (NYSE:GMED)
Probity Advisors Inc. Decreases Position in Aetna Inc. (NYSE:AET)
OppenheimerFunds Inc. Boosts Position in Owens & Minor, Inc. (OMI)
United Services Automobile Association Has $1.37 Million Stake in Patheon NV (PTHN)
KapStone Paper and Packaging Corporation (KS) Shares Bought by OppenheimerFunds Inc.
United Services Automobile Association Cuts Stake in Syndax Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (SNDX)
Credit Agricole S A Has $826,000 Stake in Cinemark Holdings Inc (CNK)
United Services Automobile Association Reduces Position in Enanta Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (ENTA)
OppenheimerFunds Inc. Buys New Stake in Unilever NV (UN)
Credit Agricole S A Has $851,000 Position in Banco Santander, S.A. (SAN)
United Services Automobile Association Has $1.55 Million Stake in athenahealth, Inc. (ATHN)







Brown Advisory Securities LLC Sells 475 Shares of Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. (NYSE:APD)


					Posted by Charlotte Bryant on Jul 14th, 2017 // No Comments




Brown Advisory Securities LLC lowered its stake in shares of  Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. (NYSE:APD) by 15.0% during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the SEC. The firm owned 2,701 shares of the basic materials company’s stock after selling 475 shares during the period. Brown Advisory Securities LLC’s holdings in Air Products and Chemicals were worth $365,000 as of its most recent filing with the SEC. 
Several other hedge funds and other institutional investors have also recently made changes to their positions in APD. iAB Financial Bank purchased a new position in shares of  Air Products and Chemicals during the first quarter valued at $100,000.  State of Alaska Department of Revenue purchased a new position in shares of  Air Products and Chemicals during the first quarter valued at $109,000.  Guardian Life Insurance Co. of America boosted its position in shares of  Air Products and Chemicals by 0.7% in the first quarter. Guardian Life Insurance Co. of America now owns 838 shares of the basic materials company’s stock valued at $113,000 after buying an additional 6 shares during the last quarter.  Webster Bank N. A. boosted its position in shares of  Air Products and Chemicals by 68.2% in the first quarter. Webster Bank N. A. now owns 851 shares of the basic materials company’s stock valued at $115,000 after buying an additional 345 shares during the last quarter.  Finally, Mosaic Family Wealth LLC boosted its position in shares of  Air Products and Chemicals by 3.7% in the first quarter. Mosaic Family Wealth LLC now owns 1,000 shares of the basic materials company’s stock valued at $135,000 after buying an additional 36 shares during the last quarter. 89.12% of the stock is currently owned by hedge funds and other institutional investors. 


 Get Air Products and Chemicals Inc. alerts:



Shares of Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. (NYSE:APD) opened at 144.37 on Friday. The company has a 50-day moving average of $144.33 and a 200 day moving average of $142.11. Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. has a one year low of $128.35 and a one year high of $150.45. The stock has a market capitalization of $31.43 billion, a price-to-earnings ratio of 9.98 and a beta of 1.26. 





Air Products and Chemicals (NYSE:APD) last issued its quarterly earnings results on Thursday, April 27th. The basic materials company reported $1.43 earnings per share (EPS) for the quarter, topping analysts’ consensus estimates of $1.38 by $0.05. Air Products and Chemicals had a return on equity of 19.26% and a net margin of 36.19%. The firm had revenue of $1.98 billion for the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $1.84 billion. During the same period last year, the company earned $1.82 EPS. The firm’s quarterly revenue was up 11.4% on a year-over-year basis.  Equities research analysts forecast that  Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. will post $6.15 earnings per share for the current fiscal year. 
The firm also recently declared a quarterly dividend, which will be paid on Monday, August 14th. Shareholders of record on Monday, July 3rd will be paid a $0.95 dividend. This represents a $3.80 dividend on an annualized basis and a yield of 2.63%. The ex-dividend date is Thursday, June 29th. Air Products and Chemicals’s payout ratio is 26.28%. 
COPYRIGHT VIOLATION WARNING: “Brown Advisory Securities LLC Sells 475 Shares of Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. (NYSE:APD)” was  reported by Chaffey Breeze and is the property of of Chaffey Breeze. If you are accessing this news story on another publication, it was illegally copied and reposted in violation of international trademark & copyright laws. The original version of this news story can be read at https://www.chaffeybreeze.com/2017/07/14/brown-advisory-securities-llc-sells-475-shares-of-air-products-and-chemicals-inc-nyseapd.html. 
Several research analysts have recently weighed in on the stock. BidaskClub cut shares of Air Products and Chemicals from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a research report on Friday, June 23rd. Jefferies Group LLC  reissued a “hold” rating and set a $155.00 price target on shares of Air Products and Chemicals in a research report on Tuesday, May 2nd. Zacks Investment Research raised shares of Air Products and Chemicals from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating and set a $152.00 price target on the stock in a research report on Tuesday, April 18th. Finally, Deutsche Bank AG raised shares of Air Products and Chemicals from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating and boosted their price target for the company from $148.00 to $160.00 in a research report on Monday, May 1st. Two analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, five have assigned  a hold rating and seven have given a buy rating to the company. The company  has an average rating of “Hold” and a consensus price target of $152.85.
About Air Products and Chemicals
Air Products and Chemicals, Inc, is an industrial gases company. The Company’s Industrial Gases business provides atmospheric and process gases and related equipment to manufacturing markets, including refining and petrochemical, metals, electronics, and food and beverage. The Company is also a supplier of liquefied natural gas process technology and equipment.







Receive News & Ratings for Air Products and Chemicals Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Air Products and Chemicals Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.








 






















Latest News





Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website












 

 














































CIBC World Markets - Wikipedia






















 






CIBC World Markets

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


CIBC World Markets





Type

Subsidiary


Industry
Investment bank


Predecessor
Wood Gundy
The Argosy Group
Oppenheimer Holdings


Founded
1988 (acquisition of Wood Gundy)


Headquarters
Toronto, Ontario, Canada



Key people

Richard Nesbitt, CEO of World Markets


Products
Mergers and acquisitions, Capital markets, Financial services


Revenue
 C$2.90 billion (2016) [1]



Net income

 C$1.08 billion (2016)[1]


Total assets
C$162.8 billion (2016)[1]



Number of employees

1,100


Parent
Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce


Website
www.cibcwm.com


CIBC World Markets is the investment banking subsidiary of the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce. The firm operates as an investment bank both in the domestic and international equity and debt capital markets. The bank provides a variety of financial services including credit and capital market products, mergers and acquisitions, merchant banking and other investment banking advisory services.
Established via a series of acquisitions, including Canadian brokerage Wood, Gundy & Co. and U.S.-based Oppenheimer & Co. CIBC World Markets has been a leading investment bank in Canada with a notable presence in various international markets at times over the years.
CIBC World Markets is headquartered in Toronto with offices in Calgary, Montreal, Vancouver, Ottawa, New York City, Atlanta, Boston, Chicago, Houston, Salt Lake City, Beijing, Dublin, Hong Kong, London, Shanghai, Singapore, Sydney and Tokyo.



Contents


1 History

1.1 CIBC Wood Gundy
1.2 Acquisition of the Argosy Group
1.3 CIBC Oppenheimer
1.4 Creating the CIBC World Markets platform
1.5 Decline of CIBC World Markets
1.6 Sale to Oppenheimer & Co. (Fahnestock Viner)


2 Notable current and former employees
3 See also
4 References



History[edit]





This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (September 2009) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)






CIBC Wood Gundy
(1988 - 1997)


CIBC Wood Gundy[edit]
See also: CIBC Wood Gundy and Wood, Gundy & Co.
CIBC purchased a majority stake in Wood, Gundy & Co. in June 1988 for C$203 million.[2] Wood Gundy was established in Toronto in 1905 by George Herbert Wood and James Henry Gundy. At the time of its acquisition, Wood Gundy was the leading Canadian investment dealer. Following the acquisition, the CIBC formed CIBC Wood Gundy, which offered primarily asset management services for corporate and institutional clients. Two years later, in 1990, they continued to expand the Canadian securities business by acquiring much of Merrill Lynch & Company's Canadian business.
For a period of time, CIBC Wood Gundy operated as CIBC Eyers Reed in Australia following the acquisition of the broker-dealer.
Acquisition of the Argosy Group[edit]
Main article: The Argosy Group
In April 1995, CIBC's investment banking subsidiary, then known as CIBC Wood Gundy announced the acquisition of The Argosy Group, a New York-based investment banking firm involved primarily in the high yield debt market. Argosy had been founded by three Drexel Burnham Lambert alumni: Jay Bloom, Andrew Heyer and Dean Kehler who had worked together in Drexel's New York office in the 1980s. Argosy was founded in 1990 as a 9-person advisory firm.
The acquisition of Argosy marked an aggressive push by CIBC into the US investment banking business. Prior to that point, CIBC had never done a junk bond deal. Argosy's three major principals had worked on some of the biggest junk bond deals of the 1980s while at Drexel Burnham Lambert. The 52 Argosy employees constituted the core of what would become CIBC's High Yield Group and CIBC Argosy Merchant Banking funds that were responsible for, among other things, the $1 billion windfall that CIBC would earn from its early investments in Global Crossing. The Argosy principals also managed two collateralized debt obligation vehicles known as Caravelle Funds I and II.[3]




CIBC Oppenheimer
(1997 - 1999)


CIBC Oppenheimer[edit]
See also: Oppenheimer & Co.
In 1997, CIBC Wood Gundy (New York) under the direction of Michael S. Rulle acquired the U.S. brokerage house Oppenheimer & Co. CIBC wanted to expand its brokerage business and was interested in the New York-based firm which had annual revenues of $800 million and a network of 680 brokers, primarily selling stocks and bonds. Oppenheimer also included a small investment banking group.
Negotiations began talks with Oppenheimer in July 1997 and CIBC closed on the transaction in November 1997, paying $525 million over the next three years, including $175 million in retention payments to key Oppenheimer professionals. After the acquisition the U.S. division took the name CIBC Oppenheimer, eliminating the use of the Wood Gundy brand through much of the bank.
Creating the CIBC World Markets platform[edit]
By 1999, CIBC would scale back the usage of the Oppenheimer name in favor of CIBC World Markets. The business in Canada was centered around providing mergers and acquisitions advisory services and various equity offerings for large Canadian companies. However, with the acquisition of Argosy, the center of gravity of the investment bank began to shift toward the United States.




CIBC World Markets
(1998 - 2002)


Although initially intended to represent a foray into a variety of global markets, CIBC World Markets ultimately focused on three markets: Canada, the United States and to a lesser extent the United Kingdom. The CIBC World Markets unit suffered a net loss of C$186 million during the fourth quarter of fiscal 1998 which dragged down the performance of the parent bank's stock by almost one-third. The loss in 1998 was due primarily to very rapid expansion into regions impacted by the various financial crises in 1998 in Asia. As a result, CIBC World Markets refocused its efforts primarily on the U.S. and Canadian markets, despite the seemingly global ambitions implied in the unit's name.
CIBC World Markets reached a peak in 1999 and 2000, when the investment bank cracked the top ten of U.S. issuers of high yield bonds and the top twenty in mergers and acquisitions advisory. In 1999, CIBC World Markets, backed Gary Winnick and his company Global Crossing to build optical fiber cable connections under the ocean. CIBC would ultimately realize a gain of $2.0 billion from its relatively small equity investment in Global Crossing, representing more than 20% of the bank's profits in 2000.[4] On the back of the success in Global Crossing, CIBC backed the three heads of its CIBC Argosy Merchant Banking funds in a new private equity operation known as Trimaran Capital Partners. Trimaran closed on a $1 billion fund in April 2001, with capital provided primarily by CIBC.[3]
In June 2001, CIBC announced the construction of a new $800 million office tower at 300 Madison Avenue (At the corner of Madison Avenue and 42nd Street). The 35-story, 1,200,000-square-foot (110,000 m2) building was originally expected to house up to 3,000 employees, bringing CIBC's entire New York staff under one roof.[5] Following the crash of the dot-com bubble and the shutdown of the high yield markets in late 2000, CIBC World Markets began to suffer a series of setbacks. When the 300 Madison building was completed in 2004, CIBC's diminished workforce took up only a few floors, leasing the remainder to PriceWaterhouseCoopers.[6]
Decline of CIBC World Markets[edit]
In July 2001, the Wall Street Journal profiled CIBC World Markets, chronicling the rapid decline of the bank from the peaks of Wall Street's league table rankings.[7] At the same time, the High Yield Group was restructured with the original Argosy Group founders focusing their efforts solely on their private equity and merchant banking operations, known as Trimaran Capital Partners. Bloom, Heyer and Kehler were replaced by managing directors Edward Levy and Bruce Spohler. The Trimaran operations would subsequently spinout completely from CIBC World Markets.
By 2002 CIBC was forced to set aside C$1.5 billion for bad corporate loans, primarily from CIBC World Markets and the bank was linked two of the most famous victims of the corporate accounting scandals of the early 2000s: Enron Corporation and Global Crossing.[4] As a result of these developments, the parent bank implemented a strategy to reallocate resources away from the riskier CIBC World Markets division in favor of its retail operations.[4]
As part of this strategy, in 2003, CIBC sold an asset management division along with retail brokerage to Fahnestock Viner along with the Oppenheimer & Co. name. Upon doing so CIBC Wood Gundy (in Canada) and CIBC Oppenheimer (in US) became jointly known as CIBC World Markets. The Wood Gundy nomenclature lives on today as the retail brokerage division of CIBC World Markets Inc., however only operates in Canada; the U.S. operation lacking a retail arm. Also in September 2003, a jury found that CIBC had failed to provide complete financial information to investors in a high-yield bond offering. Just a few months later, at the end of 2003, CIBC reached an $80 million settlement with the Securities and Exchange Commission over its various financings for Enron, representing far more than the bank had earned in fees.[4]
Sale to Oppenheimer & Co. (Fahnestock Viner)[edit]
By 2004, CIBC had begun winding down much of its investment banking business in the United States. CIBC World Markets reduced its staff by two-thirds from 2001 through 2004.
In November 2007, the new Oppenheimer & Co. (Fahnestock) announced that it would purchase a major part of CIBC World Markets' U.S. Investment Banking, Corporate Syndicate, Institutional Sales and Trading, Equity Research, Options Trading and a portion of the Debt Capital Markets business which includes Convertible Bond Trading, Loan Syndication, High Yield Origination and Trading as well as related operations located in the UK, Israel and Hong Kong. The deal closed January 14, 2008 and essentially reunited the original Oppenheimer & Co. which CIBC divided in the sale to Fahnestock.
On February 29, 2008, CIBC World Markets Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Brian Shaw (Encana Corp) was replaced in both capacities by Richard Nesbitt, a former TSX Group CEO.[8][9]
Notable current and former employees[edit]

Geoff Belsher and Harry Culham, Co-Chair of CIBC World Markets
Victor Dodig, President and CEO of the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce
Henry Blodget, Equity Research Analyst.
Meredith Whitney, Equity Research Analyst.
Guy Adami, TV personality, author, financial analyst and professional investor
Jeff Rubin, former chief economist, author of Why Your World Is About to Get a Whole Lot Smaller.

See also[edit]


Companies portal



Oppenheimer & Co.
Wood Gundy Inc.
CIBC Wood Gundy

References[edit]



^ a b c CIBC 2016 Annual Report
^ Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce Profile
^ a b Trimaran Capital Partners Announces Formation of Trimaran Fund II at $1.043 Billion
^ a b c d Bank Works To Improve Its Image In Canada
^ 300 Madison/CIBC World Markets
^ Pricewaterhouse Moving to Madison Ave. Tower
^ "CIBC World Markets Trips in Big Leagues." The Wall Street Journal (Friday, August 3, 2001)
^ The Globe and Mail, Report on Business, by Virginia Galt and Tara Perkins – January 7, 2008 at 10:44 AM EST – Subprime woes lead to shakeup at CIBC
^ CIBC World Markets Executive Biographies - Richard Nesbitt










v
t
e


Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce






Chief Executive Officer: Victor G. Dodig








Fiscal year 2016 statistics
Net income: $4.3 billion CAD[1]
Market capitalization: $39.9 billion CAD[2]
Assets: $501.4 billion CAD[3]
Employees: 43,213 (FTE, 2016)[4]
Stock symbols: TSX: CM NYSE: CM
Website: www.cibc.com












Major brands by financial service








Master: CIBC
Financial group: CIBC
Canadian banking: CIBC
Caribbean banking: CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank
International banking: CIBC Private Wealth Management
Canadian mutual funds: CIBC Mutual Funds
Canadian brokerage: CIBC Investor's Edge and CIBC Wood Gundy
Canadian insurance: CIBC Insurance
Capital markets: CIBC World Markets
Custodial: CIBC Mellon















v
t
e


Investment banks




Bank



Divisions of
universal banks





Bulge bracket




Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Barclays
Citi Institutional Clients Group
Credit Suisse
Deutsche Bank Corporate and Investment Bank
J.P. Morgan & Co. (J.P. Morgan Cazenove)
UBS Investment Bank






Other




Berenberg Bank
BMO Capital Markets
BOC International
BNP Paribas Corporate & Institutional Banking
Brown Shipley
CIBC World Markets
CITIC Securities (CLSA)
Commerzbank Corporates & Markets
Crédit Agricole Corporate and Investment Bank
Daiwa Securities Capital Markets
EverBank World Markets
Harris Williams & Co.
HSBC Global Banking and Markets
ING Commercial Banking
Is Investment
KBC Bank
Korea Development Bank (Daewoo Securities)
Lloyds Bank Corporate Markets
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities
Mizuho Corporate Bank
Natixis
Nomura Securities
RBC Capital Markets
RBS Markets & International Banking
Sberbank CIB
Société Générale Corporate & Investment Bank
Standard Chartered
TD Securities
UniCredit Corporate & Investment Banking
VTB Capital
Wells Fargo Securities








Independents





Bulge bracket




Goldman Sachs
Morgan Stanley






Other




Allen & Company
Blackstone Group
Brewin Dolphin
BTG Pactual
Centerview Partners
China International Capital Corporation
Close Brothers Group
China Everbright Group

China Everbright Limited
Everbright Securities


Evercore Partners
FBR Capital Markets
Galaxy
Greenhill & Co.
Guosen Securities
Haitong Securities
Houlihan Lokey
Investec
Jefferies
Keefe, Bruyette & Woods
Lazard
Lincoln International
Macquarie Group
Mediobanca
Moelis & Company
N M Rothschild & Sons
Oppenheimer & Co.
Perella Weinberg Partners
Piper Jaffray
Raymond James Financial
Renaissance Capital
ROTH Capital Partners
Salam Investment Ltd.
Sandler O'Neill and Partners
Stifel Nicolaus
Stone Key Partners
William Blair & Company











 Category
 List







^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=CIBC_World_Markets&oldid=785034957"					
Categories: Canadian Imperial Bank of CommerceStock brokerages and investment banks of CanadaCompanies based in TorontoHidden categories: Pages using deprecated image syntaxArticles needing additional references from September 2009All articles needing additional references 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


Bahasa Indonesia 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 11 June 2017, at 08:20.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









CIBC World Markets - Wikipedia






















 






CIBC World Markets

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


CIBC World Markets





Type

Subsidiary


Industry
Investment bank


Predecessor
Wood Gundy
The Argosy Group
Oppenheimer Holdings


Founded
1988 (acquisition of Wood Gundy)


Headquarters
Toronto, Ontario, Canada



Key people

Richard Nesbitt, CEO of World Markets


Products
Mergers and acquisitions, Capital markets, Financial services


Revenue
 C$2.90 billion (2016) [1]



Net income

 C$1.08 billion (2016)[1]


Total assets
C$162.8 billion (2016)[1]



Number of employees

1,100


Parent
Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce


Website
www.cibcwm.com


CIBC World Markets is the investment banking subsidiary of the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce. The firm operates as an investment bank both in the domestic and international equity and debt capital markets. The bank provides a variety of financial services including credit and capital market products, mergers and acquisitions, merchant banking and other investment banking advisory services.
Established via a series of acquisitions, including Canadian brokerage Wood, Gundy & Co. and U.S.-based Oppenheimer & Co. CIBC World Markets has been a leading investment bank in Canada with a notable presence in various international markets at times over the years.
CIBC World Markets is headquartered in Toronto with offices in Calgary, Montreal, Vancouver, Ottawa, New York City, Atlanta, Boston, Chicago, Houston, Salt Lake City, Beijing, Dublin, Hong Kong, London, Shanghai, Singapore, Sydney and Tokyo.



Contents


1 History

1.1 CIBC Wood Gundy
1.2 Acquisition of the Argosy Group
1.3 CIBC Oppenheimer
1.4 Creating the CIBC World Markets platform
1.5 Decline of CIBC World Markets
1.6 Sale to Oppenheimer & Co. (Fahnestock Viner)


2 Notable current and former employees
3 See also
4 References



History[edit]





This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (September 2009) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)






CIBC Wood Gundy
(1988 - 1997)


CIBC Wood Gundy[edit]
See also: CIBC Wood Gundy and Wood, Gundy & Co.
CIBC purchased a majority stake in Wood, Gundy & Co. in June 1988 for C$203 million.[2] Wood Gundy was established in Toronto in 1905 by George Herbert Wood and James Henry Gundy. At the time of its acquisition, Wood Gundy was the leading Canadian investment dealer. Following the acquisition, the CIBC formed CIBC Wood Gundy, which offered primarily asset management services for corporate and institutional clients. Two years later, in 1990, they continued to expand the Canadian securities business by acquiring much of Merrill Lynch & Company's Canadian business.
For a period of time, CIBC Wood Gundy operated as CIBC Eyers Reed in Australia following the acquisition of the broker-dealer.
Acquisition of the Argosy Group[edit]
Main article: The Argosy Group
In April 1995, CIBC's investment banking subsidiary, then known as CIBC Wood Gundy announced the acquisition of The Argosy Group, a New York-based investment banking firm involved primarily in the high yield debt market. Argosy had been founded by three Drexel Burnham Lambert alumni: Jay Bloom, Andrew Heyer and Dean Kehler who had worked together in Drexel's New York office in the 1980s. Argosy was founded in 1990 as a 9-person advisory firm.
The acquisition of Argosy marked an aggressive push by CIBC into the US investment banking business. Prior to that point, CIBC had never done a junk bond deal. Argosy's three major principals had worked on some of the biggest junk bond deals of the 1980s while at Drexel Burnham Lambert. The 52 Argosy employees constituted the core of what would become CIBC's High Yield Group and CIBC Argosy Merchant Banking funds that were responsible for, among other things, the $1 billion windfall that CIBC would earn from its early investments in Global Crossing. The Argosy principals also managed two collateralized debt obligation vehicles known as Caravelle Funds I and II.[3]




CIBC Oppenheimer
(1997 - 1999)


CIBC Oppenheimer[edit]
See also: Oppenheimer & Co.
In 1997, CIBC Wood Gundy (New York) under the direction of Michael S. Rulle acquired the U.S. brokerage house Oppenheimer & Co. CIBC wanted to expand its brokerage business and was interested in the New York-based firm which had annual revenues of $800 million and a network of 680 brokers, primarily selling stocks and bonds. Oppenheimer also included a small investment banking group.
Negotiations began talks with Oppenheimer in July 1997 and CIBC closed on the transaction in November 1997, paying $525 million over the next three years, including $175 million in retention payments to key Oppenheimer professionals. After the acquisition the U.S. division took the name CIBC Oppenheimer, eliminating the use of the Wood Gundy brand through much of the bank.
Creating the CIBC World Markets platform[edit]
By 1999, CIBC would scale back the usage of the Oppenheimer name in favor of CIBC World Markets. The business in Canada was centered around providing mergers and acquisitions advisory services and various equity offerings for large Canadian companies. However, with the acquisition of Argosy, the center of gravity of the investment bank began to shift toward the United States.




CIBC World Markets
(1998 - 2002)


Although initially intended to represent a foray into a variety of global markets, CIBC World Markets ultimately focused on three markets: Canada, the United States and to a lesser extent the United Kingdom. The CIBC World Markets unit suffered a net loss of C$186 million during the fourth quarter of fiscal 1998 which dragged down the performance of the parent bank's stock by almost one-third. The loss in 1998 was due primarily to very rapid expansion into regions impacted by the various financial crises in 1998 in Asia. As a result, CIBC World Markets refocused its efforts primarily on the U.S. and Canadian markets, despite the seemingly global ambitions implied in the unit's name.
CIBC World Markets reached a peak in 1999 and 2000, when the investment bank cracked the top ten of U.S. issuers of high yield bonds and the top twenty in mergers and acquisitions advisory. In 1999, CIBC World Markets, backed Gary Winnick and his company Global Crossing to build optical fiber cable connections under the ocean. CIBC would ultimately realize a gain of $2.0 billion from its relatively small equity investment in Global Crossing, representing more than 20% of the bank's profits in 2000.[4] On the back of the success in Global Crossing, CIBC backed the three heads of its CIBC Argosy Merchant Banking funds in a new private equity operation known as Trimaran Capital Partners. Trimaran closed on a $1 billion fund in April 2001, with capital provided primarily by CIBC.[3]
In June 2001, CIBC announced the construction of a new $800 million office tower at 300 Madison Avenue (At the corner of Madison Avenue and 42nd Street). The 35-story, 1,200,000-square-foot (110,000 m2) building was originally expected to house up to 3,000 employees, bringing CIBC's entire New York staff under one roof.[5] Following the crash of the dot-com bubble and the shutdown of the high yield markets in late 2000, CIBC World Markets began to suffer a series of setbacks. When the 300 Madison building was completed in 2004, CIBC's diminished workforce took up only a few floors, leasing the remainder to PriceWaterhouseCoopers.[6]
Decline of CIBC World Markets[edit]
In July 2001, the Wall Street Journal profiled CIBC World Markets, chronicling the rapid decline of the bank from the peaks of Wall Street's league table rankings.[7] At the same time, the High Yield Group was restructured with the original Argosy Group founders focusing their efforts solely on their private equity and merchant banking operations, known as Trimaran Capital Partners. Bloom, Heyer and Kehler were replaced by managing directors Edward Levy and Bruce Spohler. The Trimaran operations would subsequently spinout completely from CIBC World Markets.
By 2002 CIBC was forced to set aside C$1.5 billion for bad corporate loans, primarily from CIBC World Markets and the bank was linked two of the most famous victims of the corporate accounting scandals of the early 2000s: Enron Corporation and Global Crossing.[4] As a result of these developments, the parent bank implemented a strategy to reallocate resources away from the riskier CIBC World Markets division in favor of its retail operations.[4]
As part of this strategy, in 2003, CIBC sold an asset management division along with retail brokerage to Fahnestock Viner along with the Oppenheimer & Co. name. Upon doing so CIBC Wood Gundy (in Canada) and CIBC Oppenheimer (in US) became jointly known as CIBC World Markets. The Wood Gundy nomenclature lives on today as the retail brokerage division of CIBC World Markets Inc., however only operates in Canada; the U.S. operation lacking a retail arm. Also in September 2003, a jury found that CIBC had failed to provide complete financial information to investors in a high-yield bond offering. Just a few months later, at the end of 2003, CIBC reached an $80 million settlement with the Securities and Exchange Commission over its various financings for Enron, representing far more than the bank had earned in fees.[4]
Sale to Oppenheimer & Co. (Fahnestock Viner)[edit]
By 2004, CIBC had begun winding down much of its investment banking business in the United States. CIBC World Markets reduced its staff by two-thirds from 2001 through 2004.
In November 2007, the new Oppenheimer & Co. (Fahnestock) announced that it would purchase a major part of CIBC World Markets' U.S. Investment Banking, Corporate Syndicate, Institutional Sales and Trading, Equity Research, Options Trading and a portion of the Debt Capital Markets business which includes Convertible Bond Trading, Loan Syndication, High Yield Origination and Trading as well as related operations located in the UK, Israel and Hong Kong. The deal closed January 14, 2008 and essentially reunited the original Oppenheimer & Co. which CIBC divided in the sale to Fahnestock.
On February 29, 2008, CIBC World Markets Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Brian Shaw (Encana Corp) was replaced in both capacities by Richard Nesbitt, a former TSX Group CEO.[8][9]
Notable current and former employees[edit]

Geoff Belsher and Harry Culham, Co-Chair of CIBC World Markets
Victor Dodig, President and CEO of the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce
Henry Blodget, Equity Research Analyst.
Meredith Whitney, Equity Research Analyst.
Guy Adami, TV personality, author, financial analyst and professional investor
Jeff Rubin, former chief economist, author of Why Your World Is About to Get a Whole Lot Smaller.

See also[edit]


Companies portal



Oppenheimer & Co.
Wood Gundy Inc.
CIBC Wood Gundy

References[edit]



^ a b c CIBC 2016 Annual Report
^ Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce Profile
^ a b Trimaran Capital Partners Announces Formation of Trimaran Fund II at $1.043 Billion
^ a b c d Bank Works To Improve Its Image In Canada
^ 300 Madison/CIBC World Markets
^ Pricewaterhouse Moving to Madison Ave. Tower
^ "CIBC World Markets Trips in Big Leagues." The Wall Street Journal (Friday, August 3, 2001)
^ The Globe and Mail, Report on Business, by Virginia Galt and Tara Perkins – January 7, 2008 at 10:44 AM EST – Subprime woes lead to shakeup at CIBC
^ CIBC World Markets Executive Biographies - Richard Nesbitt










v
t
e


Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce






Chief Executive Officer: Victor G. Dodig








Fiscal year 2016 statistics
Net income: $4.3 billion CAD[1]
Market capitalization: $39.9 billion CAD[2]
Assets: $501.4 billion CAD[3]
Employees: 43,213 (FTE, 2016)[4]
Stock symbols: TSX: CM NYSE: CM
Website: www.cibc.com












Major brands by financial service








Master: CIBC
Financial group: CIBC
Canadian banking: CIBC
Caribbean banking: CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank
International banking: CIBC Private Wealth Management
Canadian mutual funds: CIBC Mutual Funds
Canadian brokerage: CIBC Investor's Edge and CIBC Wood Gundy
Canadian insurance: CIBC Insurance
Capital markets: CIBC World Markets
Custodial: CIBC Mellon















v
t
e


Investment banks




Bank



Divisions of
universal banks





Bulge bracket




Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Barclays
Citi Institutional Clients Group
Credit Suisse
Deutsche Bank Corporate and Investment Bank
J.P. Morgan & Co. (J.P. Morgan Cazenove)
UBS Investment Bank






Other




Berenberg Bank
BMO Capital Markets
BOC International
BNP Paribas Corporate & Institutional Banking
Brown Shipley
CIBC World Markets
CITIC Securities (CLSA)
Commerzbank Corporates & Markets
Crédit Agricole Corporate and Investment Bank
Daiwa Securities Capital Markets
EverBank World Markets
Harris Williams & Co.
HSBC Global Banking and Markets
ING Commercial Banking
Is Investment
KBC Bank
Korea Development Bank (Daewoo Securities)
Lloyds Bank Corporate Markets
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities
Mizuho Corporate Bank
Natixis
Nomura Securities
RBC Capital Markets
RBS Markets & International Banking
Sberbank CIB
Société Générale Corporate & Investment Bank
Standard Chartered
TD Securities
UniCredit Corporate & Investment Banking
VTB Capital
Wells Fargo Securities








Independents





Bulge bracket




Goldman Sachs
Morgan Stanley






Other




Allen & Company
Blackstone Group
Brewin Dolphin
BTG Pactual
Centerview Partners
China International Capital Corporation
Close Brothers Group
China Everbright Group

China Everbright Limited
Everbright Securities


Evercore Partners
FBR Capital Markets
Galaxy
Greenhill & Co.
Guosen Securities
Haitong Securities
Houlihan Lokey
Investec
Jefferies
Keefe, Bruyette & Woods
Lazard
Lincoln International
Macquarie Group
Mediobanca
Moelis & Company
N M Rothschild & Sons
Oppenheimer & Co.
Perella Weinberg Partners
Piper Jaffray
Raymond James Financial
Renaissance Capital
ROTH Capital Partners
Salam Investment Ltd.
Sandler O'Neill and Partners
Stifel Nicolaus
Stone Key Partners
William Blair & Company











 Category
 List







^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=CIBC_World_Markets&oldid=785034957"					
Categories: Canadian Imperial Bank of CommerceStock brokerages and investment banks of CanadaCompanies based in TorontoHidden categories: Pages using deprecated image syntaxArticles needing additional references from September 2009All articles needing additional references 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


Bahasa Indonesia 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 11 June 2017, at 08:20.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









CIBC World Markets - Wikipedia






















 






CIBC World Markets

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


CIBC World Markets





Type

Subsidiary


Industry
Investment bank


Predecessor
Wood Gundy
The Argosy Group
Oppenheimer Holdings


Founded
1988 (acquisition of Wood Gundy)


Headquarters
Toronto, Ontario, Canada



Key people

Richard Nesbitt, CEO of World Markets


Products
Mergers and acquisitions, Capital markets, Financial services


Revenue
 C$2.90 billion (2016) [1]



Net income

 C$1.08 billion (2016)[1]


Total assets
C$162.8 billion (2016)[1]



Number of employees

1,100


Parent
Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce


Website
www.cibcwm.com


CIBC World Markets is the investment banking subsidiary of the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce. The firm operates as an investment bank both in the domestic and international equity and debt capital markets. The bank provides a variety of financial services including credit and capital market products, mergers and acquisitions, merchant banking and other investment banking advisory services.
Established via a series of acquisitions, including Canadian brokerage Wood, Gundy & Co. and U.S.-based Oppenheimer & Co. CIBC World Markets has been a leading investment bank in Canada with a notable presence in various international markets at times over the years.
CIBC World Markets is headquartered in Toronto with offices in Calgary, Montreal, Vancouver, Ottawa, New York City, Atlanta, Boston, Chicago, Houston, Salt Lake City, Beijing, Dublin, Hong Kong, London, Shanghai, Singapore, Sydney and Tokyo.



Contents


1 History

1.1 CIBC Wood Gundy
1.2 Acquisition of the Argosy Group
1.3 CIBC Oppenheimer
1.4 Creating the CIBC World Markets platform
1.5 Decline of CIBC World Markets
1.6 Sale to Oppenheimer & Co. (Fahnestock Viner)


2 Notable current and former employees
3 See also
4 References



History[edit]





This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (September 2009) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)






CIBC Wood Gundy
(1988 - 1997)


CIBC Wood Gundy[edit]
See also: CIBC Wood Gundy and Wood, Gundy & Co.
CIBC purchased a majority stake in Wood, Gundy & Co. in June 1988 for C$203 million.[2] Wood Gundy was established in Toronto in 1905 by George Herbert Wood and James Henry Gundy. At the time of its acquisition, Wood Gundy was the leading Canadian investment dealer. Following the acquisition, the CIBC formed CIBC Wood Gundy, which offered primarily asset management services for corporate and institutional clients. Two years later, in 1990, they continued to expand the Canadian securities business by acquiring much of Merrill Lynch & Company's Canadian business.
For a period of time, CIBC Wood Gundy operated as CIBC Eyers Reed in Australia following the acquisition of the broker-dealer.
Acquisition of the Argosy Group[edit]
Main article: The Argosy Group
In April 1995, CIBC's investment banking subsidiary, then known as CIBC Wood Gundy announced the acquisition of The Argosy Group, a New York-based investment banking firm involved primarily in the high yield debt market. Argosy had been founded by three Drexel Burnham Lambert alumni: Jay Bloom, Andrew Heyer and Dean Kehler who had worked together in Drexel's New York office in the 1980s. Argosy was founded in 1990 as a 9-person advisory firm.
The acquisition of Argosy marked an aggressive push by CIBC into the US investment banking business. Prior to that point, CIBC had never done a junk bond deal. Argosy's three major principals had worked on some of the biggest junk bond deals of the 1980s while at Drexel Burnham Lambert. The 52 Argosy employees constituted the core of what would become CIBC's High Yield Group and CIBC Argosy Merchant Banking funds that were responsible for, among other things, the $1 billion windfall that CIBC would earn from its early investments in Global Crossing. The Argosy principals also managed two collateralized debt obligation vehicles known as Caravelle Funds I and II.[3]




CIBC Oppenheimer
(1997 - 1999)


CIBC Oppenheimer[edit]
See also: Oppenheimer & Co.
In 1997, CIBC Wood Gundy (New York) under the direction of Michael S. Rulle acquired the U.S. brokerage house Oppenheimer & Co. CIBC wanted to expand its brokerage business and was interested in the New York-based firm which had annual revenues of $800 million and a network of 680 brokers, primarily selling stocks and bonds. Oppenheimer also included a small investment banking group.
Negotiations began talks with Oppenheimer in July 1997 and CIBC closed on the transaction in November 1997, paying $525 million over the next three years, including $175 million in retention payments to key Oppenheimer professionals. After the acquisition the U.S. division took the name CIBC Oppenheimer, eliminating the use of the Wood Gundy brand through much of the bank.
Creating the CIBC World Markets platform[edit]
By 1999, CIBC would scale back the usage of the Oppenheimer name in favor of CIBC World Markets. The business in Canada was centered around providing mergers and acquisitions advisory services and various equity offerings for large Canadian companies. However, with the acquisition of Argosy, the center of gravity of the investment bank began to shift toward the United States.




CIBC World Markets
(1998 - 2002)


Although initially intended to represent a foray into a variety of global markets, CIBC World Markets ultimately focused on three markets: Canada, the United States and to a lesser extent the United Kingdom. The CIBC World Markets unit suffered a net loss of C$186 million during the fourth quarter of fiscal 1998 which dragged down the performance of the parent bank's stock by almost one-third. The loss in 1998 was due primarily to very rapid expansion into regions impacted by the various financial crises in 1998 in Asia. As a result, CIBC World Markets refocused its efforts primarily on the U.S. and Canadian markets, despite the seemingly global ambitions implied in the unit's name.
CIBC World Markets reached a peak in 1999 and 2000, when the investment bank cracked the top ten of U.S. issuers of high yield bonds and the top twenty in mergers and acquisitions advisory. In 1999, CIBC World Markets, backed Gary Winnick and his company Global Crossing to build optical fiber cable connections under the ocean. CIBC would ultimately realize a gain of $2.0 billion from its relatively small equity investment in Global Crossing, representing more than 20% of the bank's profits in 2000.[4] On the back of the success in Global Crossing, CIBC backed the three heads of its CIBC Argosy Merchant Banking funds in a new private equity operation known as Trimaran Capital Partners. Trimaran closed on a $1 billion fund in April 2001, with capital provided primarily by CIBC.[3]
In June 2001, CIBC announced the construction of a new $800 million office tower at 300 Madison Avenue (At the corner of Madison Avenue and 42nd Street). The 35-story, 1,200,000-square-foot (110,000 m2) building was originally expected to house up to 3,000 employees, bringing CIBC's entire New York staff under one roof.[5] Following the crash of the dot-com bubble and the shutdown of the high yield markets in late 2000, CIBC World Markets began to suffer a series of setbacks. When the 300 Madison building was completed in 2004, CIBC's diminished workforce took up only a few floors, leasing the remainder to PriceWaterhouseCoopers.[6]
Decline of CIBC World Markets[edit]
In July 2001, the Wall Street Journal profiled CIBC World Markets, chronicling the rapid decline of the bank from the peaks of Wall Street's league table rankings.[7] At the same time, the High Yield Group was restructured with the original Argosy Group founders focusing their efforts solely on their private equity and merchant banking operations, known as Trimaran Capital Partners. Bloom, Heyer and Kehler were replaced by managing directors Edward Levy and Bruce Spohler. The Trimaran operations would subsequently spinout completely from CIBC World Markets.
By 2002 CIBC was forced to set aside C$1.5 billion for bad corporate loans, primarily from CIBC World Markets and the bank was linked two of the most famous victims of the corporate accounting scandals of the early 2000s: Enron Corporation and Global Crossing.[4] As a result of these developments, the parent bank implemented a strategy to reallocate resources away from the riskier CIBC World Markets division in favor of its retail operations.[4]
As part of this strategy, in 2003, CIBC sold an asset management division along with retail brokerage to Fahnestock Viner along with the Oppenheimer & Co. name. Upon doing so CIBC Wood Gundy (in Canada) and CIBC Oppenheimer (in US) became jointly known as CIBC World Markets. The Wood Gundy nomenclature lives on today as the retail brokerage division of CIBC World Markets Inc., however only operates in Canada; the U.S. operation lacking a retail arm. Also in September 2003, a jury found that CIBC had failed to provide complete financial information to investors in a high-yield bond offering. Just a few months later, at the end of 2003, CIBC reached an $80 million settlement with the Securities and Exchange Commission over its various financings for Enron, representing far more than the bank had earned in fees.[4]
Sale to Oppenheimer & Co. (Fahnestock Viner)[edit]
By 2004, CIBC had begun winding down much of its investment banking business in the United States. CIBC World Markets reduced its staff by two-thirds from 2001 through 2004.
In November 2007, the new Oppenheimer & Co. (Fahnestock) announced that it would purchase a major part of CIBC World Markets' U.S. Investment Banking, Corporate Syndicate, Institutional Sales and Trading, Equity Research, Options Trading and a portion of the Debt Capital Markets business which includes Convertible Bond Trading, Loan Syndication, High Yield Origination and Trading as well as related operations located in the UK, Israel and Hong Kong. The deal closed January 14, 2008 and essentially reunited the original Oppenheimer & Co. which CIBC divided in the sale to Fahnestock.
On February 29, 2008, CIBC World Markets Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Brian Shaw (Encana Corp) was replaced in both capacities by Richard Nesbitt, a former TSX Group CEO.[8][9]
Notable current and former employees[edit]

Geoff Belsher and Harry Culham, Co-Chair of CIBC World Markets
Victor Dodig, President and CEO of the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce
Henry Blodget, Equity Research Analyst.
Meredith Whitney, Equity Research Analyst.
Guy Adami, TV personality, author, financial analyst and professional investor
Jeff Rubin, former chief economist, author of Why Your World Is About to Get a Whole Lot Smaller.

See also[edit]


Companies portal



Oppenheimer & Co.
Wood Gundy Inc.
CIBC Wood Gundy

References[edit]



^ a b c CIBC 2016 Annual Report
^ Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce Profile
^ a b Trimaran Capital Partners Announces Formation of Trimaran Fund II at $1.043 Billion
^ a b c d Bank Works To Improve Its Image In Canada
^ 300 Madison/CIBC World Markets
^ Pricewaterhouse Moving to Madison Ave. Tower
^ "CIBC World Markets Trips in Big Leagues." The Wall Street Journal (Friday, August 3, 2001)
^ The Globe and Mail, Report on Business, by Virginia Galt and Tara Perkins – January 7, 2008 at 10:44 AM EST – Subprime woes lead to shakeup at CIBC
^ CIBC World Markets Executive Biographies - Richard Nesbitt










v
t
e


Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce






Chief Executive Officer: Victor G. Dodig








Fiscal year 2016 statistics
Net income: $4.3 billion CAD[1]
Market capitalization: $39.9 billion CAD[2]
Assets: $501.4 billion CAD[3]
Employees: 43,213 (FTE, 2016)[4]
Stock symbols: TSX: CM NYSE: CM
Website: www.cibc.com












Major brands by financial service








Master: CIBC
Financial group: CIBC
Canadian banking: CIBC
Caribbean banking: CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank
International banking: CIBC Private Wealth Management
Canadian mutual funds: CIBC Mutual Funds
Canadian brokerage: CIBC Investor's Edge and CIBC Wood Gundy
Canadian insurance: CIBC Insurance
Capital markets: CIBC World Markets
Custodial: CIBC Mellon















v
t
e


Investment banks




Bank



Divisions of
universal banks





Bulge bracket




Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Barclays
Citi Institutional Clients Group
Credit Suisse
Deutsche Bank Corporate and Investment Bank
J.P. Morgan & Co. (J.P. Morgan Cazenove)
UBS Investment Bank






Other




Berenberg Bank
BMO Capital Markets
BOC International
BNP Paribas Corporate & Institutional Banking
Brown Shipley
CIBC World Markets
CITIC Securities (CLSA)
Commerzbank Corporates & Markets
Crédit Agricole Corporate and Investment Bank
Daiwa Securities Capital Markets
EverBank World Markets
Harris Williams & Co.
HSBC Global Banking and Markets
ING Commercial Banking
Is Investment
KBC Bank
Korea Development Bank (Daewoo Securities)
Lloyds Bank Corporate Markets
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities
Mizuho Corporate Bank
Natixis
Nomura Securities
RBC Capital Markets
RBS Markets & International Banking
Sberbank CIB
Société Générale Corporate & Investment Bank
Standard Chartered
TD Securities
UniCredit Corporate & Investment Banking
VTB Capital
Wells Fargo Securities








Independents





Bulge bracket




Goldman Sachs
Morgan Stanley






Other




Allen & Company
Blackstone Group
Brewin Dolphin
BTG Pactual
Centerview Partners
China International Capital Corporation
Close Brothers Group
China Everbright Group

China Everbright Limited
Everbright Securities


Evercore Partners
FBR Capital Markets
Galaxy
Greenhill & Co.
Guosen Securities
Haitong Securities
Houlihan Lokey
Investec
Jefferies
Keefe, Bruyette & Woods
Lazard
Lincoln International
Macquarie Group
Mediobanca
Moelis & Company
N M Rothschild & Sons
Oppenheimer & Co.
Perella Weinberg Partners
Piper Jaffray
Raymond James Financial
Renaissance Capital
ROTH Capital Partners
Salam Investment Ltd.
Sandler O'Neill and Partners
Stifel Nicolaus
Stone Key Partners
William Blair & Company











 Category
 List







^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=CIBC_World_Markets&oldid=785034957"					
Categories: Canadian Imperial Bank of CommerceStock brokerages and investment banks of CanadaCompanies based in TorontoHidden categories: Pages using deprecated image syntaxArticles needing additional references from September 2009All articles needing additional references 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


Bahasa Indonesia 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 11 June 2017, at 08:20.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 








Cibc World Markets Corp.                                                                                                 - Menlo Park                                        , CA         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



CA



Menlo Park



Security Brokers and Dealers



Investment Bankers



                            Cibc World Markets Corp.
                                    



 





















C 


Cibc World Markets Corp.                                                                                                
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



2420 SAND HILL RD STE 300 MENLO PARK, CA 94025
Get Directions



(650) 234-2400
 





Business Info



 Founded --
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue --
 Employee Count 4
 Industries Investment Bankers
 Contacts Eric Risley                                                                                                             







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Cibc World Markets Corp.                                                                                                 specializes in Investment Bankers. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







C

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.
















Cibc World Markets Corp                                                                                                  - Denver                                            , CO         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



CO



Denver



Security Brokers and Dealers



Investment Bankers



                            Cibc World Markets Corp
                                    



 





















C 


Cibc World Markets Corp                                                                                                 
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



4643 S ULSTER ST STE 910 DENVER, CO 80237
Get Directions



(720) 554-1113
 





Business Info



 Founded --
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue --
 Employee Count 6
 Industries Investment Bankers
 Contacts Ed Epler                                                                                                                







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message










VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







C

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.














   CIBC World Markets Corp | ZoomInfo.com


Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce - Wikipedia






















 






Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from CIBC)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

"CIBC" redirects here. For other uses, see CIBC (disambiguation).

Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce





Type

Public


Traded as
TSX: CM
NYSE: CM
S&P/TSX 60 component


Industry
Financial Services, banking


Founded
1961
(Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce)
1875
(Imperial Bank of Canada)
1867
(Canadian Bank of Commerce)[1]


Headquarters
Commerce Court
Toronto, Ontario, Canada



Key people


Victor G. Dodig, President and CEO[2]
John Manley, Chair of the Board[3]


Revenue
 C$15.0 billion (2016)[4]



Net income

 C$4.3 billion (2016)[5]


Total assets
 C$501.357 billion (2016)[6]



Number of employees

43,213 (FTE, 2016)[7]


Subsidiaries
CIBC Holdings (Cayman) Limited
CIBC World Markets
CIBC Trust Corporation
CIBC Asset Management Inc.[8]


Website
www.cibc.com


The Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce (French: Banque Canadienne Impériale de Commerce), commonly referred to as CIBC, is one of the Big Five banks in Canada. The bank is headquartered at Commerce Court in Toronto, Ontario.[9] CIBC's Institution Number (or bank number) is 010, and its SWIFT code is CIBCCATT.
The bank has three strategic business units: Retail and Business Banking, Wealth Management, and Capital Markets. It has international operations in the United States, the Caribbean, Asia, and Europe. Globally, CIBC serves more than eleven million clients, and has over 40,000 employees. The company ranks at number 172 on the Forbes Global 2000 listing.[10] CIBC was named the strongest bank in North America and the 3rd strongest bank in the world, by Bloomberg Markets magazine.[11]



Contents


1 History

1.1 Origins
1.2 Forming Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce
1.3 Present


2 Notable corporate activities and international operations

2.1 North America
2.2 Caribbean and the West Indies
2.3 Restructuring and outsourcing
2.4 Miscellaneous


3 Corporate governance
4 Sponsorships
5 Credit agency ratings
6 Settlements and controversies

6.1 Enron
6.2 Market timing
6.3 Visa cardholders
6.4 Voluntary refund of erroneous charges
6.5 Privacy

6.5.1 2005
6.5.2 2007


6.6 Employee overtime


7 Significant buildings

7.1 Gallery


8 See also
9 References
10 External links



History[edit]
The Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce, as it is known today, came into being in 1961. The bank was formed through the merger of the Canadian Bank of Commerce and the Imperial Bank of Canada. At the time, they were two of Canada's largest banks.
Origins[edit]




Commerce Building (c. 1930), now known as Commerce Court North in Toronto


Main articles: Canadian Bank of Commerce and Imperial Bank of Canada
The Honourable William McMaster founded the Canadian Bank of Commerce which opened on May 15, 1867, in Toronto as competition for the Bank of Montreal; by 1874 it had 24 branches.
The Imperial Bank of Canada opened in Toronto on March 18, 1875, founded by former Commerce Vice-president Henry Stark Howland.
By the end of 1895, the Canadian Bank of Commerce had grown to 58 branches and the Imperial Bank of Canada to 18.
The 1896 gold strike in the Yukon prompted the Dominion Government to ask the Canadian Bank of Commerce to open a branch in Dawson City. Acquisitions in the 1920s caused the Commerce Bank to become one of the strongest branch networks in Canada with over 700 local branches; and the bank opened international branches in Cuba, Jamaica, Barbados and Trinidad during the same period.
Wood, Gundy & Company, the precursor of CIBC's investment banking arm, opened its doors on February 1, 1905. During World War I, it took a prominent and active role in the organization of Victory Loans.
The Canadian Bank of Commerce opened its new head office in Toronto in 1931. An observation gallery on the 32nd floor attracted visitors who could get an aerial view of the city.
In 1936, the Commerce was the first Canadian bank to establish a personal loans department.
Following World War II, both banks opened new branches. Although the banks had been barred from the mortgage business since 1871, the Canadian government now called upon them to provide mortgage services. So, in 1954, Canadian banks started offering mortgages for new construction.
Forming Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce[edit]
In 1960, Imperial chairman Stuart Mackersy approached Neil McKinnon the President of the Commerce with a proposal to merge the two banks. This followed a decade of expansion in the Canadian economy and Canada's capitalization of the industrialization of its natural resources. They quickly reached a deal between the two banks.




The newly merged CIBC commissioned a new logo to commemorate its 100th year of operation. The "chevron" logo was in use until 1994[12]


On June 1, 1961, the Canadian Bank of Commerce and the Imperial Bank of Canada merged to form the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce with over 1,200 branches across Canada. The new bank possessed the greatest resources and the most branches of any bank in the country.
Following the merger, the new bank commissioned a new head office. While planning to retain Commerce Court North, the bank hired architect I. M. Pei to design a three-building complex. The result was Commerce Court consisting of a landscaped courtyard complementing the existing building and included the newly built 786 feet (240 m) Commerce Court West. When completed in 1973, the 57-storey building was the tallest in Canada, and the largest stainless-steel-clad building in the world.
In 1967, both Canada and CIBC celebrated their centenaries and CIBC was the only chartered bank to have a branch on-site at Expo 67. Also at this time computerization began to change banking services and the Yonge and Bloor branch in Toronto was the first Canadian bank branch to update customer bank books via computer. This also marked the introduction of inter-branch banking. Before the decade was out, CIBC had introduced the first 24-hour cash dispenser, which would eventually become the ATM.
Changes to federal and provincial regulations ending the separation of banks, investment dealers, trust companies and insurance companies came in 1987. CIBC quickly took advantage of this and became the first Canadian bank to operate an investment dealer, CIBC Securities, offering services to the public.
In 1988, CIBC acquired a majority interest in Wood Gundy which brought a well-respected name and reputation in underwriting. Shortly thereafter, the corporation merged Wood Gundy and CIBC Securities under the name CIBC Wood Gundy which became CIBC Oppenheimer in 1997[13] and later, CIBC World Markets.
In 1992, CIBC introduced automated telephone banking; in 1995 the bank launched its website, and shortly thereafter began offering banking services online. In 1998, CIBC joined with Loblaws to create President's Choice Financial which it launched in 28 Ottawa area stores.
Present[edit]
CIBC agreed to merge with the Toronto-Dominion Bank in 1998. However the Government of Canada, at the recommendation of then Finance Minister Paul Martin, blocked the merger – as well as another proposed by the Bank of Montreal with the Royal Bank of Canada – as not in the best interest of Canadians.[14]
CIBC sold its corporate and purchasing credit card business to U.S. Bank Canada in October 2006 which joined it with business charge cards it previously acquired from Royal Bank of Canada.
In 2006, the stock ticker symbol on the New York Stock Exchange changed from BCM to CM to bring it in line with the ticker symbol on the Toronto Stock Exchange.
In December 2006, CIBC acquired majority control of its publicly held joint venture FirstCaribbean International Bank for just over US$1 billion, (Bds$2 billion), when it purchased the 43.7% stake owned by Barclays Bank.[15] CIBC rebranded the division CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank in 2011.[16]
On February 12, 2009, the Trinidad and Tobago Express reported that CIBC was pursuing discussions to buy CL Financial's stake in the Republic Bank of Trinidad and Tobago.[17] As part of a "bail out" agreement of CL Financial by the government of Trinidad and Tobago during the Global financial crisis of 2008–2009, the corporation was required to sell Republic and other assets. As of February 2011, CL Financial had yet to agree to a sale.[18]
In February, 2010 CIBC became the first chartered bank in Canada to launch a mobile banking iPhone App. It surpassed 100,000 downloads in just over one month following launch, with over 1 million client logins to CIBC Mobile Banking since its introduction.[19][20]
Four months later, the bank announced it signed a deal to buy a C$2.1-billion credit card portfolio from Citigroup's Citibank Canada MasterCard business.[21]
Finally in October of that year, CIBC announced that it would be the first bank in Canada to introduce the internationally used Visa-branded debit card.[22]
In April 2013, CIBC reached an agreement with Invesco to acquire Atlantic Trust, the company's wealth management unit for US$210 million.[23]
CIBC announced in June 2016 that it would acquire the Chicago-based commercial bank PrivateBancorp for US$3.8 billion.[24]
In April 2017, it was announced that CIBC would be moving its headquarters to CIBC Square.[25]
Notable corporate activities and international operations[edit]
North America[edit]

CIBC Mellon Global Securities Services: formed by CIBC and Mellon Bank Corp. (now Bank of New York Mellon) of Pittsburgh PA 1996 and Canada Trust's (now TD Canada Trust) pension and custody business in 1997
Canadian Eastern Finance Limited (CEF): formed by CIBC and Hutchison Whampoa of Hong Kong; includes CEF Capital Limited, CEF Investment Management Limited
President's Choice Financial: A joint venture between CIBC and Loblaw Companies Limited; Banking services such as deposit accounts, investments and credit products (excluding MasterCard) are provided by a division of CIBC Retail Markets, formerly Amicus Bank. In 2005 Amicus was dissolved as a separate legal entity.
Amicus FSB: A similar setup as President's Choice Financial, it was created in 1999 in the United States with Winn Dixie and Safeway Inc. under the Marketplace Bank and Safeway Select Bank brands. It was disbanded in 2002 and sold to E*Trade Bank.
Soltrus Inc 2001: provider of digital trust services for businesses and consumers to communicate and transact over digital networks owned by CIBC, Telus Corp and VeriSign Inc.
Aplettix Inc 2000: firm specializing in secure transaction systems in the banking sector; CIBC signed an agreement with the New York-based firm in 2000, but the project was later abandoned for alternatives such as VeriSign.


Privatebancorp 2017: A Chicago based bank founded in 1989 in Delaware with operations in 13 states mainly in the East Coast. Business focus is in middle market commercial banking, personal and small business banking, as well as private banking and investment management services.[26]

Caribbean and the West Indies[edit]
Main article: CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank




CIBC FirstCaribbean branch in Bridgetown, Barbados


In 1920, Canadian Bank of Commerce established its first branches in the West Indies in Bridgetown, Barbados and in Kingston, Jamaica. That same year it also opened branches in Port of Spain, Trinidad and Havana, Cuba. Its first branch in Mexico City opened in 1910. In 1957, the bank opened a branch in Nassau, the Bahamas, and in the subsequent years expanded its operations in Jamaica.
Between 1963 and 1988, the bank expanded its branch network in Barbados opened branches in St. Vincent, Antigua, and St Lucia. In 1988, CIBC sold 45% of its shares in CIBC Jamaica via a public share issue. Between 1993 and 1996, the bank restructured its holdings in the Caribbean, with the incorporation of CIBC West Indies Holdings Limited and CIBC Caribbean Limited. CIBC West Indies Holdings then sold 30% of its shares to the public. In 1997, CIBC issued 5 million shares in CIBC Bahamas Limited to the public.
On October 31, 2001, Barclays and CIBC agreed to combine their Caribbean operations to establish FirstCaribbean International Bank. CIBC bought Barclays' stake in 2006 to give it control of approximately 92% of FirstCaribbean, which was rebranded as CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank.[16] In 2010, CIBC acquired a 22.5% equity of Butterfield Bank of Bermuda.[27]
Restructuring and outsourcing[edit]

HP Intria Items (Intria Corp): Formed by CIBC with Hewlett Packard and Fiserv Canada in 1996; In 2005, CIBC acquired the remaining shares from Fiserv and Intria became a unit of CIBC
EDULINX Canada Corporation: Established in 1999; sold to Nelnet Canada Inc., the Canadian unit of Nelnet, Inc., in late 2004
Toronto Blue Jays Baseball Club: Granted a franchise for the MLB team in 1977 with partner Labatt's Breweries; sold its 10% stake to Rogers Media in 2000
CIBC Leadership Centre: Sold the King City, Ontario facility to Benchmark Hospitality in 2001 as the bank divested real estate or investments outside of its business strategies
TSYS: In 2002, signed a 10-year agreement with Total Systems Services Inc. of Columbus, Georgia to outsource credit card processing operations
Juniper Financial Corporation: The bank acquired the Wilmington, Delaware credit card issuer 2001 and sold to Barclays Bank in 2004[28]

Miscellaneous[edit]
Li Ka Shing, Hong Kong billionaire was the largest foreign shareholder in the bank for over two decades, but in early 2005 he sold his portion (est. C$1.2 billion) to establish a Canadian charity, the Li Ka Shing Foundation. CIBC was Mr. Li's choice for financing many of his Canadian ventures, like Husky Energy. Mr. Li had reportedly backed personal and commercial banking head Holger Kluge to succeed Al Flood as CEO of CIBC in 1999.
Corporate governance[edit]
CIBC is well known for its publicized battles of succession to the top position of President and CEO (formerly styled chairman and CEO until 2003 when the positions were separated). When Al Flood became CEO, one of his first acts was to fire his chief rival Paul Cantor. In 1999, the company saw a competition between Wood Gundy (now CIBC World Markets) chief John S. Hunkin and Personal/Commercial banking head Holger Kluge, with Kluge retiring after Hunkin became chairman. In February 2004, Hunkin forced his friend and heir-apparent, David Kassie, to resign as chairman and CEO of World Markets after several scandals in the US. Both men had waived their bonuses in 2002 after that year produced the worst results in the history of the bank. Kassie afterwards founded Genuity Capital and was alleged to have raided 20 key employees from World Markets for his new startup, causing CIBC to file suit.[29] Gerald T. McCaughey became Kassie's replacement heading World Markets and in February 2004, was promoted to President and chief operating officer, assuring his succession as CEO.[30] Shortly after assuming his position, McCaughey reportedly dismissed Jill Denham, Vice Chair of Retail Markets and a potential rival for the CEO post. Denham was reportedly a close ally of Hunkin and Kassie and McCaughey wanted to build his own senior executive team.[31]
Current senior executive team:

Victor Dodig - President and CEO
Mike Capatides - Chief Administrative Officer and General Counsel, Administration Division
Steve Geist - Senior Executive Vice-President and Group Head, Wealth Management
Kevin Glass - Senior Executive-Vice President, and chief financial officer
Laura Dottori-Attanasio - Senior Executive Vice-President and Chief Risk Officer, Risk Management
Harry Culham - Senior Executive Vice-President and Group Head, Capital Markets
Kevin Patterson - Senior Executive Vice-President, Technology and Operations
David Williamson - Senior Executive Vice-President, and Group Head, Retail and Business Banking

Current members of the board of directors:[32]

Brent S. Belzberg (2005); Senior Managing Partner, Torquest Partners Inc.
Gary F. Colter (2003); President, CRS Inc.
Patrick D. Daniel (2009); Past President and Chief Executive Officer, Enbridge Inc.
Luc Desjardins (2009); President and Chief Executive Officer, Superior Plus Corp.
Hon. Gordon D. Giffin (2001); Senior Partner, McKenna Long & Aldridge LLP
Linda S. Hasenfratz (2004); Chief Executive Officer, Linamar Corporation
Kevin J. Kelly (2013); Corporate Director
Nicholas D. Le Pan (2008); Corporate Director
Hon. John P. Manley, P.C., O.C. (2005); Chair of the Board
Victor G. Dodig (2014); President and Chief Executive Officer, CIBC
Jane L. Peverett (2009); Corporate Director
Katharine B. Stevenson (2011); Corporate Director
Martine Turcotte (2014); Vice Chair, Quebec, BCE Inc. and Bell Canada
Ronald W. Tysoe (2004); Corporate Director
Barry Zubrow (2015); President, ITB LLC

Sponsorships[edit]
As a founding partner of the Toronto Blue Jays baseball club, CIBC was the team's official bank until selling its ownership stake in 2000.[33]
CIBC partnered with Air Canada in 1991 to offer credit cards as part of the airline's loyalty program, Aeroplan. In 2009, the program announced that a new agreement with Toronto-Dominion Bank would be effective January 1, 2014.[34]
As part of its purchase of MasterCard from Citibank Canada in 2010, CIBC acquired the co-branded Petro-Canada rewards credit card and continues to jointly market the card.[21]
On October 27, 2011, CIBC announced a partnership with the PANAM Toronto 2015 Organizing Committee to become lead partner of the 2015 Pan American Games and 2015 Parapan American Games[35]
CIBC is an industry partner of the University of Waterloo Stratford Campus.[36]
Credit agency ratings[edit]
On October 26, 2012, rating agency Moody's Investors Service announced it would review the long-term ratings of CIBC along with other Canadian banks, because of concerns about consumer debt levels, housing prices, a sizable exposure to capital markets and more. The review resulted in a downgrade from Aa2 to Aa3 on January 28, 2013.[37]
Settlements and controversies[edit]



This section needs expansion. You can help by adding to it. (August 2010)


Enron[edit]
On December 22, 2003, the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) fined CIBC US$80 million for its role in the manipulation of Enron financial statements. This consists of $37.5 million to repay ill-gotten gains, a $37.5 million penalty and $5 million in interest. The money is intended to be returned to Enron fraud victims pursuant to the Fair Fund provisions of Section 308(a) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.[38]
The SEC also sued three of CIBC's executives. CIBC Executive Vice President Daniel Ferguson and former CIBC Executive Director Mark Wolf agreed to settle for US$563,000 and US$60,000, respectively. Ian Schottlaender, former managing director in CIBC's corporate leveraged finance group in New York initially contested the charges[39] but on July 12, 2004 he agreed to pay US$528,750 as well as be barred from serving as an officer or director of a publicly traded company for a period of five years.[40] Under these agreements the individuals neither admit nor deny wrongdoing.
The SEC complaint charges that "CIBC and the three executives with having helped Enron to mislead its investors through a series of complex structured finance transactions over a period of several years preceding Enron's bankruptcy." The agreement reached between the SEC and CIBC permanently enjoins CIBC from violating the antifraud, books and records, and internal control provisions of the federal securities laws.[38][39]
On August 2, 2005, CIBC paid US$2.4 billion to settle a class action lawsuit brought by a group of pension funds and investment managers, including the University of California, which claims that "systematic fraud by Enron and its officers led to the loss of billions and the collapse of the company."[41]
Market timing[edit]
On July 25, 2005 CIBC confirmed it would pay US$125 million to settle an investigation into its role in the 2003 Mutual-fund scandal. Linda Chatman Thomsen, director of the SEC's division of enforcement, said, "by knowingly financing customers' late trading and market timing, as well as providing financing in amounts far greater than the law allows, CIHI and World Markets boosted their customers' trading profits at the expense of long-term mutual fund shareholders."[42] Under the settlement, CIBC neither admitted nor denied the allegations.[43]
Visa cardholders[edit]
On August 27, 2004, CIBC confirmed that it would settle a class-action lawsuit on behalf of CIBC Visa cardholders. The plaintiffs alleged that the conversion of foreign-currency transactions resulted in an undisclosed or inadequately disclosed mark-up. After approval by an Ontario Superior Court judge, CIBC announced October 15, 2004, that the settlement would result in the bank paying C$13.85 million to its cardholders, $1 million to the United Way, $1.65 million to the Class Action Fund of the Law Society of Upper Canada, and $3 million in legal fees. The bank also announced that it has not admitted any liability and is settling to avoid further litigation with its cardholders.[44]
Voluntary refund of erroneous charges[edit]
On May 20, 2004, CIBC announced that it would refund C$24 million to some of its customers as a result of erroneous overdraft and mortgage charges which were discovered in the course of an internal review. "This is being done as part of CIBC's effort to correct its error and to ensure that it distributes to customers all of the money it received in error," the bank said.[45]
In a similar incident, CIBC announced April 27, 2006 that it's refunding an additional C$27 million to about 200,000 clients who were overcharged for certain overdraft fees and other borrowing transactions, some of which date back to 1993. In cases where clients were undercharged, the bank decided not to seek reimbursement.[46]
Privacy[edit]
2005[edit]
On April 18, 2005 the Privacy Commissioner of Canada expressed disappointment in the way CIBC dealt with incidents involving the bank misdirecting faxes containing customers' personal information.[47] One involved misdirecting faxes to a scrap yard operator in West Virginia from 2001 to 2004. The misdirected faxes contained the social security numbers, home addresses, phone numbers, and detailed bank account data of several hundred bank customers.[48]
The second incident involved a Dorval businessman and allegedly took place from 2000 to 2004. In both cases, the commissioner noted that the bank did not inform the affected clients, whose personal information was compromised, until the incidents became public and an investigation was underway.[49]
Within days of reports by CTV News and The Globe and Mail, CIBC management announced a directive that banned employees from using fax machines to transmit any documents containing confidential customer information.[50]
2007[edit]
On January 18, 2007, CIBC Asset Management announced that the personal information of about 470,000 current and former clients of Talvest Mutual Funds, a CIBC subsidiary, had gone missing. The information may have included client names, addresses, signatures, dates of birth, bank account numbers, beneficiary information and/or Social Insurance Numbers.[51] The incident stemmed from the disappearance of a hard drive containing information on "the process used to open and administer" customer accounts as it was traveling between the bank's Montreal and Toronto offices.[52] The Privacy Commissioner of Canada stated, "Although I appreciate that the bank notified us of this incident and that it is working cooperatively with my Office, I am nevertheless deeply troubled, especially given the magnitude of this breach, which puts at risk the personal information of hundreds of thousands of Canadians." She immediately launched a privacy investigation.[53]
Employee overtime[edit]
In June 2007, Dara Fresco, a Toronto teller, named CIBC in a $600 million class-action lawsuit regarding the lack of overtime pay to its customer service staff. Fresco v. Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce is a class action brought on behalf of current and former non-management, non-unionized employees of CIBC in Canada who are or were tellers or other front-line customer service employees working at CIBC retail branch office across Canada. The lawsuit alleges that class members are assigned heavier workloads than could be completed within their standard working hours. They were required or permitted to work overtime to meet the demands of their jobs and CIBC failed to pay for the overtime work in direct contravention of the Canada Labour Code under which they are regulated.[54]
The Ontario Superior Court dismissed the suit June 18, 2012, stating the evidence '"provides no basis in fact that there is a systemic practice of unpaid overtime at CIBC."'[55]
An employee of the Bank of Nova Scotia (Scotiabank) filed a similar suit which the Superior Court certified. Fresco and Scotiabank each appealed their adverse, and contradictory, rulings and the Ontario Court of Appeal ruled that both cases could proceed.[56]
Both banks appealed to the Supreme Court of Canada which on March 21, 2013, denied their requests and allowed the lawsuits to proceed.[57] The cases are awaiting further action as of late 2013.
Significant buildings[edit]

Commerce Court, Toronto
2 Bloor Street West, Toronto
CIBC 750 Lawrence, Toronto
Bell Trinity Square, Toronto
Brookfield Place, Toronto
Tour CIBC, Montreal
Bankers Hall East, Calgary
Commerce Place, Hamilton
Atrium on Bay

Gallery[edit]







Atrium on Bay in Toronto









Commerce Court in Toronto









CIBC Tower in Downtown Montreal









CIBC on Sparks Street in Downtown Ottawa









CIBC FirstCaribbean's regional head office, Warrens, St. Michael, Barbados









CIBC building in Halifax









750 Lawrence, Toronto









CIBC in Montreal









Commerce Place, Hamilton









Two Bloor West, Toronto









Toronto financial district




See also[edit]


Companies portal



CIBC Wealth Management

References[edit]


^ "A Short History of CIBC" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ Sawyer, Deborah C. "Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce". Thecanadianencyclopedia.com. Retrieved 2011-03-09. [dead link]
^ "Forbes Global 2000 List, 2013 edition". Forbes. Forbes.com. 17 April 2013. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Bloomberg Names CIBC Third Strongest Bank in The World". Today. Sint Maarten. 5 July 2012. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "History: Logos & Seals". CIBC. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Truell, Peter (19 July 1997). "Canadian Bank Is Expected to Buy Oppenheimer". The New York Times. NYTimes.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Pound, Richard W., ed. (2005). The Fitzhenry & Whiteside Book of Canadian Facts and Dates. Fitzhenry and Whiteside. ISBN 978-155041171-3. 
^ Ball, James (27 May 2013). "US tax inspector targets Caribbean bank". The Guardian. Manchester. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ a b "FirstCaribbean to be branded as 'CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank'". The Barbados Advocate. 21 June 2006. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Newman, James (13 February 2009). "Paper: CIBC to go after Republic Bank stake". BNamericas. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Rampersad, Curtis (7 February 2011). "Eyes on Republic". Trinidad and Tobago Express. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC continues market leadership by introducing further innovations to Mobile Banking for BlackBerry devices and other Internet-enabled smartphones" (Press release). CIBC. 25 February 2011. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Connors, John (13 April 2010). "CIBC iPhone app sees over 100,000 downloads in first month...expanded to other smartphones". Mobilesyrup.com. Retrieved 2011-03-09. 
^ a b "CIBC buys card portfolio from Citigroup MasterCard business". Toronto Star. thestar.com. The Canadian Press. 14 March 2010. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Trichur, Rita; Flavelle, Dana (18 October 2010). "CIBC rolls out Canada's first Visa-branded debit card". Toronto Star. thestar.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Alexander, Doug (11 April 2013). "CIBC Agrees to Buy Atlantic Trust for $210 Million". Bloomberg News. bloomberg.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Berman, David (June 29, 2016). "CIBC grows U.S. business with $3.8-billion deal for PrivateBancorp". The Globe and Mail. Retrieved July 5, 2016. 
^ BRADSHAW, CHRISTINA PELLEGRINI And JAMES (2017-04-12). "CIBC to move 15,000 staff to new downtown Toronto headquarters". Retrieved 2017-07-20. 
^ https://www.theprivatebank.com/about-the-privatebank/
^ Perkins, Tara (2 March 2010). "CIBC buys stake in Bermuda's Butterfield". The Globe and Mail. Toronto: Theglobeandmail.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC completes sale of ownership in Juniper Financial". Investment Executive. 1 December 2004. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Willis, Andrew (8 January 2005). "CIBC puts ethics on the line". The Globe & Mail. globeadvisor.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Gerald T. McCaughey, President and Chief Executive Officer, CIBC". CIBC. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Canadian Imperial's No.3 Executive Jill Denham Leaves". Bloomberg News. bloomberg.com. 11 April 2005. Retrieved 2013-11-21. [dead link]
^ "Board Members". CIBC. 
^ "1988 Toronto Blue Jays Baseball Pocket Schedule CIBC". eBay. 6 May 2013. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Alexander, Doug (27 June 2013). "Aimia Soars as TD Signs Aeroplan Card Agreement: Montreal Mover". Bloomberg News. bloomberg.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Schecter, Barbara (27 October 2011). "CIBC lead sponsor of Pan Am Games in 2015". Financial Post. financialpost.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Industry Partnerships". University of Waterloo. Retrieved 24 April 2014. 
^ "Moody's downgrades Canadian banks" (Press release). Moody's Investors Service. 28 January 2013. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ a b "SEC Announces Agreement with Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce and Two Executives to Settle Charges of Aiding and Abetting Enron Accounting Fraud". SEC.gov. 22 December 2003. Retrieved 2011-03-09. 
^ a b "CIBC pays $80m to settle Enron". CNN World Business. CNN.com. Reuters. 21 December 2003. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Securities and Exchange Commission v. Ian Schottlaender, U.S. H-03-5785 (Southern District of Texas 13 July 2004).
^ Bailey, Jeff (3 August 2005). "CIBC Pays to settle Enron Case". The New York Times. NYTimes.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Settled Administrative Proceeding Against Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce Subsidiaries" (Press release). SEC.gov. 20 July 2005. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Goldstein, Matthew (2 July 2005). "How CIBC Cashed in on Mutual Fund Fraud". TheStreet.com CBC News]. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC settles lawsuit over Visa foreign currency charges". CBC News. cbc.ca. 27 August 2004. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC overcharged customers $24M". CBC News. cbc.ca. 21 May 2004. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC to refund $27M to clients who were overcharged". CBC News. cbc.ca. 27 April 2006. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Failure of CIBC's privacy practices a wake-up call to businesses" (Press release). Privacy Commissioner of Canada. 18 April 2005. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Arin, David (26 November 2004). "CIBC faxes go to scrapyard". The Globe and Mail. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Addendum to CIBC fax incident summary" (Press release). Privacy Commissioner of Canada. 18 April 2005. Retrieved 2013-11-21. [dead link]
^ Fraser, David (26 November 2004). "Bank responds to incident by prohibiting faxing of customer information". Canadian Privacy Blog. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC loses data on 470,000 Talvest fund customers". CBC News. cbc.ca. 18 January 2007. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Pasternak, Sean B.; Alexander, Doug (18 January 2007). "CIBC's Talvest Mutual Funds Loses Client Data File". Bloomberg News. Bloomberg.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. [dead link]
^ "Privacy Commissioner launches investigation of CIBC breach of Talvest customers' personal information". Privacy Commissioner of Canada. 18 January 2007. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Cohen, Tobi (5 June 2007). "CIBC faces overtime lawsuit". Toronto Star. Thestar.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ McNish, Jacquie; Perkins, Tara (19 July 2009). "CIBC overtime lawsuit dismissed". The Globe and Mail. theglobeandmail.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Hasham, Alyshah (26 June 2012). "Lawsuits over denied overtime pay against CIBC, Scotiabank to go ahead". Toronto Star. thestar.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC, Scotiabank Overtime Lawsuit Gets OK From Supreme Court". The Huffington Post. The Canadian Press. 21 March 2013. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 



Biography


Victor Ross A History of the Canadian Bank of Commerce. (1920–1934)
Rupert Canadian Investment Bank Review. McGraw-Hill Ryerson, Limited 1992

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to CIBC.



Official Website







v
t
e


Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce






Chief Executive Officer: Victor G. Dodig








Fiscal year 2016 statistics
Net income: $4.3 billion CAD[1]
Market capitalization: $39.9 billion CAD[2]
Assets: $501.4 billion CAD[3]
Employees: 43,213 (FTE, 2016)[4]
Stock symbols: TSX: CM NYSE: CM
Website: www.cibc.com












Major brands by financial service








Master: CIBC
Financial group: CIBC
Canadian banking: CIBC
Caribbean banking: CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank
International banking: CIBC Private Wealth Management
Canadian mutual funds: CIBC Mutual Funds
Canadian brokerage: CIBC Investor's Edge and CIBC Wood Gundy
Canadian insurance: CIBC Insurance
Capital markets: CIBC World Markets
Custodial: CIBC Mellon















v
t
e


Banks and credit unions in Canada








Banks








Big Five




Bank of Montreal
Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce (President's Choice Financial)
Royal Bank of Canada
Scotiabank (Tangerine)
Toronto-Dominion Bank (TD Canada Trust)






Other banks




AMEX Bank of Canada
Bridgewater Bank
Business Development Bank of Canada
Canadian Tire Financial Services
Canadian Western Bank
Citibank Canada
Equitable Bank
Exchange Bank of Canada
First Nations Bank of Canada
HSBC Bank Canada
ICICI Bank Canada
Laurentian Bank of Canada
Manulife Bank of Canada
Meridian Bank
National Bank of Canada
Rogers Bank
Vancity Community Investment Bank
VersaBank
Wealth One Bank of Canada
















Credit unions








Credit unions




Affinity Credit Union
Aldergrove Credit Union
Alterna Savings
Assiniboine Credit Union
BlueShore Financial
Central 1 Credit Union
Coast Capital Savings
Concentra Financial
Conexus Credit Union
Credit Union Central of Canada
Desjardins Group
Envision Financial
First Calgary Financial
First West Credit Union
Gulf and Fraser Fishermen's Credit Union
Island Savings
Kawartha Credit Union
Kootenay Savings Credit Union
Libro Financial Group
Meridian Credit Union
Mouvement des caisses populaires acadiennes
Servus Credit Union
Steinbach Credit Union
TCU Financial Group
Vancity
Windsor Family Credit Union
Your Credit Union
Your Neighbourhood Credit Union






Credit union deposit insurance


Alberta * British Columbia * Manitoba * New Brunswick * Newfoundland and Labrador * Nova Scotia * Ontario * Prince Edward Island * Saskatchewan














Other financial institutions








Federal financial institutions


Farm Credit Canada




Provincial financial institutions




ATB Financial


















v
t
e


S&P/TSX 60 companies of Canada (February 22, 2016)






Agnico Eagle Mines
Agrium
ARC Resources
Bank of Montreal
Barrick Gold
BCE Inc.
BlackBerry
Bombardier
Brookfield Asset Management
Cameco
Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce
Canadian National
Canadian Natural Resources
Canadian Pacific
Canadian Tire
CCL Industries
Cenovus Energy
CGI Group
Constellation Software
Couche-Tard
Crescent Point Energy
Dollarama
Emera
Enbridge
Encana
First Quantum Minerals
Franco-Nevada
Fortis Inc.
Gildan
Goldcorp
Husky Energy
Imperial Oil
Inter Pipeline
Kinross Gold
Loblaw Companies
Magna International
Manulife Financial
Metro
National Bank of Canada
Pembina Pipeline
PotashCorp
Power Corporation
Restaurant Brands International
Rogers Communications
Royal Bank of Canada
Saputo
Scotiabank
Shaw Communications
Silver Wheaton
SNC-Lavalin
Sun Life Financial
Suncor Energy
Teck
Telus
Thomson Reuters
Toronto-Dominion Bank
TransCanada
Valeant
Weston
Waste Connections












v
t
e


Great Recession



By region



Africa
Americas

United States
South America


Asia
Europe
Oceania





United States-specific



Automotive industry crisis
California budget crisis
Housing bubble
Housing market correction
Subprime mortgage crisis





Banking losses and fraud



Anglo Irish Bank hidden loans controversy
Libor scandal

Tom Hayes


Société Générale trading loss
Forex scandal
Seán FitzPatrick
Bernard Madoff
Tom Petters
Scott W. Rothstein
Allen Stanford





Government entities



Consumer Financial Protection Bureau
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
Federal Home Loan Banks
Federal Housing Administration
Federal Housing Finance Agency
Federal Housing Finance Board
Federal Reserve System
Government National Mortgage Association
Irish Bank Resolution Corporation
National Asset Management Agency
Office of Federal Housing Enterprise Oversight
Office of Financial Stability
UK Financial Investments










Government policy and spending responses



Banking and finance
stability and reform



Anglo Irish Bank Corporation Act 2009
Banking (Special Provisions) Act 2008
China–Japan–South Korea trilateral summit
Commercial Paper Funding Facility
Dodd–Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act
Emergency Economic Stabilization Act of 2008
Irish emergency budget, 2009
Irish budget, 2010
Irish budget, 2011
Irish budget, 2012
Irish budget, 2013
Temporary Liquidity Guarantee Program
Term Asset-Backed Securities Loan Facility
Troubled Asset Relief Program
2008 United Kingdom bank rescue package




Bank stress tests



EU
U.S.








Stimulus and recovery



2008 European Union stimulus plan
2008–09 Keynesian resurgence
American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009
Chinese economic stimulus program
Economic Stimulus Act of 2008
Fraud Enforcement and Recovery Act of 2009
Green New Deal
Housing and Economic Recovery Act of 2008
National fiscal policy response to the Great Recession
Zero interest-rate policy





Government interventions,
rescues, and acquisitions



List of banks acquired or bankrupted during the Great Recession




Non-banking



Chrysler
General Motors











Securities involved
and financial markets



Auction rate securities
Collateralized debt obligations
Collateralized mortgage obligations
Credit default swaps
Mortgage-backed securities
Secondary mortgage market





Social responses



Tea Party protests (United States; c. 2009)
May Day protests (Europe, Middle East and North Africa, Asia; 2009)
Occupy movement (worldwide)





Related topics



2000s energy crisis

Central Asia: 2008


Effects on museums
Decline of newspapers
World food price crisis








European debt crisis
Financial crisis of 2007–08
List of countries by public debt







^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Canadian_Imperial_Bank_of_Commerce&oldid=791515423"					
Categories: S&P/TSX 60 IndexS&P/TSX Composite IndexCanadian Imperial Bank of CommerceCompanies listed on the Toronto Stock ExchangeCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeCompanies based in TorontoBanks of CanadaBanks established in 1961Mortgage lenders of Canada1961 establishments in OntarioHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from June 2017Pages using deprecated image syntaxArticles containing French-language textArticles to be expanded from August 2010All articles to be expandedArticles using small message boxes 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


DeutschفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa Indonesia日本語PortuguêsРусскийSuomiதமிழ்中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 20 July 2017, at 19:45.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce - Wikipedia






















 






Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from CIBC)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

"CIBC" redirects here. For other uses, see CIBC (disambiguation).

Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce





Type

Public


Traded as
TSX: CM
NYSE: CM
S&P/TSX 60 component


Industry
Financial Services, banking


Founded
1961
(Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce)
1875
(Imperial Bank of Canada)
1867
(Canadian Bank of Commerce)[1]


Headquarters
Commerce Court
Toronto, Ontario, Canada



Key people


Victor G. Dodig, President and CEO[2]
John Manley, Chair of the Board[3]


Revenue
 C$15.0 billion (2016)[4]



Net income

 C$4.3 billion (2016)[5]


Total assets
 C$501.357 billion (2016)[6]



Number of employees

43,213 (FTE, 2016)[7]


Subsidiaries
CIBC Holdings (Cayman) Limited
CIBC World Markets
CIBC Trust Corporation
CIBC Asset Management Inc.[8]


Website
www.cibc.com


The Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce (French: Banque Canadienne Impériale de Commerce), commonly referred to as CIBC, is one of the Big Five banks in Canada. The bank is headquartered at Commerce Court in Toronto, Ontario.[9] CIBC's Institution Number (or bank number) is 010, and its SWIFT code is CIBCCATT.
The bank has three strategic business units: Retail and Business Banking, Wealth Management, and Capital Markets. It has international operations in the United States, the Caribbean, Asia, and Europe. Globally, CIBC serves more than eleven million clients, and has over 40,000 employees. The company ranks at number 172 on the Forbes Global 2000 listing.[10] CIBC was named the strongest bank in North America and the 3rd strongest bank in the world, by Bloomberg Markets magazine.[11]



Contents


1 History

1.1 Origins
1.2 Forming Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce
1.3 Present


2 Notable corporate activities and international operations

2.1 North America
2.2 Caribbean and the West Indies
2.3 Restructuring and outsourcing
2.4 Miscellaneous


3 Corporate governance
4 Sponsorships
5 Credit agency ratings
6 Settlements and controversies

6.1 Enron
6.2 Market timing
6.3 Visa cardholders
6.4 Voluntary refund of erroneous charges
6.5 Privacy

6.5.1 2005
6.5.2 2007


6.6 Employee overtime


7 Significant buildings

7.1 Gallery


8 See also
9 References
10 External links



History[edit]
The Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce, as it is known today, came into being in 1961. The bank was formed through the merger of the Canadian Bank of Commerce and the Imperial Bank of Canada. At the time, they were two of Canada's largest banks.
Origins[edit]




Commerce Building (c. 1930), now known as Commerce Court North in Toronto


Main articles: Canadian Bank of Commerce and Imperial Bank of Canada
The Honourable William McMaster founded the Canadian Bank of Commerce which opened on May 15, 1867, in Toronto as competition for the Bank of Montreal; by 1874 it had 24 branches.
The Imperial Bank of Canada opened in Toronto on March 18, 1875, founded by former Commerce Vice-president Henry Stark Howland.
By the end of 1895, the Canadian Bank of Commerce had grown to 58 branches and the Imperial Bank of Canada to 18.
The 1896 gold strike in the Yukon prompted the Dominion Government to ask the Canadian Bank of Commerce to open a branch in Dawson City. Acquisitions in the 1920s caused the Commerce Bank to become one of the strongest branch networks in Canada with over 700 local branches; and the bank opened international branches in Cuba, Jamaica, Barbados and Trinidad during the same period.
Wood, Gundy & Company, the precursor of CIBC's investment banking arm, opened its doors on February 1, 1905. During World War I, it took a prominent and active role in the organization of Victory Loans.
The Canadian Bank of Commerce opened its new head office in Toronto in 1931. An observation gallery on the 32nd floor attracted visitors who could get an aerial view of the city.
In 1936, the Commerce was the first Canadian bank to establish a personal loans department.
Following World War II, both banks opened new branches. Although the banks had been barred from the mortgage business since 1871, the Canadian government now called upon them to provide mortgage services. So, in 1954, Canadian banks started offering mortgages for new construction.
Forming Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce[edit]
In 1960, Imperial chairman Stuart Mackersy approached Neil McKinnon the President of the Commerce with a proposal to merge the two banks. This followed a decade of expansion in the Canadian economy and Canada's capitalization of the industrialization of its natural resources. They quickly reached a deal between the two banks.




The newly merged CIBC commissioned a new logo to commemorate its 100th year of operation. The "chevron" logo was in use until 1994[12]


On June 1, 1961, the Canadian Bank of Commerce and the Imperial Bank of Canada merged to form the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce with over 1,200 branches across Canada. The new bank possessed the greatest resources and the most branches of any bank in the country.
Following the merger, the new bank commissioned a new head office. While planning to retain Commerce Court North, the bank hired architect I. M. Pei to design a three-building complex. The result was Commerce Court consisting of a landscaped courtyard complementing the existing building and included the newly built 786 feet (240 m) Commerce Court West. When completed in 1973, the 57-storey building was the tallest in Canada, and the largest stainless-steel-clad building in the world.
In 1967, both Canada and CIBC celebrated their centenaries and CIBC was the only chartered bank to have a branch on-site at Expo 67. Also at this time computerization began to change banking services and the Yonge and Bloor branch in Toronto was the first Canadian bank branch to update customer bank books via computer. This also marked the introduction of inter-branch banking. Before the decade was out, CIBC had introduced the first 24-hour cash dispenser, which would eventually become the ATM.
Changes to federal and provincial regulations ending the separation of banks, investment dealers, trust companies and insurance companies came in 1987. CIBC quickly took advantage of this and became the first Canadian bank to operate an investment dealer, CIBC Securities, offering services to the public.
In 1988, CIBC acquired a majority interest in Wood Gundy which brought a well-respected name and reputation in underwriting. Shortly thereafter, the corporation merged Wood Gundy and CIBC Securities under the name CIBC Wood Gundy which became CIBC Oppenheimer in 1997[13] and later, CIBC World Markets.
In 1992, CIBC introduced automated telephone banking; in 1995 the bank launched its website, and shortly thereafter began offering banking services online. In 1998, CIBC joined with Loblaws to create President's Choice Financial which it launched in 28 Ottawa area stores.
Present[edit]
CIBC agreed to merge with the Toronto-Dominion Bank in 1998. However the Government of Canada, at the recommendation of then Finance Minister Paul Martin, blocked the merger – as well as another proposed by the Bank of Montreal with the Royal Bank of Canada – as not in the best interest of Canadians.[14]
CIBC sold its corporate and purchasing credit card business to U.S. Bank Canada in October 2006 which joined it with business charge cards it previously acquired from Royal Bank of Canada.
In 2006, the stock ticker symbol on the New York Stock Exchange changed from BCM to CM to bring it in line with the ticker symbol on the Toronto Stock Exchange.
In December 2006, CIBC acquired majority control of its publicly held joint venture FirstCaribbean International Bank for just over US$1 billion, (Bds$2 billion), when it purchased the 43.7% stake owned by Barclays Bank.[15] CIBC rebranded the division CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank in 2011.[16]
On February 12, 2009, the Trinidad and Tobago Express reported that CIBC was pursuing discussions to buy CL Financial's stake in the Republic Bank of Trinidad and Tobago.[17] As part of a "bail out" agreement of CL Financial by the government of Trinidad and Tobago during the Global financial crisis of 2008–2009, the corporation was required to sell Republic and other assets. As of February 2011, CL Financial had yet to agree to a sale.[18]
In February, 2010 CIBC became the first chartered bank in Canada to launch a mobile banking iPhone App. It surpassed 100,000 downloads in just over one month following launch, with over 1 million client logins to CIBC Mobile Banking since its introduction.[19][20]
Four months later, the bank announced it signed a deal to buy a C$2.1-billion credit card portfolio from Citigroup's Citibank Canada MasterCard business.[21]
Finally in October of that year, CIBC announced that it would be the first bank in Canada to introduce the internationally used Visa-branded debit card.[22]
In April 2013, CIBC reached an agreement with Invesco to acquire Atlantic Trust, the company's wealth management unit for US$210 million.[23]
CIBC announced in June 2016 that it would acquire the Chicago-based commercial bank PrivateBancorp for US$3.8 billion.[24]
In April 2017, it was announced that CIBC would be moving its headquarters to CIBC Square.[25]
Notable corporate activities and international operations[edit]
North America[edit]

CIBC Mellon Global Securities Services: formed by CIBC and Mellon Bank Corp. (now Bank of New York Mellon) of Pittsburgh PA 1996 and Canada Trust's (now TD Canada Trust) pension and custody business in 1997
Canadian Eastern Finance Limited (CEF): formed by CIBC and Hutchison Whampoa of Hong Kong; includes CEF Capital Limited, CEF Investment Management Limited
President's Choice Financial: A joint venture between CIBC and Loblaw Companies Limited; Banking services such as deposit accounts, investments and credit products (excluding MasterCard) are provided by a division of CIBC Retail Markets, formerly Amicus Bank. In 2005 Amicus was dissolved as a separate legal entity.
Amicus FSB: A similar setup as President's Choice Financial, it was created in 1999 in the United States with Winn Dixie and Safeway Inc. under the Marketplace Bank and Safeway Select Bank brands. It was disbanded in 2002 and sold to E*Trade Bank.
Soltrus Inc 2001: provider of digital trust services for businesses and consumers to communicate and transact over digital networks owned by CIBC, Telus Corp and VeriSign Inc.
Aplettix Inc 2000: firm specializing in secure transaction systems in the banking sector; CIBC signed an agreement with the New York-based firm in 2000, but the project was later abandoned for alternatives such as VeriSign.


Privatebancorp 2017: A Chicago based bank founded in 1989 in Delaware with operations in 13 states mainly in the East Coast. Business focus is in middle market commercial banking, personal and small business banking, as well as private banking and investment management services.[26]

Caribbean and the West Indies[edit]
Main article: CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank




CIBC FirstCaribbean branch in Bridgetown, Barbados


In 1920, Canadian Bank of Commerce established its first branches in the West Indies in Bridgetown, Barbados and in Kingston, Jamaica. That same year it also opened branches in Port of Spain, Trinidad and Havana, Cuba. Its first branch in Mexico City opened in 1910. In 1957, the bank opened a branch in Nassau, the Bahamas, and in the subsequent years expanded its operations in Jamaica.
Between 1963 and 1988, the bank expanded its branch network in Barbados opened branches in St. Vincent, Antigua, and St Lucia. In 1988, CIBC sold 45% of its shares in CIBC Jamaica via a public share issue. Between 1993 and 1996, the bank restructured its holdings in the Caribbean, with the incorporation of CIBC West Indies Holdings Limited and CIBC Caribbean Limited. CIBC West Indies Holdings then sold 30% of its shares to the public. In 1997, CIBC issued 5 million shares in CIBC Bahamas Limited to the public.
On October 31, 2001, Barclays and CIBC agreed to combine their Caribbean operations to establish FirstCaribbean International Bank. CIBC bought Barclays' stake in 2006 to give it control of approximately 92% of FirstCaribbean, which was rebranded as CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank.[16] In 2010, CIBC acquired a 22.5% equity of Butterfield Bank of Bermuda.[27]
Restructuring and outsourcing[edit]

HP Intria Items (Intria Corp): Formed by CIBC with Hewlett Packard and Fiserv Canada in 1996; In 2005, CIBC acquired the remaining shares from Fiserv and Intria became a unit of CIBC
EDULINX Canada Corporation: Established in 1999; sold to Nelnet Canada Inc., the Canadian unit of Nelnet, Inc., in late 2004
Toronto Blue Jays Baseball Club: Granted a franchise for the MLB team in 1977 with partner Labatt's Breweries; sold its 10% stake to Rogers Media in 2000
CIBC Leadership Centre: Sold the King City, Ontario facility to Benchmark Hospitality in 2001 as the bank divested real estate or investments outside of its business strategies
TSYS: In 2002, signed a 10-year agreement with Total Systems Services Inc. of Columbus, Georgia to outsource credit card processing operations
Juniper Financial Corporation: The bank acquired the Wilmington, Delaware credit card issuer 2001 and sold to Barclays Bank in 2004[28]

Miscellaneous[edit]
Li Ka Shing, Hong Kong billionaire was the largest foreign shareholder in the bank for over two decades, but in early 2005 he sold his portion (est. C$1.2 billion) to establish a Canadian charity, the Li Ka Shing Foundation. CIBC was Mr. Li's choice for financing many of his Canadian ventures, like Husky Energy. Mr. Li had reportedly backed personal and commercial banking head Holger Kluge to succeed Al Flood as CEO of CIBC in 1999.
Corporate governance[edit]
CIBC is well known for its publicized battles of succession to the top position of President and CEO (formerly styled chairman and CEO until 2003 when the positions were separated). When Al Flood became CEO, one of his first acts was to fire his chief rival Paul Cantor. In 1999, the company saw a competition between Wood Gundy (now CIBC World Markets) chief John S. Hunkin and Personal/Commercial banking head Holger Kluge, with Kluge retiring after Hunkin became chairman. In February 2004, Hunkin forced his friend and heir-apparent, David Kassie, to resign as chairman and CEO of World Markets after several scandals in the US. Both men had waived their bonuses in 2002 after that year produced the worst results in the history of the bank. Kassie afterwards founded Genuity Capital and was alleged to have raided 20 key employees from World Markets for his new startup, causing CIBC to file suit.[29] Gerald T. McCaughey became Kassie's replacement heading World Markets and in February 2004, was promoted to President and chief operating officer, assuring his succession as CEO.[30] Shortly after assuming his position, McCaughey reportedly dismissed Jill Denham, Vice Chair of Retail Markets and a potential rival for the CEO post. Denham was reportedly a close ally of Hunkin and Kassie and McCaughey wanted to build his own senior executive team.[31]
Current senior executive team:

Victor Dodig - President and CEO
Mike Capatides - Chief Administrative Officer and General Counsel, Administration Division
Steve Geist - Senior Executive Vice-President and Group Head, Wealth Management
Kevin Glass - Senior Executive-Vice President, and chief financial officer
Laura Dottori-Attanasio - Senior Executive Vice-President and Chief Risk Officer, Risk Management
Harry Culham - Senior Executive Vice-President and Group Head, Capital Markets
Kevin Patterson - Senior Executive Vice-President, Technology and Operations
David Williamson - Senior Executive Vice-President, and Group Head, Retail and Business Banking

Current members of the board of directors:[32]

Brent S. Belzberg (2005); Senior Managing Partner, Torquest Partners Inc.
Gary F. Colter (2003); President, CRS Inc.
Patrick D. Daniel (2009); Past President and Chief Executive Officer, Enbridge Inc.
Luc Desjardins (2009); President and Chief Executive Officer, Superior Plus Corp.
Hon. Gordon D. Giffin (2001); Senior Partner, McKenna Long & Aldridge LLP
Linda S. Hasenfratz (2004); Chief Executive Officer, Linamar Corporation
Kevin J. Kelly (2013); Corporate Director
Nicholas D. Le Pan (2008); Corporate Director
Hon. John P. Manley, P.C., O.C. (2005); Chair of the Board
Victor G. Dodig (2014); President and Chief Executive Officer, CIBC
Jane L. Peverett (2009); Corporate Director
Katharine B. Stevenson (2011); Corporate Director
Martine Turcotte (2014); Vice Chair, Quebec, BCE Inc. and Bell Canada
Ronald W. Tysoe (2004); Corporate Director
Barry Zubrow (2015); President, ITB LLC

Sponsorships[edit]
As a founding partner of the Toronto Blue Jays baseball club, CIBC was the team's official bank until selling its ownership stake in 2000.[33]
CIBC partnered with Air Canada in 1991 to offer credit cards as part of the airline's loyalty program, Aeroplan. In 2009, the program announced that a new agreement with Toronto-Dominion Bank would be effective January 1, 2014.[34]
As part of its purchase of MasterCard from Citibank Canada in 2010, CIBC acquired the co-branded Petro-Canada rewards credit card and continues to jointly market the card.[21]
On October 27, 2011, CIBC announced a partnership with the PANAM Toronto 2015 Organizing Committee to become lead partner of the 2015 Pan American Games and 2015 Parapan American Games[35]
CIBC is an industry partner of the University of Waterloo Stratford Campus.[36]
Credit agency ratings[edit]
On October 26, 2012, rating agency Moody's Investors Service announced it would review the long-term ratings of CIBC along with other Canadian banks, because of concerns about consumer debt levels, housing prices, a sizable exposure to capital markets and more. The review resulted in a downgrade from Aa2 to Aa3 on January 28, 2013.[37]
Settlements and controversies[edit]



This section needs expansion. You can help by adding to it. (August 2010)


Enron[edit]
On December 22, 2003, the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) fined CIBC US$80 million for its role in the manipulation of Enron financial statements. This consists of $37.5 million to repay ill-gotten gains, a $37.5 million penalty and $5 million in interest. The money is intended to be returned to Enron fraud victims pursuant to the Fair Fund provisions of Section 308(a) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.[38]
The SEC also sued three of CIBC's executives. CIBC Executive Vice President Daniel Ferguson and former CIBC Executive Director Mark Wolf agreed to settle for US$563,000 and US$60,000, respectively. Ian Schottlaender, former managing director in CIBC's corporate leveraged finance group in New York initially contested the charges[39] but on July 12, 2004 he agreed to pay US$528,750 as well as be barred from serving as an officer or director of a publicly traded company for a period of five years.[40] Under these agreements the individuals neither admit nor deny wrongdoing.
The SEC complaint charges that "CIBC and the three executives with having helped Enron to mislead its investors through a series of complex structured finance transactions over a period of several years preceding Enron's bankruptcy." The agreement reached between the SEC and CIBC permanently enjoins CIBC from violating the antifraud, books and records, and internal control provisions of the federal securities laws.[38][39]
On August 2, 2005, CIBC paid US$2.4 billion to settle a class action lawsuit brought by a group of pension funds and investment managers, including the University of California, which claims that "systematic fraud by Enron and its officers led to the loss of billions and the collapse of the company."[41]
Market timing[edit]
On July 25, 2005 CIBC confirmed it would pay US$125 million to settle an investigation into its role in the 2003 Mutual-fund scandal. Linda Chatman Thomsen, director of the SEC's division of enforcement, said, "by knowingly financing customers' late trading and market timing, as well as providing financing in amounts far greater than the law allows, CIHI and World Markets boosted their customers' trading profits at the expense of long-term mutual fund shareholders."[42] Under the settlement, CIBC neither admitted nor denied the allegations.[43]
Visa cardholders[edit]
On August 27, 2004, CIBC confirmed that it would settle a class-action lawsuit on behalf of CIBC Visa cardholders. The plaintiffs alleged that the conversion of foreign-currency transactions resulted in an undisclosed or inadequately disclosed mark-up. After approval by an Ontario Superior Court judge, CIBC announced October 15, 2004, that the settlement would result in the bank paying C$13.85 million to its cardholders, $1 million to the United Way, $1.65 million to the Class Action Fund of the Law Society of Upper Canada, and $3 million in legal fees. The bank also announced that it has not admitted any liability and is settling to avoid further litigation with its cardholders.[44]
Voluntary refund of erroneous charges[edit]
On May 20, 2004, CIBC announced that it would refund C$24 million to some of its customers as a result of erroneous overdraft and mortgage charges which were discovered in the course of an internal review. "This is being done as part of CIBC's effort to correct its error and to ensure that it distributes to customers all of the money it received in error," the bank said.[45]
In a similar incident, CIBC announced April 27, 2006 that it's refunding an additional C$27 million to about 200,000 clients who were overcharged for certain overdraft fees and other borrowing transactions, some of which date back to 1993. In cases where clients were undercharged, the bank decided not to seek reimbursement.[46]
Privacy[edit]
2005[edit]
On April 18, 2005 the Privacy Commissioner of Canada expressed disappointment in the way CIBC dealt with incidents involving the bank misdirecting faxes containing customers' personal information.[47] One involved misdirecting faxes to a scrap yard operator in West Virginia from 2001 to 2004. The misdirected faxes contained the social security numbers, home addresses, phone numbers, and detailed bank account data of several hundred bank customers.[48]
The second incident involved a Dorval businessman and allegedly took place from 2000 to 2004. In both cases, the commissioner noted that the bank did not inform the affected clients, whose personal information was compromised, until the incidents became public and an investigation was underway.[49]
Within days of reports by CTV News and The Globe and Mail, CIBC management announced a directive that banned employees from using fax machines to transmit any documents containing confidential customer information.[50]
2007[edit]
On January 18, 2007, CIBC Asset Management announced that the personal information of about 470,000 current and former clients of Talvest Mutual Funds, a CIBC subsidiary, had gone missing. The information may have included client names, addresses, signatures, dates of birth, bank account numbers, beneficiary information and/or Social Insurance Numbers.[51] The incident stemmed from the disappearance of a hard drive containing information on "the process used to open and administer" customer accounts as it was traveling between the bank's Montreal and Toronto offices.[52] The Privacy Commissioner of Canada stated, "Although I appreciate that the bank notified us of this incident and that it is working cooperatively with my Office, I am nevertheless deeply troubled, especially given the magnitude of this breach, which puts at risk the personal information of hundreds of thousands of Canadians." She immediately launched a privacy investigation.[53]
Employee overtime[edit]
In June 2007, Dara Fresco, a Toronto teller, named CIBC in a $600 million class-action lawsuit regarding the lack of overtime pay to its customer service staff. Fresco v. Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce is a class action brought on behalf of current and former non-management, non-unionized employees of CIBC in Canada who are or were tellers or other front-line customer service employees working at CIBC retail branch office across Canada. The lawsuit alleges that class members are assigned heavier workloads than could be completed within their standard working hours. They were required or permitted to work overtime to meet the demands of their jobs and CIBC failed to pay for the overtime work in direct contravention of the Canada Labour Code under which they are regulated.[54]
The Ontario Superior Court dismissed the suit June 18, 2012, stating the evidence '"provides no basis in fact that there is a systemic practice of unpaid overtime at CIBC."'[55]
An employee of the Bank of Nova Scotia (Scotiabank) filed a similar suit which the Superior Court certified. Fresco and Scotiabank each appealed their adverse, and contradictory, rulings and the Ontario Court of Appeal ruled that both cases could proceed.[56]
Both banks appealed to the Supreme Court of Canada which on March 21, 2013, denied their requests and allowed the lawsuits to proceed.[57] The cases are awaiting further action as of late 2013.
Significant buildings[edit]

Commerce Court, Toronto
2 Bloor Street West, Toronto
CIBC 750 Lawrence, Toronto
Bell Trinity Square, Toronto
Brookfield Place, Toronto
Tour CIBC, Montreal
Bankers Hall East, Calgary
Commerce Place, Hamilton
Atrium on Bay

Gallery[edit]







Atrium on Bay in Toronto









Commerce Court in Toronto









CIBC Tower in Downtown Montreal









CIBC on Sparks Street in Downtown Ottawa









CIBC FirstCaribbean's regional head office, Warrens, St. Michael, Barbados









CIBC building in Halifax









750 Lawrence, Toronto









CIBC in Montreal









Commerce Place, Hamilton









Two Bloor West, Toronto









Toronto financial district




See also[edit]


Companies portal



CIBC Wealth Management

References[edit]


^ "A Short History of CIBC" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ Sawyer, Deborah C. "Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce". Thecanadianencyclopedia.com. Retrieved 2011-03-09. [dead link]
^ "Forbes Global 2000 List, 2013 edition". Forbes. Forbes.com. 17 April 2013. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Bloomberg Names CIBC Third Strongest Bank in The World". Today. Sint Maarten. 5 July 2012. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "History: Logos & Seals". CIBC. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Truell, Peter (19 July 1997). "Canadian Bank Is Expected to Buy Oppenheimer". The New York Times. NYTimes.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Pound, Richard W., ed. (2005). The Fitzhenry & Whiteside Book of Canadian Facts and Dates. Fitzhenry and Whiteside. ISBN 978-155041171-3. 
^ Ball, James (27 May 2013). "US tax inspector targets Caribbean bank". The Guardian. Manchester. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ a b "FirstCaribbean to be branded as 'CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank'". The Barbados Advocate. 21 June 2006. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Newman, James (13 February 2009). "Paper: CIBC to go after Republic Bank stake". BNamericas. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Rampersad, Curtis (7 February 2011). "Eyes on Republic". Trinidad and Tobago Express. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC continues market leadership by introducing further innovations to Mobile Banking for BlackBerry devices and other Internet-enabled smartphones" (Press release). CIBC. 25 February 2011. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Connors, John (13 April 2010). "CIBC iPhone app sees over 100,000 downloads in first month...expanded to other smartphones". Mobilesyrup.com. Retrieved 2011-03-09. 
^ a b "CIBC buys card portfolio from Citigroup MasterCard business". Toronto Star. thestar.com. The Canadian Press. 14 March 2010. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Trichur, Rita; Flavelle, Dana (18 October 2010). "CIBC rolls out Canada's first Visa-branded debit card". Toronto Star. thestar.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Alexander, Doug (11 April 2013). "CIBC Agrees to Buy Atlantic Trust for $210 Million". Bloomberg News. bloomberg.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Berman, David (June 29, 2016). "CIBC grows U.S. business with $3.8-billion deal for PrivateBancorp". The Globe and Mail. Retrieved July 5, 2016. 
^ BRADSHAW, CHRISTINA PELLEGRINI And JAMES (2017-04-12). "CIBC to move 15,000 staff to new downtown Toronto headquarters". Retrieved 2017-07-20. 
^ https://www.theprivatebank.com/about-the-privatebank/
^ Perkins, Tara (2 March 2010). "CIBC buys stake in Bermuda's Butterfield". The Globe and Mail. Toronto: Theglobeandmail.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC completes sale of ownership in Juniper Financial". Investment Executive. 1 December 2004. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Willis, Andrew (8 January 2005). "CIBC puts ethics on the line". The Globe & Mail. globeadvisor.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Gerald T. McCaughey, President and Chief Executive Officer, CIBC". CIBC. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Canadian Imperial's No.3 Executive Jill Denham Leaves". Bloomberg News. bloomberg.com. 11 April 2005. Retrieved 2013-11-21. [dead link]
^ "Board Members". CIBC. 
^ "1988 Toronto Blue Jays Baseball Pocket Schedule CIBC". eBay. 6 May 2013. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Alexander, Doug (27 June 2013). "Aimia Soars as TD Signs Aeroplan Card Agreement: Montreal Mover". Bloomberg News. bloomberg.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Schecter, Barbara (27 October 2011). "CIBC lead sponsor of Pan Am Games in 2015". Financial Post. financialpost.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Industry Partnerships". University of Waterloo. Retrieved 24 April 2014. 
^ "Moody's downgrades Canadian banks" (Press release). Moody's Investors Service. 28 January 2013. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ a b "SEC Announces Agreement with Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce and Two Executives to Settle Charges of Aiding and Abetting Enron Accounting Fraud". SEC.gov. 22 December 2003. Retrieved 2011-03-09. 
^ a b "CIBC pays $80m to settle Enron". CNN World Business. CNN.com. Reuters. 21 December 2003. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Securities and Exchange Commission v. Ian Schottlaender, U.S. H-03-5785 (Southern District of Texas 13 July 2004).
^ Bailey, Jeff (3 August 2005). "CIBC Pays to settle Enron Case". The New York Times. NYTimes.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Settled Administrative Proceeding Against Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce Subsidiaries" (Press release). SEC.gov. 20 July 2005. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Goldstein, Matthew (2 July 2005). "How CIBC Cashed in on Mutual Fund Fraud". TheStreet.com CBC News]. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC settles lawsuit over Visa foreign currency charges". CBC News. cbc.ca. 27 August 2004. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC overcharged customers $24M". CBC News. cbc.ca. 21 May 2004. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC to refund $27M to clients who were overcharged". CBC News. cbc.ca. 27 April 2006. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Failure of CIBC's privacy practices a wake-up call to businesses" (Press release). Privacy Commissioner of Canada. 18 April 2005. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Arin, David (26 November 2004). "CIBC faxes go to scrapyard". The Globe and Mail. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Addendum to CIBC fax incident summary" (Press release). Privacy Commissioner of Canada. 18 April 2005. Retrieved 2013-11-21. [dead link]
^ Fraser, David (26 November 2004). "Bank responds to incident by prohibiting faxing of customer information". Canadian Privacy Blog. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC loses data on 470,000 Talvest fund customers". CBC News. cbc.ca. 18 January 2007. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Pasternak, Sean B.; Alexander, Doug (18 January 2007). "CIBC's Talvest Mutual Funds Loses Client Data File". Bloomberg News. Bloomberg.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. [dead link]
^ "Privacy Commissioner launches investigation of CIBC breach of Talvest customers' personal information". Privacy Commissioner of Canada. 18 January 2007. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Cohen, Tobi (5 June 2007). "CIBC faces overtime lawsuit". Toronto Star. Thestar.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ McNish, Jacquie; Perkins, Tara (19 July 2009). "CIBC overtime lawsuit dismissed". The Globe and Mail. theglobeandmail.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Hasham, Alyshah (26 June 2012). "Lawsuits over denied overtime pay against CIBC, Scotiabank to go ahead". Toronto Star. thestar.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC, Scotiabank Overtime Lawsuit Gets OK From Supreme Court". The Huffington Post. The Canadian Press. 21 March 2013. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 



Biography


Victor Ross A History of the Canadian Bank of Commerce. (1920–1934)
Rupert Canadian Investment Bank Review. McGraw-Hill Ryerson, Limited 1992

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to CIBC.



Official Website







v
t
e


Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce






Chief Executive Officer: Victor G. Dodig








Fiscal year 2016 statistics
Net income: $4.3 billion CAD[1]
Market capitalization: $39.9 billion CAD[2]
Assets: $501.4 billion CAD[3]
Employees: 43,213 (FTE, 2016)[4]
Stock symbols: TSX: CM NYSE: CM
Website: www.cibc.com












Major brands by financial service








Master: CIBC
Financial group: CIBC
Canadian banking: CIBC
Caribbean banking: CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank
International banking: CIBC Private Wealth Management
Canadian mutual funds: CIBC Mutual Funds
Canadian brokerage: CIBC Investor's Edge and CIBC Wood Gundy
Canadian insurance: CIBC Insurance
Capital markets: CIBC World Markets
Custodial: CIBC Mellon















v
t
e


Banks and credit unions in Canada








Banks








Big Five




Bank of Montreal
Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce (President's Choice Financial)
Royal Bank of Canada
Scotiabank (Tangerine)
Toronto-Dominion Bank (TD Canada Trust)






Other banks




AMEX Bank of Canada
Bridgewater Bank
Business Development Bank of Canada
Canadian Tire Financial Services
Canadian Western Bank
Citibank Canada
Equitable Bank
Exchange Bank of Canada
First Nations Bank of Canada
HSBC Bank Canada
ICICI Bank Canada
Laurentian Bank of Canada
Manulife Bank of Canada
Meridian Bank
National Bank of Canada
Rogers Bank
Vancity Community Investment Bank
VersaBank
Wealth One Bank of Canada
















Credit unions








Credit unions




Affinity Credit Union
Aldergrove Credit Union
Alterna Savings
Assiniboine Credit Union
BlueShore Financial
Central 1 Credit Union
Coast Capital Savings
Concentra Financial
Conexus Credit Union
Credit Union Central of Canada
Desjardins Group
Envision Financial
First Calgary Financial
First West Credit Union
Gulf and Fraser Fishermen's Credit Union
Island Savings
Kawartha Credit Union
Kootenay Savings Credit Union
Libro Financial Group
Meridian Credit Union
Mouvement des caisses populaires acadiennes
Servus Credit Union
Steinbach Credit Union
TCU Financial Group
Vancity
Windsor Family Credit Union
Your Credit Union
Your Neighbourhood Credit Union






Credit union deposit insurance


Alberta * British Columbia * Manitoba * New Brunswick * Newfoundland and Labrador * Nova Scotia * Ontario * Prince Edward Island * Saskatchewan














Other financial institutions








Federal financial institutions


Farm Credit Canada




Provincial financial institutions




ATB Financial


















v
t
e


S&P/TSX 60 companies of Canada (February 22, 2016)






Agnico Eagle Mines
Agrium
ARC Resources
Bank of Montreal
Barrick Gold
BCE Inc.
BlackBerry
Bombardier
Brookfield Asset Management
Cameco
Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce
Canadian National
Canadian Natural Resources
Canadian Pacific
Canadian Tire
CCL Industries
Cenovus Energy
CGI Group
Constellation Software
Couche-Tard
Crescent Point Energy
Dollarama
Emera
Enbridge
Encana
First Quantum Minerals
Franco-Nevada
Fortis Inc.
Gildan
Goldcorp
Husky Energy
Imperial Oil
Inter Pipeline
Kinross Gold
Loblaw Companies
Magna International
Manulife Financial
Metro
National Bank of Canada
Pembina Pipeline
PotashCorp
Power Corporation
Restaurant Brands International
Rogers Communications
Royal Bank of Canada
Saputo
Scotiabank
Shaw Communications
Silver Wheaton
SNC-Lavalin
Sun Life Financial
Suncor Energy
Teck
Telus
Thomson Reuters
Toronto-Dominion Bank
TransCanada
Valeant
Weston
Waste Connections












v
t
e


Great Recession



By region



Africa
Americas

United States
South America


Asia
Europe
Oceania





United States-specific



Automotive industry crisis
California budget crisis
Housing bubble
Housing market correction
Subprime mortgage crisis





Banking losses and fraud



Anglo Irish Bank hidden loans controversy
Libor scandal

Tom Hayes


Société Générale trading loss
Forex scandal
Seán FitzPatrick
Bernard Madoff
Tom Petters
Scott W. Rothstein
Allen Stanford





Government entities



Consumer Financial Protection Bureau
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
Federal Home Loan Banks
Federal Housing Administration
Federal Housing Finance Agency
Federal Housing Finance Board
Federal Reserve System
Government National Mortgage Association
Irish Bank Resolution Corporation
National Asset Management Agency
Office of Federal Housing Enterprise Oversight
Office of Financial Stability
UK Financial Investments










Government policy and spending responses



Banking and finance
stability and reform



Anglo Irish Bank Corporation Act 2009
Banking (Special Provisions) Act 2008
China–Japan–South Korea trilateral summit
Commercial Paper Funding Facility
Dodd–Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act
Emergency Economic Stabilization Act of 2008
Irish emergency budget, 2009
Irish budget, 2010
Irish budget, 2011
Irish budget, 2012
Irish budget, 2013
Temporary Liquidity Guarantee Program
Term Asset-Backed Securities Loan Facility
Troubled Asset Relief Program
2008 United Kingdom bank rescue package




Bank stress tests



EU
U.S.








Stimulus and recovery



2008 European Union stimulus plan
2008–09 Keynesian resurgence
American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009
Chinese economic stimulus program
Economic Stimulus Act of 2008
Fraud Enforcement and Recovery Act of 2009
Green New Deal
Housing and Economic Recovery Act of 2008
National fiscal policy response to the Great Recession
Zero interest-rate policy





Government interventions,
rescues, and acquisitions



List of banks acquired or bankrupted during the Great Recession




Non-banking



Chrysler
General Motors











Securities involved
and financial markets



Auction rate securities
Collateralized debt obligations
Collateralized mortgage obligations
Credit default swaps
Mortgage-backed securities
Secondary mortgage market





Social responses



Tea Party protests (United States; c. 2009)
May Day protests (Europe, Middle East and North Africa, Asia; 2009)
Occupy movement (worldwide)





Related topics



2000s energy crisis

Central Asia: 2008


Effects on museums
Decline of newspapers
World food price crisis








European debt crisis
Financial crisis of 2007–08
List of countries by public debt







^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Canadian_Imperial_Bank_of_Commerce&oldid=791515423"					
Categories: S&P/TSX 60 IndexS&P/TSX Composite IndexCanadian Imperial Bank of CommerceCompanies listed on the Toronto Stock ExchangeCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeCompanies based in TorontoBanks of CanadaBanks established in 1961Mortgage lenders of Canada1961 establishments in OntarioHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from June 2017Pages using deprecated image syntaxArticles containing French-language textArticles to be expanded from August 2010All articles to be expandedArticles using small message boxes 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


DeutschفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa Indonesia日本語PortuguêsРусскийSuomiதமிழ்中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 20 July 2017, at 19:45.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce - Wikipedia






















 






Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from CIBC)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

"CIBC" redirects here. For other uses, see CIBC (disambiguation).

Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce





Type

Public


Traded as
TSX: CM
NYSE: CM
S&P/TSX 60 component


Industry
Financial Services, banking


Founded
1961
(Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce)
1875
(Imperial Bank of Canada)
1867
(Canadian Bank of Commerce)[1]


Headquarters
Commerce Court
Toronto, Ontario, Canada



Key people


Victor G. Dodig, President and CEO[2]
John Manley, Chair of the Board[3]


Revenue
 C$15.0 billion (2016)[4]



Net income

 C$4.3 billion (2016)[5]


Total assets
 C$501.357 billion (2016)[6]



Number of employees

43,213 (FTE, 2016)[7]


Subsidiaries
CIBC Holdings (Cayman) Limited
CIBC World Markets
CIBC Trust Corporation
CIBC Asset Management Inc.[8]


Website
www.cibc.com


The Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce (French: Banque Canadienne Impériale de Commerce), commonly referred to as CIBC, is one of the Big Five banks in Canada. The bank is headquartered at Commerce Court in Toronto, Ontario.[9] CIBC's Institution Number (or bank number) is 010, and its SWIFT code is CIBCCATT.
The bank has three strategic business units: Retail and Business Banking, Wealth Management, and Capital Markets. It has international operations in the United States, the Caribbean, Asia, and Europe. Globally, CIBC serves more than eleven million clients, and has over 40,000 employees. The company ranks at number 172 on the Forbes Global 2000 listing.[10] CIBC was named the strongest bank in North America and the 3rd strongest bank in the world, by Bloomberg Markets magazine.[11]



Contents


1 History

1.1 Origins
1.2 Forming Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce
1.3 Present


2 Notable corporate activities and international operations

2.1 North America
2.2 Caribbean and the West Indies
2.3 Restructuring and outsourcing
2.4 Miscellaneous


3 Corporate governance
4 Sponsorships
5 Credit agency ratings
6 Settlements and controversies

6.1 Enron
6.2 Market timing
6.3 Visa cardholders
6.4 Voluntary refund of erroneous charges
6.5 Privacy

6.5.1 2005
6.5.2 2007


6.6 Employee overtime


7 Significant buildings

7.1 Gallery


8 See also
9 References
10 External links



History[edit]
The Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce, as it is known today, came into being in 1961. The bank was formed through the merger of the Canadian Bank of Commerce and the Imperial Bank of Canada. At the time, they were two of Canada's largest banks.
Origins[edit]




Commerce Building (c. 1930), now known as Commerce Court North in Toronto


Main articles: Canadian Bank of Commerce and Imperial Bank of Canada
The Honourable William McMaster founded the Canadian Bank of Commerce which opened on May 15, 1867, in Toronto as competition for the Bank of Montreal; by 1874 it had 24 branches.
The Imperial Bank of Canada opened in Toronto on March 18, 1875, founded by former Commerce Vice-president Henry Stark Howland.
By the end of 1895, the Canadian Bank of Commerce had grown to 58 branches and the Imperial Bank of Canada to 18.
The 1896 gold strike in the Yukon prompted the Dominion Government to ask the Canadian Bank of Commerce to open a branch in Dawson City. Acquisitions in the 1920s caused the Commerce Bank to become one of the strongest branch networks in Canada with over 700 local branches; and the bank opened international branches in Cuba, Jamaica, Barbados and Trinidad during the same period.
Wood, Gundy & Company, the precursor of CIBC's investment banking arm, opened its doors on February 1, 1905. During World War I, it took a prominent and active role in the organization of Victory Loans.
The Canadian Bank of Commerce opened its new head office in Toronto in 1931. An observation gallery on the 32nd floor attracted visitors who could get an aerial view of the city.
In 1936, the Commerce was the first Canadian bank to establish a personal loans department.
Following World War II, both banks opened new branches. Although the banks had been barred from the mortgage business since 1871, the Canadian government now called upon them to provide mortgage services. So, in 1954, Canadian banks started offering mortgages for new construction.
Forming Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce[edit]
In 1960, Imperial chairman Stuart Mackersy approached Neil McKinnon the President of the Commerce with a proposal to merge the two banks. This followed a decade of expansion in the Canadian economy and Canada's capitalization of the industrialization of its natural resources. They quickly reached a deal between the two banks.




The newly merged CIBC commissioned a new logo to commemorate its 100th year of operation. The "chevron" logo was in use until 1994[12]


On June 1, 1961, the Canadian Bank of Commerce and the Imperial Bank of Canada merged to form the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce with over 1,200 branches across Canada. The new bank possessed the greatest resources and the most branches of any bank in the country.
Following the merger, the new bank commissioned a new head office. While planning to retain Commerce Court North, the bank hired architect I. M. Pei to design a three-building complex. The result was Commerce Court consisting of a landscaped courtyard complementing the existing building and included the newly built 786 feet (240 m) Commerce Court West. When completed in 1973, the 57-storey building was the tallest in Canada, and the largest stainless-steel-clad building in the world.
In 1967, both Canada and CIBC celebrated their centenaries and CIBC was the only chartered bank to have a branch on-site at Expo 67. Also at this time computerization began to change banking services and the Yonge and Bloor branch in Toronto was the first Canadian bank branch to update customer bank books via computer. This also marked the introduction of inter-branch banking. Before the decade was out, CIBC had introduced the first 24-hour cash dispenser, which would eventually become the ATM.
Changes to federal and provincial regulations ending the separation of banks, investment dealers, trust companies and insurance companies came in 1987. CIBC quickly took advantage of this and became the first Canadian bank to operate an investment dealer, CIBC Securities, offering services to the public.
In 1988, CIBC acquired a majority interest in Wood Gundy which brought a well-respected name and reputation in underwriting. Shortly thereafter, the corporation merged Wood Gundy and CIBC Securities under the name CIBC Wood Gundy which became CIBC Oppenheimer in 1997[13] and later, CIBC World Markets.
In 1992, CIBC introduced automated telephone banking; in 1995 the bank launched its website, and shortly thereafter began offering banking services online. In 1998, CIBC joined with Loblaws to create President's Choice Financial which it launched in 28 Ottawa area stores.
Present[edit]
CIBC agreed to merge with the Toronto-Dominion Bank in 1998. However the Government of Canada, at the recommendation of then Finance Minister Paul Martin, blocked the merger – as well as another proposed by the Bank of Montreal with the Royal Bank of Canada – as not in the best interest of Canadians.[14]
CIBC sold its corporate and purchasing credit card business to U.S. Bank Canada in October 2006 which joined it with business charge cards it previously acquired from Royal Bank of Canada.
In 2006, the stock ticker symbol on the New York Stock Exchange changed from BCM to CM to bring it in line with the ticker symbol on the Toronto Stock Exchange.
In December 2006, CIBC acquired majority control of its publicly held joint venture FirstCaribbean International Bank for just over US$1 billion, (Bds$2 billion), when it purchased the 43.7% stake owned by Barclays Bank.[15] CIBC rebranded the division CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank in 2011.[16]
On February 12, 2009, the Trinidad and Tobago Express reported that CIBC was pursuing discussions to buy CL Financial's stake in the Republic Bank of Trinidad and Tobago.[17] As part of a "bail out" agreement of CL Financial by the government of Trinidad and Tobago during the Global financial crisis of 2008–2009, the corporation was required to sell Republic and other assets. As of February 2011, CL Financial had yet to agree to a sale.[18]
In February, 2010 CIBC became the first chartered bank in Canada to launch a mobile banking iPhone App. It surpassed 100,000 downloads in just over one month following launch, with over 1 million client logins to CIBC Mobile Banking since its introduction.[19][20]
Four months later, the bank announced it signed a deal to buy a C$2.1-billion credit card portfolio from Citigroup's Citibank Canada MasterCard business.[21]
Finally in October of that year, CIBC announced that it would be the first bank in Canada to introduce the internationally used Visa-branded debit card.[22]
In April 2013, CIBC reached an agreement with Invesco to acquire Atlantic Trust, the company's wealth management unit for US$210 million.[23]
CIBC announced in June 2016 that it would acquire the Chicago-based commercial bank PrivateBancorp for US$3.8 billion.[24]
In April 2017, it was announced that CIBC would be moving its headquarters to CIBC Square.[25]
Notable corporate activities and international operations[edit]
North America[edit]

CIBC Mellon Global Securities Services: formed by CIBC and Mellon Bank Corp. (now Bank of New York Mellon) of Pittsburgh PA 1996 and Canada Trust's (now TD Canada Trust) pension and custody business in 1997
Canadian Eastern Finance Limited (CEF): formed by CIBC and Hutchison Whampoa of Hong Kong; includes CEF Capital Limited, CEF Investment Management Limited
President's Choice Financial: A joint venture between CIBC and Loblaw Companies Limited; Banking services such as deposit accounts, investments and credit products (excluding MasterCard) are provided by a division of CIBC Retail Markets, formerly Amicus Bank. In 2005 Amicus was dissolved as a separate legal entity.
Amicus FSB: A similar setup as President's Choice Financial, it was created in 1999 in the United States with Winn Dixie and Safeway Inc. under the Marketplace Bank and Safeway Select Bank brands. It was disbanded in 2002 and sold to E*Trade Bank.
Soltrus Inc 2001: provider of digital trust services for businesses and consumers to communicate and transact over digital networks owned by CIBC, Telus Corp and VeriSign Inc.
Aplettix Inc 2000: firm specializing in secure transaction systems in the banking sector; CIBC signed an agreement with the New York-based firm in 2000, but the project was later abandoned for alternatives such as VeriSign.


Privatebancorp 2017: A Chicago based bank founded in 1989 in Delaware with operations in 13 states mainly in the East Coast. Business focus is in middle market commercial banking, personal and small business banking, as well as private banking and investment management services.[26]

Caribbean and the West Indies[edit]
Main article: CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank




CIBC FirstCaribbean branch in Bridgetown, Barbados


In 1920, Canadian Bank of Commerce established its first branches in the West Indies in Bridgetown, Barbados and in Kingston, Jamaica. That same year it also opened branches in Port of Spain, Trinidad and Havana, Cuba. Its first branch in Mexico City opened in 1910. In 1957, the bank opened a branch in Nassau, the Bahamas, and in the subsequent years expanded its operations in Jamaica.
Between 1963 and 1988, the bank expanded its branch network in Barbados opened branches in St. Vincent, Antigua, and St Lucia. In 1988, CIBC sold 45% of its shares in CIBC Jamaica via a public share issue. Between 1993 and 1996, the bank restructured its holdings in the Caribbean, with the incorporation of CIBC West Indies Holdings Limited and CIBC Caribbean Limited. CIBC West Indies Holdings then sold 30% of its shares to the public. In 1997, CIBC issued 5 million shares in CIBC Bahamas Limited to the public.
On October 31, 2001, Barclays and CIBC agreed to combine their Caribbean operations to establish FirstCaribbean International Bank. CIBC bought Barclays' stake in 2006 to give it control of approximately 92% of FirstCaribbean, which was rebranded as CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank.[16] In 2010, CIBC acquired a 22.5% equity of Butterfield Bank of Bermuda.[27]
Restructuring and outsourcing[edit]

HP Intria Items (Intria Corp): Formed by CIBC with Hewlett Packard and Fiserv Canada in 1996; In 2005, CIBC acquired the remaining shares from Fiserv and Intria became a unit of CIBC
EDULINX Canada Corporation: Established in 1999; sold to Nelnet Canada Inc., the Canadian unit of Nelnet, Inc., in late 2004
Toronto Blue Jays Baseball Club: Granted a franchise for the MLB team in 1977 with partner Labatt's Breweries; sold its 10% stake to Rogers Media in 2000
CIBC Leadership Centre: Sold the King City, Ontario facility to Benchmark Hospitality in 2001 as the bank divested real estate or investments outside of its business strategies
TSYS: In 2002, signed a 10-year agreement with Total Systems Services Inc. of Columbus, Georgia to outsource credit card processing operations
Juniper Financial Corporation: The bank acquired the Wilmington, Delaware credit card issuer 2001 and sold to Barclays Bank in 2004[28]

Miscellaneous[edit]
Li Ka Shing, Hong Kong billionaire was the largest foreign shareholder in the bank for over two decades, but in early 2005 he sold his portion (est. C$1.2 billion) to establish a Canadian charity, the Li Ka Shing Foundation. CIBC was Mr. Li's choice for financing many of his Canadian ventures, like Husky Energy. Mr. Li had reportedly backed personal and commercial banking head Holger Kluge to succeed Al Flood as CEO of CIBC in 1999.
Corporate governance[edit]
CIBC is well known for its publicized battles of succession to the top position of President and CEO (formerly styled chairman and CEO until 2003 when the positions were separated). When Al Flood became CEO, one of his first acts was to fire his chief rival Paul Cantor. In 1999, the company saw a competition between Wood Gundy (now CIBC World Markets) chief John S. Hunkin and Personal/Commercial banking head Holger Kluge, with Kluge retiring after Hunkin became chairman. In February 2004, Hunkin forced his friend and heir-apparent, David Kassie, to resign as chairman and CEO of World Markets after several scandals in the US. Both men had waived their bonuses in 2002 after that year produced the worst results in the history of the bank. Kassie afterwards founded Genuity Capital and was alleged to have raided 20 key employees from World Markets for his new startup, causing CIBC to file suit.[29] Gerald T. McCaughey became Kassie's replacement heading World Markets and in February 2004, was promoted to President and chief operating officer, assuring his succession as CEO.[30] Shortly after assuming his position, McCaughey reportedly dismissed Jill Denham, Vice Chair of Retail Markets and a potential rival for the CEO post. Denham was reportedly a close ally of Hunkin and Kassie and McCaughey wanted to build his own senior executive team.[31]
Current senior executive team:

Victor Dodig - President and CEO
Mike Capatides - Chief Administrative Officer and General Counsel, Administration Division
Steve Geist - Senior Executive Vice-President and Group Head, Wealth Management
Kevin Glass - Senior Executive-Vice President, and chief financial officer
Laura Dottori-Attanasio - Senior Executive Vice-President and Chief Risk Officer, Risk Management
Harry Culham - Senior Executive Vice-President and Group Head, Capital Markets
Kevin Patterson - Senior Executive Vice-President, Technology and Operations
David Williamson - Senior Executive Vice-President, and Group Head, Retail and Business Banking

Current members of the board of directors:[32]

Brent S. Belzberg (2005); Senior Managing Partner, Torquest Partners Inc.
Gary F. Colter (2003); President, CRS Inc.
Patrick D. Daniel (2009); Past President and Chief Executive Officer, Enbridge Inc.
Luc Desjardins (2009); President and Chief Executive Officer, Superior Plus Corp.
Hon. Gordon D. Giffin (2001); Senior Partner, McKenna Long & Aldridge LLP
Linda S. Hasenfratz (2004); Chief Executive Officer, Linamar Corporation
Kevin J. Kelly (2013); Corporate Director
Nicholas D. Le Pan (2008); Corporate Director
Hon. John P. Manley, P.C., O.C. (2005); Chair of the Board
Victor G. Dodig (2014); President and Chief Executive Officer, CIBC
Jane L. Peverett (2009); Corporate Director
Katharine B. Stevenson (2011); Corporate Director
Martine Turcotte (2014); Vice Chair, Quebec, BCE Inc. and Bell Canada
Ronald W. Tysoe (2004); Corporate Director
Barry Zubrow (2015); President, ITB LLC

Sponsorships[edit]
As a founding partner of the Toronto Blue Jays baseball club, CIBC was the team's official bank until selling its ownership stake in 2000.[33]
CIBC partnered with Air Canada in 1991 to offer credit cards as part of the airline's loyalty program, Aeroplan. In 2009, the program announced that a new agreement with Toronto-Dominion Bank would be effective January 1, 2014.[34]
As part of its purchase of MasterCard from Citibank Canada in 2010, CIBC acquired the co-branded Petro-Canada rewards credit card and continues to jointly market the card.[21]
On October 27, 2011, CIBC announced a partnership with the PANAM Toronto 2015 Organizing Committee to become lead partner of the 2015 Pan American Games and 2015 Parapan American Games[35]
CIBC is an industry partner of the University of Waterloo Stratford Campus.[36]
Credit agency ratings[edit]
On October 26, 2012, rating agency Moody's Investors Service announced it would review the long-term ratings of CIBC along with other Canadian banks, because of concerns about consumer debt levels, housing prices, a sizable exposure to capital markets and more. The review resulted in a downgrade from Aa2 to Aa3 on January 28, 2013.[37]
Settlements and controversies[edit]



This section needs expansion. You can help by adding to it. (August 2010)


Enron[edit]
On December 22, 2003, the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) fined CIBC US$80 million for its role in the manipulation of Enron financial statements. This consists of $37.5 million to repay ill-gotten gains, a $37.5 million penalty and $5 million in interest. The money is intended to be returned to Enron fraud victims pursuant to the Fair Fund provisions of Section 308(a) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.[38]
The SEC also sued three of CIBC's executives. CIBC Executive Vice President Daniel Ferguson and former CIBC Executive Director Mark Wolf agreed to settle for US$563,000 and US$60,000, respectively. Ian Schottlaender, former managing director in CIBC's corporate leveraged finance group in New York initially contested the charges[39] but on July 12, 2004 he agreed to pay US$528,750 as well as be barred from serving as an officer or director of a publicly traded company for a period of five years.[40] Under these agreements the individuals neither admit nor deny wrongdoing.
The SEC complaint charges that "CIBC and the three executives with having helped Enron to mislead its investors through a series of complex structured finance transactions over a period of several years preceding Enron's bankruptcy." The agreement reached between the SEC and CIBC permanently enjoins CIBC from violating the antifraud, books and records, and internal control provisions of the federal securities laws.[38][39]
On August 2, 2005, CIBC paid US$2.4 billion to settle a class action lawsuit brought by a group of pension funds and investment managers, including the University of California, which claims that "systematic fraud by Enron and its officers led to the loss of billions and the collapse of the company."[41]
Market timing[edit]
On July 25, 2005 CIBC confirmed it would pay US$125 million to settle an investigation into its role in the 2003 Mutual-fund scandal. Linda Chatman Thomsen, director of the SEC's division of enforcement, said, "by knowingly financing customers' late trading and market timing, as well as providing financing in amounts far greater than the law allows, CIHI and World Markets boosted their customers' trading profits at the expense of long-term mutual fund shareholders."[42] Under the settlement, CIBC neither admitted nor denied the allegations.[43]
Visa cardholders[edit]
On August 27, 2004, CIBC confirmed that it would settle a class-action lawsuit on behalf of CIBC Visa cardholders. The plaintiffs alleged that the conversion of foreign-currency transactions resulted in an undisclosed or inadequately disclosed mark-up. After approval by an Ontario Superior Court judge, CIBC announced October 15, 2004, that the settlement would result in the bank paying C$13.85 million to its cardholders, $1 million to the United Way, $1.65 million to the Class Action Fund of the Law Society of Upper Canada, and $3 million in legal fees. The bank also announced that it has not admitted any liability and is settling to avoid further litigation with its cardholders.[44]
Voluntary refund of erroneous charges[edit]
On May 20, 2004, CIBC announced that it would refund C$24 million to some of its customers as a result of erroneous overdraft and mortgage charges which were discovered in the course of an internal review. "This is being done as part of CIBC's effort to correct its error and to ensure that it distributes to customers all of the money it received in error," the bank said.[45]
In a similar incident, CIBC announced April 27, 2006 that it's refunding an additional C$27 million to about 200,000 clients who were overcharged for certain overdraft fees and other borrowing transactions, some of which date back to 1993. In cases where clients were undercharged, the bank decided not to seek reimbursement.[46]
Privacy[edit]
2005[edit]
On April 18, 2005 the Privacy Commissioner of Canada expressed disappointment in the way CIBC dealt with incidents involving the bank misdirecting faxes containing customers' personal information.[47] One involved misdirecting faxes to a scrap yard operator in West Virginia from 2001 to 2004. The misdirected faxes contained the social security numbers, home addresses, phone numbers, and detailed bank account data of several hundred bank customers.[48]
The second incident involved a Dorval businessman and allegedly took place from 2000 to 2004. In both cases, the commissioner noted that the bank did not inform the affected clients, whose personal information was compromised, until the incidents became public and an investigation was underway.[49]
Within days of reports by CTV News and The Globe and Mail, CIBC management announced a directive that banned employees from using fax machines to transmit any documents containing confidential customer information.[50]
2007[edit]
On January 18, 2007, CIBC Asset Management announced that the personal information of about 470,000 current and former clients of Talvest Mutual Funds, a CIBC subsidiary, had gone missing. The information may have included client names, addresses, signatures, dates of birth, bank account numbers, beneficiary information and/or Social Insurance Numbers.[51] The incident stemmed from the disappearance of a hard drive containing information on "the process used to open and administer" customer accounts as it was traveling between the bank's Montreal and Toronto offices.[52] The Privacy Commissioner of Canada stated, "Although I appreciate that the bank notified us of this incident and that it is working cooperatively with my Office, I am nevertheless deeply troubled, especially given the magnitude of this breach, which puts at risk the personal information of hundreds of thousands of Canadians." She immediately launched a privacy investigation.[53]
Employee overtime[edit]
In June 2007, Dara Fresco, a Toronto teller, named CIBC in a $600 million class-action lawsuit regarding the lack of overtime pay to its customer service staff. Fresco v. Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce is a class action brought on behalf of current and former non-management, non-unionized employees of CIBC in Canada who are or were tellers or other front-line customer service employees working at CIBC retail branch office across Canada. The lawsuit alleges that class members are assigned heavier workloads than could be completed within their standard working hours. They were required or permitted to work overtime to meet the demands of their jobs and CIBC failed to pay for the overtime work in direct contravention of the Canada Labour Code under which they are regulated.[54]
The Ontario Superior Court dismissed the suit June 18, 2012, stating the evidence '"provides no basis in fact that there is a systemic practice of unpaid overtime at CIBC."'[55]
An employee of the Bank of Nova Scotia (Scotiabank) filed a similar suit which the Superior Court certified. Fresco and Scotiabank each appealed their adverse, and contradictory, rulings and the Ontario Court of Appeal ruled that both cases could proceed.[56]
Both banks appealed to the Supreme Court of Canada which on March 21, 2013, denied their requests and allowed the lawsuits to proceed.[57] The cases are awaiting further action as of late 2013.
Significant buildings[edit]

Commerce Court, Toronto
2 Bloor Street West, Toronto
CIBC 750 Lawrence, Toronto
Bell Trinity Square, Toronto
Brookfield Place, Toronto
Tour CIBC, Montreal
Bankers Hall East, Calgary
Commerce Place, Hamilton
Atrium on Bay

Gallery[edit]







Atrium on Bay in Toronto









Commerce Court in Toronto









CIBC Tower in Downtown Montreal









CIBC on Sparks Street in Downtown Ottawa









CIBC FirstCaribbean's regional head office, Warrens, St. Michael, Barbados









CIBC building in Halifax









750 Lawrence, Toronto









CIBC in Montreal









Commerce Place, Hamilton









Two Bloor West, Toronto









Toronto financial district




See also[edit]


Companies portal



CIBC Wealth Management

References[edit]


^ "A Short History of CIBC" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ Sawyer, Deborah C. "Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce". Thecanadianencyclopedia.com. Retrieved 2011-03-09. [dead link]
^ "Forbes Global 2000 List, 2013 edition". Forbes. Forbes.com. 17 April 2013. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Bloomberg Names CIBC Third Strongest Bank in The World". Today. Sint Maarten. 5 July 2012. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "History: Logos & Seals". CIBC. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Truell, Peter (19 July 1997). "Canadian Bank Is Expected to Buy Oppenheimer". The New York Times. NYTimes.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Pound, Richard W., ed. (2005). The Fitzhenry & Whiteside Book of Canadian Facts and Dates. Fitzhenry and Whiteside. ISBN 978-155041171-3. 
^ Ball, James (27 May 2013). "US tax inspector targets Caribbean bank". The Guardian. Manchester. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ a b "FirstCaribbean to be branded as 'CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank'". The Barbados Advocate. 21 June 2006. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Newman, James (13 February 2009). "Paper: CIBC to go after Republic Bank stake". BNamericas. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Rampersad, Curtis (7 February 2011). "Eyes on Republic". Trinidad and Tobago Express. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC continues market leadership by introducing further innovations to Mobile Banking for BlackBerry devices and other Internet-enabled smartphones" (Press release). CIBC. 25 February 2011. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Connors, John (13 April 2010). "CIBC iPhone app sees over 100,000 downloads in first month...expanded to other smartphones". Mobilesyrup.com. Retrieved 2011-03-09. 
^ a b "CIBC buys card portfolio from Citigroup MasterCard business". Toronto Star. thestar.com. The Canadian Press. 14 March 2010. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Trichur, Rita; Flavelle, Dana (18 October 2010). "CIBC rolls out Canada's first Visa-branded debit card". Toronto Star. thestar.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Alexander, Doug (11 April 2013). "CIBC Agrees to Buy Atlantic Trust for $210 Million". Bloomberg News. bloomberg.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Berman, David (June 29, 2016). "CIBC grows U.S. business with $3.8-billion deal for PrivateBancorp". The Globe and Mail. Retrieved July 5, 2016. 
^ BRADSHAW, CHRISTINA PELLEGRINI And JAMES (2017-04-12). "CIBC to move 15,000 staff to new downtown Toronto headquarters". Retrieved 2017-07-20. 
^ https://www.theprivatebank.com/about-the-privatebank/
^ Perkins, Tara (2 March 2010). "CIBC buys stake in Bermuda's Butterfield". The Globe and Mail. Toronto: Theglobeandmail.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC completes sale of ownership in Juniper Financial". Investment Executive. 1 December 2004. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Willis, Andrew (8 January 2005). "CIBC puts ethics on the line". The Globe & Mail. globeadvisor.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Gerald T. McCaughey, President and Chief Executive Officer, CIBC". CIBC. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Canadian Imperial's No.3 Executive Jill Denham Leaves". Bloomberg News. bloomberg.com. 11 April 2005. Retrieved 2013-11-21. [dead link]
^ "Board Members". CIBC. 
^ "1988 Toronto Blue Jays Baseball Pocket Schedule CIBC". eBay. 6 May 2013. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Alexander, Doug (27 June 2013). "Aimia Soars as TD Signs Aeroplan Card Agreement: Montreal Mover". Bloomberg News. bloomberg.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Schecter, Barbara (27 October 2011). "CIBC lead sponsor of Pan Am Games in 2015". Financial Post. financialpost.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Industry Partnerships". University of Waterloo. Retrieved 24 April 2014. 
^ "Moody's downgrades Canadian banks" (Press release). Moody's Investors Service. 28 January 2013. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ a b "SEC Announces Agreement with Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce and Two Executives to Settle Charges of Aiding and Abetting Enron Accounting Fraud". SEC.gov. 22 December 2003. Retrieved 2011-03-09. 
^ a b "CIBC pays $80m to settle Enron". CNN World Business. CNN.com. Reuters. 21 December 2003. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Securities and Exchange Commission v. Ian Schottlaender, U.S. H-03-5785 (Southern District of Texas 13 July 2004).
^ Bailey, Jeff (3 August 2005). "CIBC Pays to settle Enron Case". The New York Times. NYTimes.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Settled Administrative Proceeding Against Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce Subsidiaries" (Press release). SEC.gov. 20 July 2005. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Goldstein, Matthew (2 July 2005). "How CIBC Cashed in on Mutual Fund Fraud". TheStreet.com CBC News]. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC settles lawsuit over Visa foreign currency charges". CBC News. cbc.ca. 27 August 2004. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC overcharged customers $24M". CBC News. cbc.ca. 21 May 2004. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC to refund $27M to clients who were overcharged". CBC News. cbc.ca. 27 April 2006. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Failure of CIBC's privacy practices a wake-up call to businesses" (Press release). Privacy Commissioner of Canada. 18 April 2005. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Arin, David (26 November 2004). "CIBC faxes go to scrapyard". The Globe and Mail. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Addendum to CIBC fax incident summary" (Press release). Privacy Commissioner of Canada. 18 April 2005. Retrieved 2013-11-21. [dead link]
^ Fraser, David (26 November 2004). "Bank responds to incident by prohibiting faxing of customer information". Canadian Privacy Blog. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC loses data on 470,000 Talvest fund customers". CBC News. cbc.ca. 18 January 2007. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Pasternak, Sean B.; Alexander, Doug (18 January 2007). "CIBC's Talvest Mutual Funds Loses Client Data File". Bloomberg News. Bloomberg.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. [dead link]
^ "Privacy Commissioner launches investigation of CIBC breach of Talvest customers' personal information". Privacy Commissioner of Canada. 18 January 2007. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Cohen, Tobi (5 June 2007). "CIBC faces overtime lawsuit". Toronto Star. Thestar.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ McNish, Jacquie; Perkins, Tara (19 July 2009). "CIBC overtime lawsuit dismissed". The Globe and Mail. theglobeandmail.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Hasham, Alyshah (26 June 2012). "Lawsuits over denied overtime pay against CIBC, Scotiabank to go ahead". Toronto Star. thestar.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC, Scotiabank Overtime Lawsuit Gets OK From Supreme Court". The Huffington Post. The Canadian Press. 21 March 2013. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 



Biography


Victor Ross A History of the Canadian Bank of Commerce. (1920–1934)
Rupert Canadian Investment Bank Review. McGraw-Hill Ryerson, Limited 1992

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to CIBC.



Official Website







v
t
e


Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce






Chief Executive Officer: Victor G. Dodig








Fiscal year 2016 statistics
Net income: $4.3 billion CAD[1]
Market capitalization: $39.9 billion CAD[2]
Assets: $501.4 billion CAD[3]
Employees: 43,213 (FTE, 2016)[4]
Stock symbols: TSX: CM NYSE: CM
Website: www.cibc.com












Major brands by financial service








Master: CIBC
Financial group: CIBC
Canadian banking: CIBC
Caribbean banking: CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank
International banking: CIBC Private Wealth Management
Canadian mutual funds: CIBC Mutual Funds
Canadian brokerage: CIBC Investor's Edge and CIBC Wood Gundy
Canadian insurance: CIBC Insurance
Capital markets: CIBC World Markets
Custodial: CIBC Mellon















v
t
e


Banks and credit unions in Canada








Banks








Big Five




Bank of Montreal
Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce (President's Choice Financial)
Royal Bank of Canada
Scotiabank (Tangerine)
Toronto-Dominion Bank (TD Canada Trust)






Other banks




AMEX Bank of Canada
Bridgewater Bank
Business Development Bank of Canada
Canadian Tire Financial Services
Canadian Western Bank
Citibank Canada
Equitable Bank
Exchange Bank of Canada
First Nations Bank of Canada
HSBC Bank Canada
ICICI Bank Canada
Laurentian Bank of Canada
Manulife Bank of Canada
Meridian Bank
National Bank of Canada
Rogers Bank
Vancity Community Investment Bank
VersaBank
Wealth One Bank of Canada
















Credit unions








Credit unions




Affinity Credit Union
Aldergrove Credit Union
Alterna Savings
Assiniboine Credit Union
BlueShore Financial
Central 1 Credit Union
Coast Capital Savings
Concentra Financial
Conexus Credit Union
Credit Union Central of Canada
Desjardins Group
Envision Financial
First Calgary Financial
First West Credit Union
Gulf and Fraser Fishermen's Credit Union
Island Savings
Kawartha Credit Union
Kootenay Savings Credit Union
Libro Financial Group
Meridian Credit Union
Mouvement des caisses populaires acadiennes
Servus Credit Union
Steinbach Credit Union
TCU Financial Group
Vancity
Windsor Family Credit Union
Your Credit Union
Your Neighbourhood Credit Union






Credit union deposit insurance


Alberta * British Columbia * Manitoba * New Brunswick * Newfoundland and Labrador * Nova Scotia * Ontario * Prince Edward Island * Saskatchewan














Other financial institutions








Federal financial institutions


Farm Credit Canada




Provincial financial institutions




ATB Financial


















v
t
e


S&P/TSX 60 companies of Canada (February 22, 2016)






Agnico Eagle Mines
Agrium
ARC Resources
Bank of Montreal
Barrick Gold
BCE Inc.
BlackBerry
Bombardier
Brookfield Asset Management
Cameco
Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce
Canadian National
Canadian Natural Resources
Canadian Pacific
Canadian Tire
CCL Industries
Cenovus Energy
CGI Group
Constellation Software
Couche-Tard
Crescent Point Energy
Dollarama
Emera
Enbridge
Encana
First Quantum Minerals
Franco-Nevada
Fortis Inc.
Gildan
Goldcorp
Husky Energy
Imperial Oil
Inter Pipeline
Kinross Gold
Loblaw Companies
Magna International
Manulife Financial
Metro
National Bank of Canada
Pembina Pipeline
PotashCorp
Power Corporation
Restaurant Brands International
Rogers Communications
Royal Bank of Canada
Saputo
Scotiabank
Shaw Communications
Silver Wheaton
SNC-Lavalin
Sun Life Financial
Suncor Energy
Teck
Telus
Thomson Reuters
Toronto-Dominion Bank
TransCanada
Valeant
Weston
Waste Connections












v
t
e


Great Recession



By region



Africa
Americas

United States
South America


Asia
Europe
Oceania





United States-specific



Automotive industry crisis
California budget crisis
Housing bubble
Housing market correction
Subprime mortgage crisis





Banking losses and fraud



Anglo Irish Bank hidden loans controversy
Libor scandal

Tom Hayes


Société Générale trading loss
Forex scandal
Seán FitzPatrick
Bernard Madoff
Tom Petters
Scott W. Rothstein
Allen Stanford





Government entities



Consumer Financial Protection Bureau
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
Federal Home Loan Banks
Federal Housing Administration
Federal Housing Finance Agency
Federal Housing Finance Board
Federal Reserve System
Government National Mortgage Association
Irish Bank Resolution Corporation
National Asset Management Agency
Office of Federal Housing Enterprise Oversight
Office of Financial Stability
UK Financial Investments










Government policy and spending responses



Banking and finance
stability and reform



Anglo Irish Bank Corporation Act 2009
Banking (Special Provisions) Act 2008
China–Japan–South Korea trilateral summit
Commercial Paper Funding Facility
Dodd–Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act
Emergency Economic Stabilization Act of 2008
Irish emergency budget, 2009
Irish budget, 2010
Irish budget, 2011
Irish budget, 2012
Irish budget, 2013
Temporary Liquidity Guarantee Program
Term Asset-Backed Securities Loan Facility
Troubled Asset Relief Program
2008 United Kingdom bank rescue package




Bank stress tests



EU
U.S.








Stimulus and recovery



2008 European Union stimulus plan
2008–09 Keynesian resurgence
American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009
Chinese economic stimulus program
Economic Stimulus Act of 2008
Fraud Enforcement and Recovery Act of 2009
Green New Deal
Housing and Economic Recovery Act of 2008
National fiscal policy response to the Great Recession
Zero interest-rate policy





Government interventions,
rescues, and acquisitions



List of banks acquired or bankrupted during the Great Recession




Non-banking



Chrysler
General Motors











Securities involved
and financial markets



Auction rate securities
Collateralized debt obligations
Collateralized mortgage obligations
Credit default swaps
Mortgage-backed securities
Secondary mortgage market





Social responses



Tea Party protests (United States; c. 2009)
May Day protests (Europe, Middle East and North Africa, Asia; 2009)
Occupy movement (worldwide)





Related topics



2000s energy crisis

Central Asia: 2008


Effects on museums
Decline of newspapers
World food price crisis








European debt crisis
Financial crisis of 2007–08
List of countries by public debt







^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Canadian_Imperial_Bank_of_Commerce&oldid=791515423"					
Categories: S&P/TSX 60 IndexS&P/TSX Composite IndexCanadian Imperial Bank of CommerceCompanies listed on the Toronto Stock ExchangeCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeCompanies based in TorontoBanks of CanadaBanks established in 1961Mortgage lenders of Canada1961 establishments in OntarioHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from June 2017Pages using deprecated image syntaxArticles containing French-language textArticles to be expanded from August 2010All articles to be expandedArticles using small message boxes 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


DeutschفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa Indonesia日本語PortuguêsРусскийSuomiதமிழ்中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 20 July 2017, at 19:45.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce - Wikipedia






















 






Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from CIBC)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

"CIBC" redirects here. For other uses, see CIBC (disambiguation).

Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce





Type

Public


Traded as
TSX: CM
NYSE: CM
S&P/TSX 60 component


Industry
Financial Services, banking


Founded
1961
(Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce)
1875
(Imperial Bank of Canada)
1867
(Canadian Bank of Commerce)[1]


Headquarters
Commerce Court
Toronto, Ontario, Canada



Key people


Victor G. Dodig, President and CEO[2]
John Manley, Chair of the Board[3]


Revenue
 C$15.0 billion (2016)[4]



Net income

 C$4.3 billion (2016)[5]


Total assets
 C$501.357 billion (2016)[6]



Number of employees

43,213 (FTE, 2016)[7]


Subsidiaries
CIBC Holdings (Cayman) Limited
CIBC World Markets
CIBC Trust Corporation
CIBC Asset Management Inc.[8]


Website
www.cibc.com


The Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce (French: Banque Canadienne Impériale de Commerce), commonly referred to as CIBC, is one of the Big Five banks in Canada. The bank is headquartered at Commerce Court in Toronto, Ontario.[9] CIBC's Institution Number (or bank number) is 010, and its SWIFT code is CIBCCATT.
The bank has three strategic business units: Retail and Business Banking, Wealth Management, and Capital Markets. It has international operations in the United States, the Caribbean, Asia, and Europe. Globally, CIBC serves more than eleven million clients, and has over 40,000 employees. The company ranks at number 172 on the Forbes Global 2000 listing.[10] CIBC was named the strongest bank in North America and the 3rd strongest bank in the world, by Bloomberg Markets magazine.[11]



Contents


1 History

1.1 Origins
1.2 Forming Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce
1.3 Present


2 Notable corporate activities and international operations

2.1 North America
2.2 Caribbean and the West Indies
2.3 Restructuring and outsourcing
2.4 Miscellaneous


3 Corporate governance
4 Sponsorships
5 Credit agency ratings
6 Settlements and controversies

6.1 Enron
6.2 Market timing
6.3 Visa cardholders
6.4 Voluntary refund of erroneous charges
6.5 Privacy

6.5.1 2005
6.5.2 2007


6.6 Employee overtime


7 Significant buildings

7.1 Gallery


8 See also
9 References
10 External links



History[edit]
The Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce, as it is known today, came into being in 1961. The bank was formed through the merger of the Canadian Bank of Commerce and the Imperial Bank of Canada. At the time, they were two of Canada's largest banks.
Origins[edit]




Commerce Building (c. 1930), now known as Commerce Court North in Toronto


Main articles: Canadian Bank of Commerce and Imperial Bank of Canada
The Honourable William McMaster founded the Canadian Bank of Commerce which opened on May 15, 1867, in Toronto as competition for the Bank of Montreal; by 1874 it had 24 branches.
The Imperial Bank of Canada opened in Toronto on March 18, 1875, founded by former Commerce Vice-president Henry Stark Howland.
By the end of 1895, the Canadian Bank of Commerce had grown to 58 branches and the Imperial Bank of Canada to 18.
The 1896 gold strike in the Yukon prompted the Dominion Government to ask the Canadian Bank of Commerce to open a branch in Dawson City. Acquisitions in the 1920s caused the Commerce Bank to become one of the strongest branch networks in Canada with over 700 local branches; and the bank opened international branches in Cuba, Jamaica, Barbados and Trinidad during the same period.
Wood, Gundy & Company, the precursor of CIBC's investment banking arm, opened its doors on February 1, 1905. During World War I, it took a prominent and active role in the organization of Victory Loans.
The Canadian Bank of Commerce opened its new head office in Toronto in 1931. An observation gallery on the 32nd floor attracted visitors who could get an aerial view of the city.
In 1936, the Commerce was the first Canadian bank to establish a personal loans department.
Following World War II, both banks opened new branches. Although the banks had been barred from the mortgage business since 1871, the Canadian government now called upon them to provide mortgage services. So, in 1954, Canadian banks started offering mortgages for new construction.
Forming Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce[edit]
In 1960, Imperial chairman Stuart Mackersy approached Neil McKinnon the President of the Commerce with a proposal to merge the two banks. This followed a decade of expansion in the Canadian economy and Canada's capitalization of the industrialization of its natural resources. They quickly reached a deal between the two banks.




The newly merged CIBC commissioned a new logo to commemorate its 100th year of operation. The "chevron" logo was in use until 1994[12]


On June 1, 1961, the Canadian Bank of Commerce and the Imperial Bank of Canada merged to form the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce with over 1,200 branches across Canada. The new bank possessed the greatest resources and the most branches of any bank in the country.
Following the merger, the new bank commissioned a new head office. While planning to retain Commerce Court North, the bank hired architect I. M. Pei to design a three-building complex. The result was Commerce Court consisting of a landscaped courtyard complementing the existing building and included the newly built 786 feet (240 m) Commerce Court West. When completed in 1973, the 57-storey building was the tallest in Canada, and the largest stainless-steel-clad building in the world.
In 1967, both Canada and CIBC celebrated their centenaries and CIBC was the only chartered bank to have a branch on-site at Expo 67. Also at this time computerization began to change banking services and the Yonge and Bloor branch in Toronto was the first Canadian bank branch to update customer bank books via computer. This also marked the introduction of inter-branch banking. Before the decade was out, CIBC had introduced the first 24-hour cash dispenser, which would eventually become the ATM.
Changes to federal and provincial regulations ending the separation of banks, investment dealers, trust companies and insurance companies came in 1987. CIBC quickly took advantage of this and became the first Canadian bank to operate an investment dealer, CIBC Securities, offering services to the public.
In 1988, CIBC acquired a majority interest in Wood Gundy which brought a well-respected name and reputation in underwriting. Shortly thereafter, the corporation merged Wood Gundy and CIBC Securities under the name CIBC Wood Gundy which became CIBC Oppenheimer in 1997[13] and later, CIBC World Markets.
In 1992, CIBC introduced automated telephone banking; in 1995 the bank launched its website, and shortly thereafter began offering banking services online. In 1998, CIBC joined with Loblaws to create President's Choice Financial which it launched in 28 Ottawa area stores.
Present[edit]
CIBC agreed to merge with the Toronto-Dominion Bank in 1998. However the Government of Canada, at the recommendation of then Finance Minister Paul Martin, blocked the merger – as well as another proposed by the Bank of Montreal with the Royal Bank of Canada – as not in the best interest of Canadians.[14]
CIBC sold its corporate and purchasing credit card business to U.S. Bank Canada in October 2006 which joined it with business charge cards it previously acquired from Royal Bank of Canada.
In 2006, the stock ticker symbol on the New York Stock Exchange changed from BCM to CM to bring it in line with the ticker symbol on the Toronto Stock Exchange.
In December 2006, CIBC acquired majority control of its publicly held joint venture FirstCaribbean International Bank for just over US$1 billion, (Bds$2 billion), when it purchased the 43.7% stake owned by Barclays Bank.[15] CIBC rebranded the division CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank in 2011.[16]
On February 12, 2009, the Trinidad and Tobago Express reported that CIBC was pursuing discussions to buy CL Financial's stake in the Republic Bank of Trinidad and Tobago.[17] As part of a "bail out" agreement of CL Financial by the government of Trinidad and Tobago during the Global financial crisis of 2008–2009, the corporation was required to sell Republic and other assets. As of February 2011, CL Financial had yet to agree to a sale.[18]
In February, 2010 CIBC became the first chartered bank in Canada to launch a mobile banking iPhone App. It surpassed 100,000 downloads in just over one month following launch, with over 1 million client logins to CIBC Mobile Banking since its introduction.[19][20]
Four months later, the bank announced it signed a deal to buy a C$2.1-billion credit card portfolio from Citigroup's Citibank Canada MasterCard business.[21]
Finally in October of that year, CIBC announced that it would be the first bank in Canada to introduce the internationally used Visa-branded debit card.[22]
In April 2013, CIBC reached an agreement with Invesco to acquire Atlantic Trust, the company's wealth management unit for US$210 million.[23]
CIBC announced in June 2016 that it would acquire the Chicago-based commercial bank PrivateBancorp for US$3.8 billion.[24]
In April 2017, it was announced that CIBC would be moving its headquarters to CIBC Square.[25]
Notable corporate activities and international operations[edit]
North America[edit]

CIBC Mellon Global Securities Services: formed by CIBC and Mellon Bank Corp. (now Bank of New York Mellon) of Pittsburgh PA 1996 and Canada Trust's (now TD Canada Trust) pension and custody business in 1997
Canadian Eastern Finance Limited (CEF): formed by CIBC and Hutchison Whampoa of Hong Kong; includes CEF Capital Limited, CEF Investment Management Limited
President's Choice Financial: A joint venture between CIBC and Loblaw Companies Limited; Banking services such as deposit accounts, investments and credit products (excluding MasterCard) are provided by a division of CIBC Retail Markets, formerly Amicus Bank. In 2005 Amicus was dissolved as a separate legal entity.
Amicus FSB: A similar setup as President's Choice Financial, it was created in 1999 in the United States with Winn Dixie and Safeway Inc. under the Marketplace Bank and Safeway Select Bank brands. It was disbanded in 2002 and sold to E*Trade Bank.
Soltrus Inc 2001: provider of digital trust services for businesses and consumers to communicate and transact over digital networks owned by CIBC, Telus Corp and VeriSign Inc.
Aplettix Inc 2000: firm specializing in secure transaction systems in the banking sector; CIBC signed an agreement with the New York-based firm in 2000, but the project was later abandoned for alternatives such as VeriSign.


Privatebancorp 2017: A Chicago based bank founded in 1989 in Delaware with operations in 13 states mainly in the East Coast. Business focus is in middle market commercial banking, personal and small business banking, as well as private banking and investment management services.[26]

Caribbean and the West Indies[edit]
Main article: CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank




CIBC FirstCaribbean branch in Bridgetown, Barbados


In 1920, Canadian Bank of Commerce established its first branches in the West Indies in Bridgetown, Barbados and in Kingston, Jamaica. That same year it also opened branches in Port of Spain, Trinidad and Havana, Cuba. Its first branch in Mexico City opened in 1910. In 1957, the bank opened a branch in Nassau, the Bahamas, and in the subsequent years expanded its operations in Jamaica.
Between 1963 and 1988, the bank expanded its branch network in Barbados opened branches in St. Vincent, Antigua, and St Lucia. In 1988, CIBC sold 45% of its shares in CIBC Jamaica via a public share issue. Between 1993 and 1996, the bank restructured its holdings in the Caribbean, with the incorporation of CIBC West Indies Holdings Limited and CIBC Caribbean Limited. CIBC West Indies Holdings then sold 30% of its shares to the public. In 1997, CIBC issued 5 million shares in CIBC Bahamas Limited to the public.
On October 31, 2001, Barclays and CIBC agreed to combine their Caribbean operations to establish FirstCaribbean International Bank. CIBC bought Barclays' stake in 2006 to give it control of approximately 92% of FirstCaribbean, which was rebranded as CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank.[16] In 2010, CIBC acquired a 22.5% equity of Butterfield Bank of Bermuda.[27]
Restructuring and outsourcing[edit]

HP Intria Items (Intria Corp): Formed by CIBC with Hewlett Packard and Fiserv Canada in 1996; In 2005, CIBC acquired the remaining shares from Fiserv and Intria became a unit of CIBC
EDULINX Canada Corporation: Established in 1999; sold to Nelnet Canada Inc., the Canadian unit of Nelnet, Inc., in late 2004
Toronto Blue Jays Baseball Club: Granted a franchise for the MLB team in 1977 with partner Labatt's Breweries; sold its 10% stake to Rogers Media in 2000
CIBC Leadership Centre: Sold the King City, Ontario facility to Benchmark Hospitality in 2001 as the bank divested real estate or investments outside of its business strategies
TSYS: In 2002, signed a 10-year agreement with Total Systems Services Inc. of Columbus, Georgia to outsource credit card processing operations
Juniper Financial Corporation: The bank acquired the Wilmington, Delaware credit card issuer 2001 and sold to Barclays Bank in 2004[28]

Miscellaneous[edit]
Li Ka Shing, Hong Kong billionaire was the largest foreign shareholder in the bank for over two decades, but in early 2005 he sold his portion (est. C$1.2 billion) to establish a Canadian charity, the Li Ka Shing Foundation. CIBC was Mr. Li's choice for financing many of his Canadian ventures, like Husky Energy. Mr. Li had reportedly backed personal and commercial banking head Holger Kluge to succeed Al Flood as CEO of CIBC in 1999.
Corporate governance[edit]
CIBC is well known for its publicized battles of succession to the top position of President and CEO (formerly styled chairman and CEO until 2003 when the positions were separated). When Al Flood became CEO, one of his first acts was to fire his chief rival Paul Cantor. In 1999, the company saw a competition between Wood Gundy (now CIBC World Markets) chief John S. Hunkin and Personal/Commercial banking head Holger Kluge, with Kluge retiring after Hunkin became chairman. In February 2004, Hunkin forced his friend and heir-apparent, David Kassie, to resign as chairman and CEO of World Markets after several scandals in the US. Both men had waived their bonuses in 2002 after that year produced the worst results in the history of the bank. Kassie afterwards founded Genuity Capital and was alleged to have raided 20 key employees from World Markets for his new startup, causing CIBC to file suit.[29] Gerald T. McCaughey became Kassie's replacement heading World Markets and in February 2004, was promoted to President and chief operating officer, assuring his succession as CEO.[30] Shortly after assuming his position, McCaughey reportedly dismissed Jill Denham, Vice Chair of Retail Markets and a potential rival for the CEO post. Denham was reportedly a close ally of Hunkin and Kassie and McCaughey wanted to build his own senior executive team.[31]
Current senior executive team:

Victor Dodig - President and CEO
Mike Capatides - Chief Administrative Officer and General Counsel, Administration Division
Steve Geist - Senior Executive Vice-President and Group Head, Wealth Management
Kevin Glass - Senior Executive-Vice President, and chief financial officer
Laura Dottori-Attanasio - Senior Executive Vice-President and Chief Risk Officer, Risk Management
Harry Culham - Senior Executive Vice-President and Group Head, Capital Markets
Kevin Patterson - Senior Executive Vice-President, Technology and Operations
David Williamson - Senior Executive Vice-President, and Group Head, Retail and Business Banking

Current members of the board of directors:[32]

Brent S. Belzberg (2005); Senior Managing Partner, Torquest Partners Inc.
Gary F. Colter (2003); President, CRS Inc.
Patrick D. Daniel (2009); Past President and Chief Executive Officer, Enbridge Inc.
Luc Desjardins (2009); President and Chief Executive Officer, Superior Plus Corp.
Hon. Gordon D. Giffin (2001); Senior Partner, McKenna Long & Aldridge LLP
Linda S. Hasenfratz (2004); Chief Executive Officer, Linamar Corporation
Kevin J. Kelly (2013); Corporate Director
Nicholas D. Le Pan (2008); Corporate Director
Hon. John P. Manley, P.C., O.C. (2005); Chair of the Board
Victor G. Dodig (2014); President and Chief Executive Officer, CIBC
Jane L. Peverett (2009); Corporate Director
Katharine B. Stevenson (2011); Corporate Director
Martine Turcotte (2014); Vice Chair, Quebec, BCE Inc. and Bell Canada
Ronald W. Tysoe (2004); Corporate Director
Barry Zubrow (2015); President, ITB LLC

Sponsorships[edit]
As a founding partner of the Toronto Blue Jays baseball club, CIBC was the team's official bank until selling its ownership stake in 2000.[33]
CIBC partnered with Air Canada in 1991 to offer credit cards as part of the airline's loyalty program, Aeroplan. In 2009, the program announced that a new agreement with Toronto-Dominion Bank would be effective January 1, 2014.[34]
As part of its purchase of MasterCard from Citibank Canada in 2010, CIBC acquired the co-branded Petro-Canada rewards credit card and continues to jointly market the card.[21]
On October 27, 2011, CIBC announced a partnership with the PANAM Toronto 2015 Organizing Committee to become lead partner of the 2015 Pan American Games and 2015 Parapan American Games[35]
CIBC is an industry partner of the University of Waterloo Stratford Campus.[36]
Credit agency ratings[edit]
On October 26, 2012, rating agency Moody's Investors Service announced it would review the long-term ratings of CIBC along with other Canadian banks, because of concerns about consumer debt levels, housing prices, a sizable exposure to capital markets and more. The review resulted in a downgrade from Aa2 to Aa3 on January 28, 2013.[37]
Settlements and controversies[edit]



This section needs expansion. You can help by adding to it. (August 2010)


Enron[edit]
On December 22, 2003, the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) fined CIBC US$80 million for its role in the manipulation of Enron financial statements. This consists of $37.5 million to repay ill-gotten gains, a $37.5 million penalty and $5 million in interest. The money is intended to be returned to Enron fraud victims pursuant to the Fair Fund provisions of Section 308(a) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.[38]
The SEC also sued three of CIBC's executives. CIBC Executive Vice President Daniel Ferguson and former CIBC Executive Director Mark Wolf agreed to settle for US$563,000 and US$60,000, respectively. Ian Schottlaender, former managing director in CIBC's corporate leveraged finance group in New York initially contested the charges[39] but on July 12, 2004 he agreed to pay US$528,750 as well as be barred from serving as an officer or director of a publicly traded company for a period of five years.[40] Under these agreements the individuals neither admit nor deny wrongdoing.
The SEC complaint charges that "CIBC and the three executives with having helped Enron to mislead its investors through a series of complex structured finance transactions over a period of several years preceding Enron's bankruptcy." The agreement reached between the SEC and CIBC permanently enjoins CIBC from violating the antifraud, books and records, and internal control provisions of the federal securities laws.[38][39]
On August 2, 2005, CIBC paid US$2.4 billion to settle a class action lawsuit brought by a group of pension funds and investment managers, including the University of California, which claims that "systematic fraud by Enron and its officers led to the loss of billions and the collapse of the company."[41]
Market timing[edit]
On July 25, 2005 CIBC confirmed it would pay US$125 million to settle an investigation into its role in the 2003 Mutual-fund scandal. Linda Chatman Thomsen, director of the SEC's division of enforcement, said, "by knowingly financing customers' late trading and market timing, as well as providing financing in amounts far greater than the law allows, CIHI and World Markets boosted their customers' trading profits at the expense of long-term mutual fund shareholders."[42] Under the settlement, CIBC neither admitted nor denied the allegations.[43]
Visa cardholders[edit]
On August 27, 2004, CIBC confirmed that it would settle a class-action lawsuit on behalf of CIBC Visa cardholders. The plaintiffs alleged that the conversion of foreign-currency transactions resulted in an undisclosed or inadequately disclosed mark-up. After approval by an Ontario Superior Court judge, CIBC announced October 15, 2004, that the settlement would result in the bank paying C$13.85 million to its cardholders, $1 million to the United Way, $1.65 million to the Class Action Fund of the Law Society of Upper Canada, and $3 million in legal fees. The bank also announced that it has not admitted any liability and is settling to avoid further litigation with its cardholders.[44]
Voluntary refund of erroneous charges[edit]
On May 20, 2004, CIBC announced that it would refund C$24 million to some of its customers as a result of erroneous overdraft and mortgage charges which were discovered in the course of an internal review. "This is being done as part of CIBC's effort to correct its error and to ensure that it distributes to customers all of the money it received in error," the bank said.[45]
In a similar incident, CIBC announced April 27, 2006 that it's refunding an additional C$27 million to about 200,000 clients who were overcharged for certain overdraft fees and other borrowing transactions, some of which date back to 1993. In cases where clients were undercharged, the bank decided not to seek reimbursement.[46]
Privacy[edit]
2005[edit]
On April 18, 2005 the Privacy Commissioner of Canada expressed disappointment in the way CIBC dealt with incidents involving the bank misdirecting faxes containing customers' personal information.[47] One involved misdirecting faxes to a scrap yard operator in West Virginia from 2001 to 2004. The misdirected faxes contained the social security numbers, home addresses, phone numbers, and detailed bank account data of several hundred bank customers.[48]
The second incident involved a Dorval businessman and allegedly took place from 2000 to 2004. In both cases, the commissioner noted that the bank did not inform the affected clients, whose personal information was compromised, until the incidents became public and an investigation was underway.[49]
Within days of reports by CTV News and The Globe and Mail, CIBC management announced a directive that banned employees from using fax machines to transmit any documents containing confidential customer information.[50]
2007[edit]
On January 18, 2007, CIBC Asset Management announced that the personal information of about 470,000 current and former clients of Talvest Mutual Funds, a CIBC subsidiary, had gone missing. The information may have included client names, addresses, signatures, dates of birth, bank account numbers, beneficiary information and/or Social Insurance Numbers.[51] The incident stemmed from the disappearance of a hard drive containing information on "the process used to open and administer" customer accounts as it was traveling between the bank's Montreal and Toronto offices.[52] The Privacy Commissioner of Canada stated, "Although I appreciate that the bank notified us of this incident and that it is working cooperatively with my Office, I am nevertheless deeply troubled, especially given the magnitude of this breach, which puts at risk the personal information of hundreds of thousands of Canadians." She immediately launched a privacy investigation.[53]
Employee overtime[edit]
In June 2007, Dara Fresco, a Toronto teller, named CIBC in a $600 million class-action lawsuit regarding the lack of overtime pay to its customer service staff. Fresco v. Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce is a class action brought on behalf of current and former non-management, non-unionized employees of CIBC in Canada who are or were tellers or other front-line customer service employees working at CIBC retail branch office across Canada. The lawsuit alleges that class members are assigned heavier workloads than could be completed within their standard working hours. They were required or permitted to work overtime to meet the demands of their jobs and CIBC failed to pay for the overtime work in direct contravention of the Canada Labour Code under which they are regulated.[54]
The Ontario Superior Court dismissed the suit June 18, 2012, stating the evidence '"provides no basis in fact that there is a systemic practice of unpaid overtime at CIBC."'[55]
An employee of the Bank of Nova Scotia (Scotiabank) filed a similar suit which the Superior Court certified. Fresco and Scotiabank each appealed their adverse, and contradictory, rulings and the Ontario Court of Appeal ruled that both cases could proceed.[56]
Both banks appealed to the Supreme Court of Canada which on March 21, 2013, denied their requests and allowed the lawsuits to proceed.[57] The cases are awaiting further action as of late 2013.
Significant buildings[edit]

Commerce Court, Toronto
2 Bloor Street West, Toronto
CIBC 750 Lawrence, Toronto
Bell Trinity Square, Toronto
Brookfield Place, Toronto
Tour CIBC, Montreal
Bankers Hall East, Calgary
Commerce Place, Hamilton
Atrium on Bay

Gallery[edit]







Atrium on Bay in Toronto









Commerce Court in Toronto









CIBC Tower in Downtown Montreal









CIBC on Sparks Street in Downtown Ottawa









CIBC FirstCaribbean's regional head office, Warrens, St. Michael, Barbados









CIBC building in Halifax









750 Lawrence, Toronto









CIBC in Montreal









Commerce Place, Hamilton









Two Bloor West, Toronto









Toronto financial district




See also[edit]


Companies portal



CIBC Wealth Management

References[edit]


^ "A Short History of CIBC" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ Sawyer, Deborah C. "Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce". Thecanadianencyclopedia.com. Retrieved 2011-03-09. [dead link]
^ "Forbes Global 2000 List, 2013 edition". Forbes. Forbes.com. 17 April 2013. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Bloomberg Names CIBC Third Strongest Bank in The World". Today. Sint Maarten. 5 July 2012. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "History: Logos & Seals". CIBC. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Truell, Peter (19 July 1997). "Canadian Bank Is Expected to Buy Oppenheimer". The New York Times. NYTimes.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Pound, Richard W., ed. (2005). The Fitzhenry & Whiteside Book of Canadian Facts and Dates. Fitzhenry and Whiteside. ISBN 978-155041171-3. 
^ Ball, James (27 May 2013). "US tax inspector targets Caribbean bank". The Guardian. Manchester. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ a b "FirstCaribbean to be branded as 'CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank'". The Barbados Advocate. 21 June 2006. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Newman, James (13 February 2009). "Paper: CIBC to go after Republic Bank stake". BNamericas. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Rampersad, Curtis (7 February 2011). "Eyes on Republic". Trinidad and Tobago Express. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC continues market leadership by introducing further innovations to Mobile Banking for BlackBerry devices and other Internet-enabled smartphones" (Press release). CIBC. 25 February 2011. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Connors, John (13 April 2010). "CIBC iPhone app sees over 100,000 downloads in first month...expanded to other smartphones". Mobilesyrup.com. Retrieved 2011-03-09. 
^ a b "CIBC buys card portfolio from Citigroup MasterCard business". Toronto Star. thestar.com. The Canadian Press. 14 March 2010. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Trichur, Rita; Flavelle, Dana (18 October 2010). "CIBC rolls out Canada's first Visa-branded debit card". Toronto Star. thestar.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Alexander, Doug (11 April 2013). "CIBC Agrees to Buy Atlantic Trust for $210 Million". Bloomberg News. bloomberg.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Berman, David (June 29, 2016). "CIBC grows U.S. business with $3.8-billion deal for PrivateBancorp". The Globe and Mail. Retrieved July 5, 2016. 
^ BRADSHAW, CHRISTINA PELLEGRINI And JAMES (2017-04-12). "CIBC to move 15,000 staff to new downtown Toronto headquarters". Retrieved 2017-07-20. 
^ https://www.theprivatebank.com/about-the-privatebank/
^ Perkins, Tara (2 March 2010). "CIBC buys stake in Bermuda's Butterfield". The Globe and Mail. Toronto: Theglobeandmail.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC completes sale of ownership in Juniper Financial". Investment Executive. 1 December 2004. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Willis, Andrew (8 January 2005). "CIBC puts ethics on the line". The Globe & Mail. globeadvisor.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Gerald T. McCaughey, President and Chief Executive Officer, CIBC". CIBC. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Canadian Imperial's No.3 Executive Jill Denham Leaves". Bloomberg News. bloomberg.com. 11 April 2005. Retrieved 2013-11-21. [dead link]
^ "Board Members". CIBC. 
^ "1988 Toronto Blue Jays Baseball Pocket Schedule CIBC". eBay. 6 May 2013. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Alexander, Doug (27 June 2013). "Aimia Soars as TD Signs Aeroplan Card Agreement: Montreal Mover". Bloomberg News. bloomberg.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Schecter, Barbara (27 October 2011). "CIBC lead sponsor of Pan Am Games in 2015". Financial Post. financialpost.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Industry Partnerships". University of Waterloo. Retrieved 24 April 2014. 
^ "Moody's downgrades Canadian banks" (Press release). Moody's Investors Service. 28 January 2013. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ a b "SEC Announces Agreement with Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce and Two Executives to Settle Charges of Aiding and Abetting Enron Accounting Fraud". SEC.gov. 22 December 2003. Retrieved 2011-03-09. 
^ a b "CIBC pays $80m to settle Enron". CNN World Business. CNN.com. Reuters. 21 December 2003. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Securities and Exchange Commission v. Ian Schottlaender, U.S. H-03-5785 (Southern District of Texas 13 July 2004).
^ Bailey, Jeff (3 August 2005). "CIBC Pays to settle Enron Case". The New York Times. NYTimes.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Settled Administrative Proceeding Against Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce Subsidiaries" (Press release). SEC.gov. 20 July 2005. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Goldstein, Matthew (2 July 2005). "How CIBC Cashed in on Mutual Fund Fraud". TheStreet.com CBC News]. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC settles lawsuit over Visa foreign currency charges". CBC News. cbc.ca. 27 August 2004. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC overcharged customers $24M". CBC News. cbc.ca. 21 May 2004. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC to refund $27M to clients who were overcharged". CBC News. cbc.ca. 27 April 2006. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Failure of CIBC's privacy practices a wake-up call to businesses" (Press release). Privacy Commissioner of Canada. 18 April 2005. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Arin, David (26 November 2004). "CIBC faxes go to scrapyard". The Globe and Mail. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Addendum to CIBC fax incident summary" (Press release). Privacy Commissioner of Canada. 18 April 2005. Retrieved 2013-11-21. [dead link]
^ Fraser, David (26 November 2004). "Bank responds to incident by prohibiting faxing of customer information". Canadian Privacy Blog. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC loses data on 470,000 Talvest fund customers". CBC News. cbc.ca. 18 January 2007. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Pasternak, Sean B.; Alexander, Doug (18 January 2007). "CIBC's Talvest Mutual Funds Loses Client Data File". Bloomberg News. Bloomberg.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. [dead link]
^ "Privacy Commissioner launches investigation of CIBC breach of Talvest customers' personal information". Privacy Commissioner of Canada. 18 January 2007. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Cohen, Tobi (5 June 2007). "CIBC faces overtime lawsuit". Toronto Star. Thestar.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ McNish, Jacquie; Perkins, Tara (19 July 2009). "CIBC overtime lawsuit dismissed". The Globe and Mail. theglobeandmail.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Hasham, Alyshah (26 June 2012). "Lawsuits over denied overtime pay against CIBC, Scotiabank to go ahead". Toronto Star. thestar.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC, Scotiabank Overtime Lawsuit Gets OK From Supreme Court". The Huffington Post. The Canadian Press. 21 March 2013. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 



Biography


Victor Ross A History of the Canadian Bank of Commerce. (1920–1934)
Rupert Canadian Investment Bank Review. McGraw-Hill Ryerson, Limited 1992

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to CIBC.



Official Website







v
t
e


Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce






Chief Executive Officer: Victor G. Dodig








Fiscal year 2016 statistics
Net income: $4.3 billion CAD[1]
Market capitalization: $39.9 billion CAD[2]
Assets: $501.4 billion CAD[3]
Employees: 43,213 (FTE, 2016)[4]
Stock symbols: TSX: CM NYSE: CM
Website: www.cibc.com












Major brands by financial service








Master: CIBC
Financial group: CIBC
Canadian banking: CIBC
Caribbean banking: CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank
International banking: CIBC Private Wealth Management
Canadian mutual funds: CIBC Mutual Funds
Canadian brokerage: CIBC Investor's Edge and CIBC Wood Gundy
Canadian insurance: CIBC Insurance
Capital markets: CIBC World Markets
Custodial: CIBC Mellon















v
t
e


Banks and credit unions in Canada








Banks








Big Five




Bank of Montreal
Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce (President's Choice Financial)
Royal Bank of Canada
Scotiabank (Tangerine)
Toronto-Dominion Bank (TD Canada Trust)






Other banks




AMEX Bank of Canada
Bridgewater Bank
Business Development Bank of Canada
Canadian Tire Financial Services
Canadian Western Bank
Citibank Canada
Equitable Bank
Exchange Bank of Canada
First Nations Bank of Canada
HSBC Bank Canada
ICICI Bank Canada
Laurentian Bank of Canada
Manulife Bank of Canada
Meridian Bank
National Bank of Canada
Rogers Bank
Vancity Community Investment Bank
VersaBank
Wealth One Bank of Canada
















Credit unions








Credit unions




Affinity Credit Union
Aldergrove Credit Union
Alterna Savings
Assiniboine Credit Union
BlueShore Financial
Central 1 Credit Union
Coast Capital Savings
Concentra Financial
Conexus Credit Union
Credit Union Central of Canada
Desjardins Group
Envision Financial
First Calgary Financial
First West Credit Union
Gulf and Fraser Fishermen's Credit Union
Island Savings
Kawartha Credit Union
Kootenay Savings Credit Union
Libro Financial Group
Meridian Credit Union
Mouvement des caisses populaires acadiennes
Servus Credit Union
Steinbach Credit Union
TCU Financial Group
Vancity
Windsor Family Credit Union
Your Credit Union
Your Neighbourhood Credit Union






Credit union deposit insurance


Alberta * British Columbia * Manitoba * New Brunswick * Newfoundland and Labrador * Nova Scotia * Ontario * Prince Edward Island * Saskatchewan














Other financial institutions








Federal financial institutions


Farm Credit Canada




Provincial financial institutions




ATB Financial


















v
t
e


S&P/TSX 60 companies of Canada (February 22, 2016)






Agnico Eagle Mines
Agrium
ARC Resources
Bank of Montreal
Barrick Gold
BCE Inc.
BlackBerry
Bombardier
Brookfield Asset Management
Cameco
Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce
Canadian National
Canadian Natural Resources
Canadian Pacific
Canadian Tire
CCL Industries
Cenovus Energy
CGI Group
Constellation Software
Couche-Tard
Crescent Point Energy
Dollarama
Emera
Enbridge
Encana
First Quantum Minerals
Franco-Nevada
Fortis Inc.
Gildan
Goldcorp
Husky Energy
Imperial Oil
Inter Pipeline
Kinross Gold
Loblaw Companies
Magna International
Manulife Financial
Metro
National Bank of Canada
Pembina Pipeline
PotashCorp
Power Corporation
Restaurant Brands International
Rogers Communications
Royal Bank of Canada
Saputo
Scotiabank
Shaw Communications
Silver Wheaton
SNC-Lavalin
Sun Life Financial
Suncor Energy
Teck
Telus
Thomson Reuters
Toronto-Dominion Bank
TransCanada
Valeant
Weston
Waste Connections












v
t
e


Great Recession



By region



Africa
Americas

United States
South America


Asia
Europe
Oceania





United States-specific



Automotive industry crisis
California budget crisis
Housing bubble
Housing market correction
Subprime mortgage crisis





Banking losses and fraud



Anglo Irish Bank hidden loans controversy
Libor scandal

Tom Hayes


Société Générale trading loss
Forex scandal
Seán FitzPatrick
Bernard Madoff
Tom Petters
Scott W. Rothstein
Allen Stanford





Government entities



Consumer Financial Protection Bureau
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
Federal Home Loan Banks
Federal Housing Administration
Federal Housing Finance Agency
Federal Housing Finance Board
Federal Reserve System
Government National Mortgage Association
Irish Bank Resolution Corporation
National Asset Management Agency
Office of Federal Housing Enterprise Oversight
Office of Financial Stability
UK Financial Investments










Government policy and spending responses



Banking and finance
stability and reform



Anglo Irish Bank Corporation Act 2009
Banking (Special Provisions) Act 2008
China–Japan–South Korea trilateral summit
Commercial Paper Funding Facility
Dodd–Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act
Emergency Economic Stabilization Act of 2008
Irish emergency budget, 2009
Irish budget, 2010
Irish budget, 2011
Irish budget, 2012
Irish budget, 2013
Temporary Liquidity Guarantee Program
Term Asset-Backed Securities Loan Facility
Troubled Asset Relief Program
2008 United Kingdom bank rescue package




Bank stress tests



EU
U.S.








Stimulus and recovery



2008 European Union stimulus plan
2008–09 Keynesian resurgence
American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009
Chinese economic stimulus program
Economic Stimulus Act of 2008
Fraud Enforcement and Recovery Act of 2009
Green New Deal
Housing and Economic Recovery Act of 2008
National fiscal policy response to the Great Recession
Zero interest-rate policy





Government interventions,
rescues, and acquisitions



List of banks acquired or bankrupted during the Great Recession




Non-banking



Chrysler
General Motors











Securities involved
and financial markets



Auction rate securities
Collateralized debt obligations
Collateralized mortgage obligations
Credit default swaps
Mortgage-backed securities
Secondary mortgage market





Social responses



Tea Party protests (United States; c. 2009)
May Day protests (Europe, Middle East and North Africa, Asia; 2009)
Occupy movement (worldwide)





Related topics



2000s energy crisis

Central Asia: 2008


Effects on museums
Decline of newspapers
World food price crisis








European debt crisis
Financial crisis of 2007–08
List of countries by public debt







^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Canadian_Imperial_Bank_of_Commerce&oldid=791515423"					
Categories: S&P/TSX 60 IndexS&P/TSX Composite IndexCanadian Imperial Bank of CommerceCompanies listed on the Toronto Stock ExchangeCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeCompanies based in TorontoBanks of CanadaBanks established in 1961Mortgage lenders of Canada1961 establishments in OntarioHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from June 2017Pages using deprecated image syntaxArticles containing French-language textArticles to be expanded from August 2010All articles to be expandedArticles using small message boxes 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


DeutschفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa Indonesia日本語PortuguêsРусскийSuomiதமிழ்中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 20 July 2017, at 19:45.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce - Wikipedia






















 






Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from CIBC)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

"CIBC" redirects here. For other uses, see CIBC (disambiguation).

Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce





Type

Public


Traded as
TSX: CM
NYSE: CM
S&P/TSX 60 component


Industry
Financial Services, banking


Founded
1961
(Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce)
1875
(Imperial Bank of Canada)
1867
(Canadian Bank of Commerce)[1]


Headquarters
Commerce Court
Toronto, Ontario, Canada



Key people


Victor G. Dodig, President and CEO[2]
John Manley, Chair of the Board[3]


Revenue
 C$15.0 billion (2016)[4]



Net income

 C$4.3 billion (2016)[5]


Total assets
 C$501.357 billion (2016)[6]



Number of employees

43,213 (FTE, 2016)[7]


Subsidiaries
CIBC Holdings (Cayman) Limited
CIBC World Markets
CIBC Trust Corporation
CIBC Asset Management Inc.[8]


Website
www.cibc.com


The Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce (French: Banque Canadienne Impériale de Commerce), commonly referred to as CIBC, is one of the Big Five banks in Canada. The bank is headquartered at Commerce Court in Toronto, Ontario.[9] CIBC's Institution Number (or bank number) is 010, and its SWIFT code is CIBCCATT.
The bank has three strategic business units: Retail and Business Banking, Wealth Management, and Capital Markets. It has international operations in the United States, the Caribbean, Asia, and Europe. Globally, CIBC serves more than eleven million clients, and has over 40,000 employees. The company ranks at number 172 on the Forbes Global 2000 listing.[10] CIBC was named the strongest bank in North America and the 3rd strongest bank in the world, by Bloomberg Markets magazine.[11]



Contents


1 History

1.1 Origins
1.2 Forming Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce
1.3 Present


2 Notable corporate activities and international operations

2.1 North America
2.2 Caribbean and the West Indies
2.3 Restructuring and outsourcing
2.4 Miscellaneous


3 Corporate governance
4 Sponsorships
5 Credit agency ratings
6 Settlements and controversies

6.1 Enron
6.2 Market timing
6.3 Visa cardholders
6.4 Voluntary refund of erroneous charges
6.5 Privacy

6.5.1 2005
6.5.2 2007


6.6 Employee overtime


7 Significant buildings

7.1 Gallery


8 See also
9 References
10 External links



History[edit]
The Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce, as it is known today, came into being in 1961. The bank was formed through the merger of the Canadian Bank of Commerce and the Imperial Bank of Canada. At the time, they were two of Canada's largest banks.
Origins[edit]




Commerce Building (c. 1930), now known as Commerce Court North in Toronto


Main articles: Canadian Bank of Commerce and Imperial Bank of Canada
The Honourable William McMaster founded the Canadian Bank of Commerce which opened on May 15, 1867, in Toronto as competition for the Bank of Montreal; by 1874 it had 24 branches.
The Imperial Bank of Canada opened in Toronto on March 18, 1875, founded by former Commerce Vice-president Henry Stark Howland.
By the end of 1895, the Canadian Bank of Commerce had grown to 58 branches and the Imperial Bank of Canada to 18.
The 1896 gold strike in the Yukon prompted the Dominion Government to ask the Canadian Bank of Commerce to open a branch in Dawson City. Acquisitions in the 1920s caused the Commerce Bank to become one of the strongest branch networks in Canada with over 700 local branches; and the bank opened international branches in Cuba, Jamaica, Barbados and Trinidad during the same period.
Wood, Gundy & Company, the precursor of CIBC's investment banking arm, opened its doors on February 1, 1905. During World War I, it took a prominent and active role in the organization of Victory Loans.
The Canadian Bank of Commerce opened its new head office in Toronto in 1931. An observation gallery on the 32nd floor attracted visitors who could get an aerial view of the city.
In 1936, the Commerce was the first Canadian bank to establish a personal loans department.
Following World War II, both banks opened new branches. Although the banks had been barred from the mortgage business since 1871, the Canadian government now called upon them to provide mortgage services. So, in 1954, Canadian banks started offering mortgages for new construction.
Forming Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce[edit]
In 1960, Imperial chairman Stuart Mackersy approached Neil McKinnon the President of the Commerce with a proposal to merge the two banks. This followed a decade of expansion in the Canadian economy and Canada's capitalization of the industrialization of its natural resources. They quickly reached a deal between the two banks.




The newly merged CIBC commissioned a new logo to commemorate its 100th year of operation. The "chevron" logo was in use until 1994[12]


On June 1, 1961, the Canadian Bank of Commerce and the Imperial Bank of Canada merged to form the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce with over 1,200 branches across Canada. The new bank possessed the greatest resources and the most branches of any bank in the country.
Following the merger, the new bank commissioned a new head office. While planning to retain Commerce Court North, the bank hired architect I. M. Pei to design a three-building complex. The result was Commerce Court consisting of a landscaped courtyard complementing the existing building and included the newly built 786 feet (240 m) Commerce Court West. When completed in 1973, the 57-storey building was the tallest in Canada, and the largest stainless-steel-clad building in the world.
In 1967, both Canada and CIBC celebrated their centenaries and CIBC was the only chartered bank to have a branch on-site at Expo 67. Also at this time computerization began to change banking services and the Yonge and Bloor branch in Toronto was the first Canadian bank branch to update customer bank books via computer. This also marked the introduction of inter-branch banking. Before the decade was out, CIBC had introduced the first 24-hour cash dispenser, which would eventually become the ATM.
Changes to federal and provincial regulations ending the separation of banks, investment dealers, trust companies and insurance companies came in 1987. CIBC quickly took advantage of this and became the first Canadian bank to operate an investment dealer, CIBC Securities, offering services to the public.
In 1988, CIBC acquired a majority interest in Wood Gundy which brought a well-respected name and reputation in underwriting. Shortly thereafter, the corporation merged Wood Gundy and CIBC Securities under the name CIBC Wood Gundy which became CIBC Oppenheimer in 1997[13] and later, CIBC World Markets.
In 1992, CIBC introduced automated telephone banking; in 1995 the bank launched its website, and shortly thereafter began offering banking services online. In 1998, CIBC joined with Loblaws to create President's Choice Financial which it launched in 28 Ottawa area stores.
Present[edit]
CIBC agreed to merge with the Toronto-Dominion Bank in 1998. However the Government of Canada, at the recommendation of then Finance Minister Paul Martin, blocked the merger – as well as another proposed by the Bank of Montreal with the Royal Bank of Canada – as not in the best interest of Canadians.[14]
CIBC sold its corporate and purchasing credit card business to U.S. Bank Canada in October 2006 which joined it with business charge cards it previously acquired from Royal Bank of Canada.
In 2006, the stock ticker symbol on the New York Stock Exchange changed from BCM to CM to bring it in line with the ticker symbol on the Toronto Stock Exchange.
In December 2006, CIBC acquired majority control of its publicly held joint venture FirstCaribbean International Bank for just over US$1 billion, (Bds$2 billion), when it purchased the 43.7% stake owned by Barclays Bank.[15] CIBC rebranded the division CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank in 2011.[16]
On February 12, 2009, the Trinidad and Tobago Express reported that CIBC was pursuing discussions to buy CL Financial's stake in the Republic Bank of Trinidad and Tobago.[17] As part of a "bail out" agreement of CL Financial by the government of Trinidad and Tobago during the Global financial crisis of 2008–2009, the corporation was required to sell Republic and other assets. As of February 2011, CL Financial had yet to agree to a sale.[18]
In February, 2010 CIBC became the first chartered bank in Canada to launch a mobile banking iPhone App. It surpassed 100,000 downloads in just over one month following launch, with over 1 million client logins to CIBC Mobile Banking since its introduction.[19][20]
Four months later, the bank announced it signed a deal to buy a C$2.1-billion credit card portfolio from Citigroup's Citibank Canada MasterCard business.[21]
Finally in October of that year, CIBC announced that it would be the first bank in Canada to introduce the internationally used Visa-branded debit card.[22]
In April 2013, CIBC reached an agreement with Invesco to acquire Atlantic Trust, the company's wealth management unit for US$210 million.[23]
CIBC announced in June 2016 that it would acquire the Chicago-based commercial bank PrivateBancorp for US$3.8 billion.[24]
In April 2017, it was announced that CIBC would be moving its headquarters to CIBC Square.[25]
Notable corporate activities and international operations[edit]
North America[edit]

CIBC Mellon Global Securities Services: formed by CIBC and Mellon Bank Corp. (now Bank of New York Mellon) of Pittsburgh PA 1996 and Canada Trust's (now TD Canada Trust) pension and custody business in 1997
Canadian Eastern Finance Limited (CEF): formed by CIBC and Hutchison Whampoa of Hong Kong; includes CEF Capital Limited, CEF Investment Management Limited
President's Choice Financial: A joint venture between CIBC and Loblaw Companies Limited; Banking services such as deposit accounts, investments and credit products (excluding MasterCard) are provided by a division of CIBC Retail Markets, formerly Amicus Bank. In 2005 Amicus was dissolved as a separate legal entity.
Amicus FSB: A similar setup as President's Choice Financial, it was created in 1999 in the United States with Winn Dixie and Safeway Inc. under the Marketplace Bank and Safeway Select Bank brands. It was disbanded in 2002 and sold to E*Trade Bank.
Soltrus Inc 2001: provider of digital trust services for businesses and consumers to communicate and transact over digital networks owned by CIBC, Telus Corp and VeriSign Inc.
Aplettix Inc 2000: firm specializing in secure transaction systems in the banking sector; CIBC signed an agreement with the New York-based firm in 2000, but the project was later abandoned for alternatives such as VeriSign.


Privatebancorp 2017: A Chicago based bank founded in 1989 in Delaware with operations in 13 states mainly in the East Coast. Business focus is in middle market commercial banking, personal and small business banking, as well as private banking and investment management services.[26]

Caribbean and the West Indies[edit]
Main article: CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank




CIBC FirstCaribbean branch in Bridgetown, Barbados


In 1920, Canadian Bank of Commerce established its first branches in the West Indies in Bridgetown, Barbados and in Kingston, Jamaica. That same year it also opened branches in Port of Spain, Trinidad and Havana, Cuba. Its first branch in Mexico City opened in 1910. In 1957, the bank opened a branch in Nassau, the Bahamas, and in the subsequent years expanded its operations in Jamaica.
Between 1963 and 1988, the bank expanded its branch network in Barbados opened branches in St. Vincent, Antigua, and St Lucia. In 1988, CIBC sold 45% of its shares in CIBC Jamaica via a public share issue. Between 1993 and 1996, the bank restructured its holdings in the Caribbean, with the incorporation of CIBC West Indies Holdings Limited and CIBC Caribbean Limited. CIBC West Indies Holdings then sold 30% of its shares to the public. In 1997, CIBC issued 5 million shares in CIBC Bahamas Limited to the public.
On October 31, 2001, Barclays and CIBC agreed to combine their Caribbean operations to establish FirstCaribbean International Bank. CIBC bought Barclays' stake in 2006 to give it control of approximately 92% of FirstCaribbean, which was rebranded as CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank.[16] In 2010, CIBC acquired a 22.5% equity of Butterfield Bank of Bermuda.[27]
Restructuring and outsourcing[edit]

HP Intria Items (Intria Corp): Formed by CIBC with Hewlett Packard and Fiserv Canada in 1996; In 2005, CIBC acquired the remaining shares from Fiserv and Intria became a unit of CIBC
EDULINX Canada Corporation: Established in 1999; sold to Nelnet Canada Inc., the Canadian unit of Nelnet, Inc., in late 2004
Toronto Blue Jays Baseball Club: Granted a franchise for the MLB team in 1977 with partner Labatt's Breweries; sold its 10% stake to Rogers Media in 2000
CIBC Leadership Centre: Sold the King City, Ontario facility to Benchmark Hospitality in 2001 as the bank divested real estate or investments outside of its business strategies
TSYS: In 2002, signed a 10-year agreement with Total Systems Services Inc. of Columbus, Georgia to outsource credit card processing operations
Juniper Financial Corporation: The bank acquired the Wilmington, Delaware credit card issuer 2001 and sold to Barclays Bank in 2004[28]

Miscellaneous[edit]
Li Ka Shing, Hong Kong billionaire was the largest foreign shareholder in the bank for over two decades, but in early 2005 he sold his portion (est. C$1.2 billion) to establish a Canadian charity, the Li Ka Shing Foundation. CIBC was Mr. Li's choice for financing many of his Canadian ventures, like Husky Energy. Mr. Li had reportedly backed personal and commercial banking head Holger Kluge to succeed Al Flood as CEO of CIBC in 1999.
Corporate governance[edit]
CIBC is well known for its publicized battles of succession to the top position of President and CEO (formerly styled chairman and CEO until 2003 when the positions were separated). When Al Flood became CEO, one of his first acts was to fire his chief rival Paul Cantor. In 1999, the company saw a competition between Wood Gundy (now CIBC World Markets) chief John S. Hunkin and Personal/Commercial banking head Holger Kluge, with Kluge retiring after Hunkin became chairman. In February 2004, Hunkin forced his friend and heir-apparent, David Kassie, to resign as chairman and CEO of World Markets after several scandals in the US. Both men had waived their bonuses in 2002 after that year produced the worst results in the history of the bank. Kassie afterwards founded Genuity Capital and was alleged to have raided 20 key employees from World Markets for his new startup, causing CIBC to file suit.[29] Gerald T. McCaughey became Kassie's replacement heading World Markets and in February 2004, was promoted to President and chief operating officer, assuring his succession as CEO.[30] Shortly after assuming his position, McCaughey reportedly dismissed Jill Denham, Vice Chair of Retail Markets and a potential rival for the CEO post. Denham was reportedly a close ally of Hunkin and Kassie and McCaughey wanted to build his own senior executive team.[31]
Current senior executive team:

Victor Dodig - President and CEO
Mike Capatides - Chief Administrative Officer and General Counsel, Administration Division
Steve Geist - Senior Executive Vice-President and Group Head, Wealth Management
Kevin Glass - Senior Executive-Vice President, and chief financial officer
Laura Dottori-Attanasio - Senior Executive Vice-President and Chief Risk Officer, Risk Management
Harry Culham - Senior Executive Vice-President and Group Head, Capital Markets
Kevin Patterson - Senior Executive Vice-President, Technology and Operations
David Williamson - Senior Executive Vice-President, and Group Head, Retail and Business Banking

Current members of the board of directors:[32]

Brent S. Belzberg (2005); Senior Managing Partner, Torquest Partners Inc.
Gary F. Colter (2003); President, CRS Inc.
Patrick D. Daniel (2009); Past President and Chief Executive Officer, Enbridge Inc.
Luc Desjardins (2009); President and Chief Executive Officer, Superior Plus Corp.
Hon. Gordon D. Giffin (2001); Senior Partner, McKenna Long & Aldridge LLP
Linda S. Hasenfratz (2004); Chief Executive Officer, Linamar Corporation
Kevin J. Kelly (2013); Corporate Director
Nicholas D. Le Pan (2008); Corporate Director
Hon. John P. Manley, P.C., O.C. (2005); Chair of the Board
Victor G. Dodig (2014); President and Chief Executive Officer, CIBC
Jane L. Peverett (2009); Corporate Director
Katharine B. Stevenson (2011); Corporate Director
Martine Turcotte (2014); Vice Chair, Quebec, BCE Inc. and Bell Canada
Ronald W. Tysoe (2004); Corporate Director
Barry Zubrow (2015); President, ITB LLC

Sponsorships[edit]
As a founding partner of the Toronto Blue Jays baseball club, CIBC was the team's official bank until selling its ownership stake in 2000.[33]
CIBC partnered with Air Canada in 1991 to offer credit cards as part of the airline's loyalty program, Aeroplan. In 2009, the program announced that a new agreement with Toronto-Dominion Bank would be effective January 1, 2014.[34]
As part of its purchase of MasterCard from Citibank Canada in 2010, CIBC acquired the co-branded Petro-Canada rewards credit card and continues to jointly market the card.[21]
On October 27, 2011, CIBC announced a partnership with the PANAM Toronto 2015 Organizing Committee to become lead partner of the 2015 Pan American Games and 2015 Parapan American Games[35]
CIBC is an industry partner of the University of Waterloo Stratford Campus.[36]
Credit agency ratings[edit]
On October 26, 2012, rating agency Moody's Investors Service announced it would review the long-term ratings of CIBC along with other Canadian banks, because of concerns about consumer debt levels, housing prices, a sizable exposure to capital markets and more. The review resulted in a downgrade from Aa2 to Aa3 on January 28, 2013.[37]
Settlements and controversies[edit]



This section needs expansion. You can help by adding to it. (August 2010)


Enron[edit]
On December 22, 2003, the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) fined CIBC US$80 million for its role in the manipulation of Enron financial statements. This consists of $37.5 million to repay ill-gotten gains, a $37.5 million penalty and $5 million in interest. The money is intended to be returned to Enron fraud victims pursuant to the Fair Fund provisions of Section 308(a) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.[38]
The SEC also sued three of CIBC's executives. CIBC Executive Vice President Daniel Ferguson and former CIBC Executive Director Mark Wolf agreed to settle for US$563,000 and US$60,000, respectively. Ian Schottlaender, former managing director in CIBC's corporate leveraged finance group in New York initially contested the charges[39] but on July 12, 2004 he agreed to pay US$528,750 as well as be barred from serving as an officer or director of a publicly traded company for a period of five years.[40] Under these agreements the individuals neither admit nor deny wrongdoing.
The SEC complaint charges that "CIBC and the three executives with having helped Enron to mislead its investors through a series of complex structured finance transactions over a period of several years preceding Enron's bankruptcy." The agreement reached between the SEC and CIBC permanently enjoins CIBC from violating the antifraud, books and records, and internal control provisions of the federal securities laws.[38][39]
On August 2, 2005, CIBC paid US$2.4 billion to settle a class action lawsuit brought by a group of pension funds and investment managers, including the University of California, which claims that "systematic fraud by Enron and its officers led to the loss of billions and the collapse of the company."[41]
Market timing[edit]
On July 25, 2005 CIBC confirmed it would pay US$125 million to settle an investigation into its role in the 2003 Mutual-fund scandal. Linda Chatman Thomsen, director of the SEC's division of enforcement, said, "by knowingly financing customers' late trading and market timing, as well as providing financing in amounts far greater than the law allows, CIHI and World Markets boosted their customers' trading profits at the expense of long-term mutual fund shareholders."[42] Under the settlement, CIBC neither admitted nor denied the allegations.[43]
Visa cardholders[edit]
On August 27, 2004, CIBC confirmed that it would settle a class-action lawsuit on behalf of CIBC Visa cardholders. The plaintiffs alleged that the conversion of foreign-currency transactions resulted in an undisclosed or inadequately disclosed mark-up. After approval by an Ontario Superior Court judge, CIBC announced October 15, 2004, that the settlement would result in the bank paying C$13.85 million to its cardholders, $1 million to the United Way, $1.65 million to the Class Action Fund of the Law Society of Upper Canada, and $3 million in legal fees. The bank also announced that it has not admitted any liability and is settling to avoid further litigation with its cardholders.[44]
Voluntary refund of erroneous charges[edit]
On May 20, 2004, CIBC announced that it would refund C$24 million to some of its customers as a result of erroneous overdraft and mortgage charges which were discovered in the course of an internal review. "This is being done as part of CIBC's effort to correct its error and to ensure that it distributes to customers all of the money it received in error," the bank said.[45]
In a similar incident, CIBC announced April 27, 2006 that it's refunding an additional C$27 million to about 200,000 clients who were overcharged for certain overdraft fees and other borrowing transactions, some of which date back to 1993. In cases where clients were undercharged, the bank decided not to seek reimbursement.[46]
Privacy[edit]
2005[edit]
On April 18, 2005 the Privacy Commissioner of Canada expressed disappointment in the way CIBC dealt with incidents involving the bank misdirecting faxes containing customers' personal information.[47] One involved misdirecting faxes to a scrap yard operator in West Virginia from 2001 to 2004. The misdirected faxes contained the social security numbers, home addresses, phone numbers, and detailed bank account data of several hundred bank customers.[48]
The second incident involved a Dorval businessman and allegedly took place from 2000 to 2004. In both cases, the commissioner noted that the bank did not inform the affected clients, whose personal information was compromised, until the incidents became public and an investigation was underway.[49]
Within days of reports by CTV News and The Globe and Mail, CIBC management announced a directive that banned employees from using fax machines to transmit any documents containing confidential customer information.[50]
2007[edit]
On January 18, 2007, CIBC Asset Management announced that the personal information of about 470,000 current and former clients of Talvest Mutual Funds, a CIBC subsidiary, had gone missing. The information may have included client names, addresses, signatures, dates of birth, bank account numbers, beneficiary information and/or Social Insurance Numbers.[51] The incident stemmed from the disappearance of a hard drive containing information on "the process used to open and administer" customer accounts as it was traveling between the bank's Montreal and Toronto offices.[52] The Privacy Commissioner of Canada stated, "Although I appreciate that the bank notified us of this incident and that it is working cooperatively with my Office, I am nevertheless deeply troubled, especially given the magnitude of this breach, which puts at risk the personal information of hundreds of thousands of Canadians." She immediately launched a privacy investigation.[53]
Employee overtime[edit]
In June 2007, Dara Fresco, a Toronto teller, named CIBC in a $600 million class-action lawsuit regarding the lack of overtime pay to its customer service staff. Fresco v. Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce is a class action brought on behalf of current and former non-management, non-unionized employees of CIBC in Canada who are or were tellers or other front-line customer service employees working at CIBC retail branch office across Canada. The lawsuit alleges that class members are assigned heavier workloads than could be completed within their standard working hours. They were required or permitted to work overtime to meet the demands of their jobs and CIBC failed to pay for the overtime work in direct contravention of the Canada Labour Code under which they are regulated.[54]
The Ontario Superior Court dismissed the suit June 18, 2012, stating the evidence '"provides no basis in fact that there is a systemic practice of unpaid overtime at CIBC."'[55]
An employee of the Bank of Nova Scotia (Scotiabank) filed a similar suit which the Superior Court certified. Fresco and Scotiabank each appealed their adverse, and contradictory, rulings and the Ontario Court of Appeal ruled that both cases could proceed.[56]
Both banks appealed to the Supreme Court of Canada which on March 21, 2013, denied their requests and allowed the lawsuits to proceed.[57] The cases are awaiting further action as of late 2013.
Significant buildings[edit]

Commerce Court, Toronto
2 Bloor Street West, Toronto
CIBC 750 Lawrence, Toronto
Bell Trinity Square, Toronto
Brookfield Place, Toronto
Tour CIBC, Montreal
Bankers Hall East, Calgary
Commerce Place, Hamilton
Atrium on Bay

Gallery[edit]







Atrium on Bay in Toronto









Commerce Court in Toronto









CIBC Tower in Downtown Montreal









CIBC on Sparks Street in Downtown Ottawa









CIBC FirstCaribbean's regional head office, Warrens, St. Michael, Barbados









CIBC building in Halifax









750 Lawrence, Toronto









CIBC in Montreal









Commerce Place, Hamilton









Two Bloor West, Toronto









Toronto financial district




See also[edit]


Companies portal



CIBC Wealth Management

References[edit]


^ "A Short History of CIBC" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ Sawyer, Deborah C. "Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce". Thecanadianencyclopedia.com. Retrieved 2011-03-09. [dead link]
^ "Forbes Global 2000 List, 2013 edition". Forbes. Forbes.com. 17 April 2013. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Bloomberg Names CIBC Third Strongest Bank in The World". Today. Sint Maarten. 5 July 2012. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "History: Logos & Seals". CIBC. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Truell, Peter (19 July 1997). "Canadian Bank Is Expected to Buy Oppenheimer". The New York Times. NYTimes.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Pound, Richard W., ed. (2005). The Fitzhenry & Whiteside Book of Canadian Facts and Dates. Fitzhenry and Whiteside. ISBN 978-155041171-3. 
^ Ball, James (27 May 2013). "US tax inspector targets Caribbean bank". The Guardian. Manchester. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ a b "FirstCaribbean to be branded as 'CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank'". The Barbados Advocate. 21 June 2006. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Newman, James (13 February 2009). "Paper: CIBC to go after Republic Bank stake". BNamericas. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Rampersad, Curtis (7 February 2011). "Eyes on Republic". Trinidad and Tobago Express. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC continues market leadership by introducing further innovations to Mobile Banking for BlackBerry devices and other Internet-enabled smartphones" (Press release). CIBC. 25 February 2011. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Connors, John (13 April 2010). "CIBC iPhone app sees over 100,000 downloads in first month...expanded to other smartphones". Mobilesyrup.com. Retrieved 2011-03-09. 
^ a b "CIBC buys card portfolio from Citigroup MasterCard business". Toronto Star. thestar.com. The Canadian Press. 14 March 2010. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Trichur, Rita; Flavelle, Dana (18 October 2010). "CIBC rolls out Canada's first Visa-branded debit card". Toronto Star. thestar.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Alexander, Doug (11 April 2013). "CIBC Agrees to Buy Atlantic Trust for $210 Million". Bloomberg News. bloomberg.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Berman, David (June 29, 2016). "CIBC grows U.S. business with $3.8-billion deal for PrivateBancorp". The Globe and Mail. Retrieved July 5, 2016. 
^ BRADSHAW, CHRISTINA PELLEGRINI And JAMES (2017-04-12). "CIBC to move 15,000 staff to new downtown Toronto headquarters". Retrieved 2017-07-20. 
^ https://www.theprivatebank.com/about-the-privatebank/
^ Perkins, Tara (2 March 2010). "CIBC buys stake in Bermuda's Butterfield". The Globe and Mail. Toronto: Theglobeandmail.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC completes sale of ownership in Juniper Financial". Investment Executive. 1 December 2004. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Willis, Andrew (8 January 2005). "CIBC puts ethics on the line". The Globe & Mail. globeadvisor.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Gerald T. McCaughey, President and Chief Executive Officer, CIBC". CIBC. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Canadian Imperial's No.3 Executive Jill Denham Leaves". Bloomberg News. bloomberg.com. 11 April 2005. Retrieved 2013-11-21. [dead link]
^ "Board Members". CIBC. 
^ "1988 Toronto Blue Jays Baseball Pocket Schedule CIBC". eBay. 6 May 2013. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Alexander, Doug (27 June 2013). "Aimia Soars as TD Signs Aeroplan Card Agreement: Montreal Mover". Bloomberg News. bloomberg.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Schecter, Barbara (27 October 2011). "CIBC lead sponsor of Pan Am Games in 2015". Financial Post. financialpost.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Industry Partnerships". University of Waterloo. Retrieved 24 April 2014. 
^ "Moody's downgrades Canadian banks" (Press release). Moody's Investors Service. 28 January 2013. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ a b "SEC Announces Agreement with Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce and Two Executives to Settle Charges of Aiding and Abetting Enron Accounting Fraud". SEC.gov. 22 December 2003. Retrieved 2011-03-09. 
^ a b "CIBC pays $80m to settle Enron". CNN World Business. CNN.com. Reuters. 21 December 2003. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Securities and Exchange Commission v. Ian Schottlaender, U.S. H-03-5785 (Southern District of Texas 13 July 2004).
^ Bailey, Jeff (3 August 2005). "CIBC Pays to settle Enron Case". The New York Times. NYTimes.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Settled Administrative Proceeding Against Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce Subsidiaries" (Press release). SEC.gov. 20 July 2005. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Goldstein, Matthew (2 July 2005). "How CIBC Cashed in on Mutual Fund Fraud". TheStreet.com CBC News]. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC settles lawsuit over Visa foreign currency charges". CBC News. cbc.ca. 27 August 2004. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC overcharged customers $24M". CBC News. cbc.ca. 21 May 2004. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC to refund $27M to clients who were overcharged". CBC News. cbc.ca. 27 April 2006. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Failure of CIBC's privacy practices a wake-up call to businesses" (Press release). Privacy Commissioner of Canada. 18 April 2005. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Arin, David (26 November 2004). "CIBC faxes go to scrapyard". The Globe and Mail. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "Addendum to CIBC fax incident summary" (Press release). Privacy Commissioner of Canada. 18 April 2005. Retrieved 2013-11-21. [dead link]
^ Fraser, David (26 November 2004). "Bank responds to incident by prohibiting faxing of customer information". Canadian Privacy Blog. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC loses data on 470,000 Talvest fund customers". CBC News. cbc.ca. 18 January 2007. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Pasternak, Sean B.; Alexander, Doug (18 January 2007). "CIBC's Talvest Mutual Funds Loses Client Data File". Bloomberg News. Bloomberg.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. [dead link]
^ "Privacy Commissioner launches investigation of CIBC breach of Talvest customers' personal information". Privacy Commissioner of Canada. 18 January 2007. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Cohen, Tobi (5 June 2007). "CIBC faces overtime lawsuit". Toronto Star. Thestar.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ McNish, Jacquie; Perkins, Tara (19 July 2009). "CIBC overtime lawsuit dismissed". The Globe and Mail. theglobeandmail.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ Hasham, Alyshah (26 June 2012). "Lawsuits over denied overtime pay against CIBC, Scotiabank to go ahead". Toronto Star. thestar.com. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 
^ "CIBC, Scotiabank Overtime Lawsuit Gets OK From Supreme Court". The Huffington Post. The Canadian Press. 21 March 2013. Retrieved 2013-11-21. 



Biography


Victor Ross A History of the Canadian Bank of Commerce. (1920–1934)
Rupert Canadian Investment Bank Review. McGraw-Hill Ryerson, Limited 1992

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to CIBC.



Official Website







v
t
e


Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce






Chief Executive Officer: Victor G. Dodig








Fiscal year 2016 statistics
Net income: $4.3 billion CAD[1]
Market capitalization: $39.9 billion CAD[2]
Assets: $501.4 billion CAD[3]
Employees: 43,213 (FTE, 2016)[4]
Stock symbols: TSX: CM NYSE: CM
Website: www.cibc.com












Major brands by financial service








Master: CIBC
Financial group: CIBC
Canadian banking: CIBC
Caribbean banking: CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank
International banking: CIBC Private Wealth Management
Canadian mutual funds: CIBC Mutual Funds
Canadian brokerage: CIBC Investor's Edge and CIBC Wood Gundy
Canadian insurance: CIBC Insurance
Capital markets: CIBC World Markets
Custodial: CIBC Mellon















v
t
e


Banks and credit unions in Canada








Banks








Big Five




Bank of Montreal
Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce (President's Choice Financial)
Royal Bank of Canada
Scotiabank (Tangerine)
Toronto-Dominion Bank (TD Canada Trust)






Other banks




AMEX Bank of Canada
Bridgewater Bank
Business Development Bank of Canada
Canadian Tire Financial Services
Canadian Western Bank
Citibank Canada
Equitable Bank
Exchange Bank of Canada
First Nations Bank of Canada
HSBC Bank Canada
ICICI Bank Canada
Laurentian Bank of Canada
Manulife Bank of Canada
Meridian Bank
National Bank of Canada
Rogers Bank
Vancity Community Investment Bank
VersaBank
Wealth One Bank of Canada
















Credit unions








Credit unions




Affinity Credit Union
Aldergrove Credit Union
Alterna Savings
Assiniboine Credit Union
BlueShore Financial
Central 1 Credit Union
Coast Capital Savings
Concentra Financial
Conexus Credit Union
Credit Union Central of Canada
Desjardins Group
Envision Financial
First Calgary Financial
First West Credit Union
Gulf and Fraser Fishermen's Credit Union
Island Savings
Kawartha Credit Union
Kootenay Savings Credit Union
Libro Financial Group
Meridian Credit Union
Mouvement des caisses populaires acadiennes
Servus Credit Union
Steinbach Credit Union
TCU Financial Group
Vancity
Windsor Family Credit Union
Your Credit Union
Your Neighbourhood Credit Union






Credit union deposit insurance


Alberta * British Columbia * Manitoba * New Brunswick * Newfoundland and Labrador * Nova Scotia * Ontario * Prince Edward Island * Saskatchewan














Other financial institutions








Federal financial institutions


Farm Credit Canada




Provincial financial institutions




ATB Financial


















v
t
e


S&P/TSX 60 companies of Canada (February 22, 2016)






Agnico Eagle Mines
Agrium
ARC Resources
Bank of Montreal
Barrick Gold
BCE Inc.
BlackBerry
Bombardier
Brookfield Asset Management
Cameco
Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce
Canadian National
Canadian Natural Resources
Canadian Pacific
Canadian Tire
CCL Industries
Cenovus Energy
CGI Group
Constellation Software
Couche-Tard
Crescent Point Energy
Dollarama
Emera
Enbridge
Encana
First Quantum Minerals
Franco-Nevada
Fortis Inc.
Gildan
Goldcorp
Husky Energy
Imperial Oil
Inter Pipeline
Kinross Gold
Loblaw Companies
Magna International
Manulife Financial
Metro
National Bank of Canada
Pembina Pipeline
PotashCorp
Power Corporation
Restaurant Brands International
Rogers Communications
Royal Bank of Canada
Saputo
Scotiabank
Shaw Communications
Silver Wheaton
SNC-Lavalin
Sun Life Financial
Suncor Energy
Teck
Telus
Thomson Reuters
Toronto-Dominion Bank
TransCanada
Valeant
Weston
Waste Connections












v
t
e


Great Recession



By region



Africa
Americas

United States
South America


Asia
Europe
Oceania





United States-specific



Automotive industry crisis
California budget crisis
Housing bubble
Housing market correction
Subprime mortgage crisis





Banking losses and fraud



Anglo Irish Bank hidden loans controversy
Libor scandal

Tom Hayes


Société Générale trading loss
Forex scandal
Seán FitzPatrick
Bernard Madoff
Tom Petters
Scott W. Rothstein
Allen Stanford





Government entities



Consumer Financial Protection Bureau
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
Federal Home Loan Banks
Federal Housing Administration
Federal Housing Finance Agency
Federal Housing Finance Board
Federal Reserve System
Government National Mortgage Association
Irish Bank Resolution Corporation
National Asset Management Agency
Office of Federal Housing Enterprise Oversight
Office of Financial Stability
UK Financial Investments










Government policy and spending responses



Banking and finance
stability and reform



Anglo Irish Bank Corporation Act 2009
Banking (Special Provisions) Act 2008
China–Japan–South Korea trilateral summit
Commercial Paper Funding Facility
Dodd–Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act
Emergency Economic Stabilization Act of 2008
Irish emergency budget, 2009
Irish budget, 2010
Irish budget, 2011
Irish budget, 2012
Irish budget, 2013
Temporary Liquidity Guarantee Program
Term Asset-Backed Securities Loan Facility
Troubled Asset Relief Program
2008 United Kingdom bank rescue package




Bank stress tests



EU
U.S.








Stimulus and recovery



2008 European Union stimulus plan
2008–09 Keynesian resurgence
American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009
Chinese economic stimulus program
Economic Stimulus Act of 2008
Fraud Enforcement and Recovery Act of 2009
Green New Deal
Housing and Economic Recovery Act of 2008
National fiscal policy response to the Great Recession
Zero interest-rate policy





Government interventions,
rescues, and acquisitions



List of banks acquired or bankrupted during the Great Recession




Non-banking



Chrysler
General Motors











Securities involved
and financial markets



Auction rate securities
Collateralized debt obligations
Collateralized mortgage obligations
Credit default swaps
Mortgage-backed securities
Secondary mortgage market





Social responses



Tea Party protests (United States; c. 2009)
May Day protests (Europe, Middle East and North Africa, Asia; 2009)
Occupy movement (worldwide)





Related topics



2000s energy crisis

Central Asia: 2008


Effects on museums
Decline of newspapers
World food price crisis








European debt crisis
Financial crisis of 2007–08
List of countries by public debt







^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Canadian_Imperial_Bank_of_Commerce&oldid=791515423"					
Categories: S&P/TSX 60 IndexS&P/TSX Composite IndexCanadian Imperial Bank of CommerceCompanies listed on the Toronto Stock ExchangeCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeCompanies based in TorontoBanks of CanadaBanks established in 1961Mortgage lenders of Canada1961 establishments in OntarioHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from June 2017Pages using deprecated image syntaxArticles containing French-language textArticles to be expanded from August 2010All articles to be expandedArticles using small message boxes 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


DeutschفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa Indonesia日本語PortuguêsРусскийSuomiதமிழ்中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 20 July 2017, at 19:45.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft














world markets cibc - NetFind Content Results










AOL Search
Skip over navigation


















Search the Web




























Web


Web



Content











World Market® - Shop Online or at 275+ Stores | worldmarket.com



Ad
 ·
www.worldmarket.com



Discover Handmade Rugs, Global Eclectic Decor, Mid-Century Furniture & More


12993 Fair Lakes Shopping Center, Fairfax · 


Directions






Free Shipping on $75+ 



Indoor Furniture Blowout



Save up to 75% on Outdoor




Small Space Living



Top Pins



Shop the Room - Furniture





Cibc World Markets - Results on Looksmart.com



Ad
 ·
www1.looksmart.com/​Cibc World Markets



Now Cibc World Markets Here. Get Great Results on Looksmart.com





Look Here



Good Results




More Info





Markets World - Get everything you need right here.



Ad
 ·
Search.com/​markets world



Get everything you need right here. Markets world.





All That You Need



Straight Accounting



Your Finances Up To Date



Difficult Finances
















CIBC World Markets




CIBC World Markets is the investment banking subsidiary of the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce. The firm operates as an investment bank both in the domestic and international

more


Go to:
Encyclopedia
-
News
-
Videos
-
Reference


Source:
Wikipedia







Results From The WOW.Com Content Network

CIBC World Markets - WOW.com

www.wow.com/wiki/CIBC_World_Markets


CIBC World Markets is the investment banking subsidiary of the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce. The firm operates as an investment bank both in the domestic and ...


Oppenheimer Holdings - WOW.com

www.wow.com/wiki/Oppenheimer_Holdings


However, with the deal having been closed, the firm's name was changed to CIBC Oppenheimer Holdings. ... CIBC World Markets. On November 4, 2007, ...


Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce - WOW.com

www.wow.com/wiki/CIBC


The Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce (French: Banque Canadienne Impériale de Commerce), commonly referred to as CIBC, ... and later, CIBC World Markets. ...


CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank - WOW.com

www.wow.com/wiki/FirstCaribbean_International_Bank


CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank (FCIB) is a financial services company based in Barbados and a subsidiary of the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce (CIBC).


Trimaran Capital Partners - WOW.com

www.wow.com/wiki/Trimaran_Capital_Partners


Trimaran Capital Partners is a middle-market private equity firm formerly affiliated with CIBC World Markets. Trimaran is headquartered in New York City and founded ...


Whatever Happened to $200 Oil? | HuffPost

www.huffingtonpost.com/jeffrey-rubin/whatever-happened-to-200-_b...


Four years ago, when I was still chief economist at CIBC World Markets, I forecast that global economic growth was on pace to send oil prices to $200 a b...


CIBC Wood Gundy - WOW.com

www.wow.com/wiki/CIBC_Wood_Gundy


CIBC Wood Gundy is the Canadian full-service retail brokerage division of CIBC World Markets Inc., a subsidiary of the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce (CIBC).


Jeffrey Rubin | HuffPost

www.huffingtonpost.com/author/jeffrey-rubin


Jeffrey Rubin Former Chief Economist, CIBC World Markets Jeff Rubin has been the top-ranked economist in Canadian financial markets ... at CIBC World Markets ...


CIBC (disambiguation) - WOW.com

www.wow.com/wiki/CIBC_(disambiguation)


CIBC (disambiguation) Source: ... Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce. CIBC Argosy Merchant Funds, ... CIBC World Markets; CIBC Wood Gundy;


MARKETS - Breaking News, U.S. and World News | HuffPost

www.huffingtonpost.com/topic/markets


Former Chief Economist, CIBC World Markets TRAVEL. 12 London Markets By College Tourist, Contributor ... The Craziest Market in the World: The Bamako Death Market










World Market® - Shop Online or at 275+ Stores | worldmarket.com



Ad
 ·
www.worldmarket.com



Discover Handmade Rugs, Global Eclectic Decor, Mid-Century Furniture & More


12993 Fair Lakes Shopping Center, Fairfax · 


Directions






Free Shipping on $75+ 



Indoor Furniture Blowout



Save up to 75% on Outdoor




Small Space Living



Top Pins



Shop the Room - Furniture





Cibc World Markets - Results on Looksmart.com



Ad
 ·
www1.looksmart.com/​Cibc World Markets



Now Cibc World Markets Here. Get Great Results on Looksmart.com





Look Here



Good Results




More Info





Markets World - Get everything you need right here.



Ad
 ·
Search.com/​markets world



Get everything you need right here. Markets world.





All That You Need



Straight Accounting



Your Finances Up To Date



Difficult Finances




Searches related toworld markets cibc



cibc banking online sign in


cibc world headquarters


cibc capital markets


cibc world markets nyc



cibc world markets careers


cibc world markets inc toronto


canadian imperial bank of commerce


cibc inc




12345Next

Related Searches



cibc banking online sign in


cibc world headquarters


cibc capital markets


cibc world markets nyc


cibc world markets careers


cibc world markets inc toronto


canadian imperial bank of commerce


cibc inc




















Search the Web

















© AOL Inc. All Rights Reserved.Privacy
 | Terms of Use
 | Preferences
 | Contact Us
 | Powered by Bing™

Wow.com - Part of the AOL Search Network













cibc world markets corp - Money A2Z - Web Results










AOL Search
Skip over navigation


















Search the Web



























Web





Images


Images










Cibc World Markets - Results on Looksmart.com



Ad
 ·
www1.looksmart.com/​Cibc World Markets



Now Cibc World Markets Here. Get Great Results on Looksmart.com





Look Here



Good Results




More Info





Searches related tocibc world markets corp



cibc new york headquarters


cibc new york office


cibc online banking sign in


cibc world markets nyc



cibc inc


cibc online banking


cibc world markets inc toronto


cibc personal banking




Web Results

CIBC World Markets' Healthcare Investment ... - CIBC - Home

cibcwm.com/wm


Our Global Markets, ... are offered through directly or indirectly held subsidiaries of CIBC as indicated below. CIBC World Markets ... CIBC World Markets Corp ...


CIBC World Markets - Wikipedia

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/CIBC_World_Markets


CIBC World Markets is the investment banking subsidiary of the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce. ... (Encana Corp) was replaced in both capacities by Richard ...


CIBC World Markets Corp.: Private Company Information ...

www.bloomberg.com/research/stocks/private/snapshot.asp?privcapId=...


CIBC World Markets Corp. company research & investing information. Find executives and the latest company news.


Claims Fund: CIBC World Markets Corp. and Canadian ...

https://www.sec.gov/divisions/enforce/claims/cibc.htm


CIBC World Markets Corp. and Canadian Imperial Holdings Inc. On July 20, 2005, the SEC instituted administrative and cease-and-desist proceedings against CIBC World ...


CIBC - Official Site

https://www.cibc.com


Bank on your terms with CIBC – whether it’s in person, over the phone or online, CIBC has you covered.


Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce - Wikipedia

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/CIBC


CIBC World Markets CIBC Trust Corporation ... The Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce ... (now CIBC World Markets) ...


Northrop Grumman Corporation (NYSE:NOC) Stake Raised by ...

https://www.chaffeybreeze.com/2017/07/16/northrop-grumman...


Cibc World Markets Corp raised its stake in shares of Northrop Grumman Corporation (NYSE:NOC) by 40.1% during the first quarter, according to its most ...


Cibc World Markets Corp Has $4.46 Million Position in ...

https://www.baseball-news-blog.com/2017/07/22/cibc-world-markets...


Cibc World Markets Corp lowered its position in Halliburton Company (NYSE:HAL) by 82.6% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F ...


Cibc World Markets Corp Purchases 81,298 Shares of ...

https://www.thestockobserver.com/2017/07/17/cibc-world-markets...


Cibc World Markets Corp boosted its stake in Phillips 66 (NYSE:PSX) by 267.2% during the first quarter, according to its most recent disclosure with the ...


Cibc World Markets Corp Has $32.38 Million Position in ...

https://www.chaffeybreeze.com/2017/07/18/cibc-world-markets-corp...


Cibc World Markets Corp increased its position in shares of Thermo Fisher Scientific Inc (NYSE:TMO) by 6.9% during the first quarter, according to its most ...










Cibc World Markets - Results on Looksmart.com



Ad
 ·
www1.looksmart.com/​Cibc World Markets



Now Cibc World Markets Here. Get Great Results on Looksmart.com





Look Here



Good Results




More Info




Searches related tocibc world markets corp



cibc new york headquarters


cibc new york office


cibc online banking sign in


cibc world markets nyc



cibc inc


cibc online banking


cibc world markets inc toronto


cibc personal banking




12345Next






Answers







CIBC World Markets



CIBC World Markets Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Brian Shaw (Encana Corp) was replaced in both capacities by Richard Nesbitt, a former TSX Group...

more






Retail Ventures



in December 2006 that it had retained Financo, Inc. and CIBC World Markets Corp to advise it about "strategic alternatives", including a possible sale,...

more






CIBC Wood Gundy



CIBC Wood Gundy is the Canadian full-service retail brokerage division of CIBC World Markets Inc. a subsidiary of the Canadian Imperial Bank of...

more




















Search the Web

















© AOL Inc. All Rights Reserved.Privacy
 | Terms of Use
 | Preferences
 | Contact Us
 | Powered by Bing™

Wow.com - Part of the AOL Search Network










Redirect








CIBC World Markets - Wikipedia






















 






CIBC World Markets

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


CIBC World Markets





Type

Subsidiary


Industry
Investment bank


Predecessor
Wood Gundy
The Argosy Group
Oppenheimer Holdings


Founded
1988 (acquisition of Wood Gundy)


Headquarters
Toronto, Ontario, Canada



Key people

Richard Nesbitt, CEO of World Markets


Products
Mergers and acquisitions, Capital markets, Financial services


Revenue
 C$2.90 billion (2016) [1]



Net income

 C$1.08 billion (2016)[1]


Total assets
C$162.8 billion (2016)[1]



Number of employees

1,100


Parent
Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce


Website
www.cibcwm.com


CIBC World Markets is the investment banking subsidiary of the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce. The firm operates as an investment bank both in the domestic and international equity and debt capital markets. The bank provides a variety of financial services including credit and capital market products, mergers and acquisitions, merchant banking and other investment banking advisory services.
Established via a series of acquisitions, including Canadian brokerage Wood, Gundy & Co. and U.S.-based Oppenheimer & Co. CIBC World Markets has been a leading investment bank in Canada with a notable presence in various international markets at times over the years.
CIBC World Markets is headquartered in Toronto with offices in Calgary, Montreal, Vancouver, Ottawa, New York City, Atlanta, Boston, Chicago, Houston, Salt Lake City, Beijing, Dublin, Hong Kong, London, Shanghai, Singapore, Sydney and Tokyo.



Contents


1 History

1.1 CIBC Wood Gundy
1.2 Acquisition of the Argosy Group
1.3 CIBC Oppenheimer
1.4 Creating the CIBC World Markets platform
1.5 Decline of CIBC World Markets
1.6 Sale to Oppenheimer & Co. (Fahnestock Viner)


2 Notable current and former employees
3 See also
4 References



History[edit]





This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (September 2009) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)






CIBC Wood Gundy
(1988 - 1997)


CIBC Wood Gundy[edit]
See also: CIBC Wood Gundy and Wood, Gundy & Co.
CIBC purchased a majority stake in Wood, Gundy & Co. in June 1988 for C$203 million.[2] Wood Gundy was established in Toronto in 1905 by George Herbert Wood and James Henry Gundy. At the time of its acquisition, Wood Gundy was the leading Canadian investment dealer. Following the acquisition, the CIBC formed CIBC Wood Gundy, which offered primarily asset management services for corporate and institutional clients. Two years later, in 1990, they continued to expand the Canadian securities business by acquiring much of Merrill Lynch & Company's Canadian business.
For a period of time, CIBC Wood Gundy operated as CIBC Eyers Reed in Australia following the acquisition of the broker-dealer.
Acquisition of the Argosy Group[edit]
Main article: The Argosy Group
In April 1995, CIBC's investment banking subsidiary, then known as CIBC Wood Gundy announced the acquisition of The Argosy Group, a New York-based investment banking firm involved primarily in the high yield debt market. Argosy had been founded by three Drexel Burnham Lambert alumni: Jay Bloom, Andrew Heyer and Dean Kehler who had worked together in Drexel's New York office in the 1980s. Argosy was founded in 1990 as a 9-person advisory firm.
The acquisition of Argosy marked an aggressive push by CIBC into the US investment banking business. Prior to that point, CIBC had never done a junk bond deal. Argosy's three major principals had worked on some of the biggest junk bond deals of the 1980s while at Drexel Burnham Lambert. The 52 Argosy employees constituted the core of what would become CIBC's High Yield Group and CIBC Argosy Merchant Banking funds that were responsible for, among other things, the $1 billion windfall that CIBC would earn from its early investments in Global Crossing. The Argosy principals also managed two collateralized debt obligation vehicles known as Caravelle Funds I and II.[3]




CIBC Oppenheimer
(1997 - 1999)


CIBC Oppenheimer[edit]
See also: Oppenheimer & Co.
In 1997, CIBC Wood Gundy (New York) under the direction of Michael S. Rulle acquired the U.S. brokerage house Oppenheimer & Co. CIBC wanted to expand its brokerage business and was interested in the New York-based firm which had annual revenues of $800 million and a network of 680 brokers, primarily selling stocks and bonds. Oppenheimer also included a small investment banking group.
Negotiations began talks with Oppenheimer in July 1997 and CIBC closed on the transaction in November 1997, paying $525 million over the next three years, including $175 million in retention payments to key Oppenheimer professionals. After the acquisition the U.S. division took the name CIBC Oppenheimer, eliminating the use of the Wood Gundy brand through much of the bank.
Creating the CIBC World Markets platform[edit]
By 1999, CIBC would scale back the usage of the Oppenheimer name in favor of CIBC World Markets. The business in Canada was centered around providing mergers and acquisitions advisory services and various equity offerings for large Canadian companies. However, with the acquisition of Argosy, the center of gravity of the investment bank began to shift toward the United States.




CIBC World Markets
(1998 - 2002)


Although initially intended to represent a foray into a variety of global markets, CIBC World Markets ultimately focused on three markets: Canada, the United States and to a lesser extent the United Kingdom. The CIBC World Markets unit suffered a net loss of C$186 million during the fourth quarter of fiscal 1998 which dragged down the performance of the parent bank's stock by almost one-third. The loss in 1998 was due primarily to very rapid expansion into regions impacted by the various financial crises in 1998 in Asia. As a result, CIBC World Markets refocused its efforts primarily on the U.S. and Canadian markets, despite the seemingly global ambitions implied in the unit's name.
CIBC World Markets reached a peak in 1999 and 2000, when the investment bank cracked the top ten of U.S. issuers of high yield bonds and the top twenty in mergers and acquisitions advisory. In 1999, CIBC World Markets, backed Gary Winnick and his company Global Crossing to build optical fiber cable connections under the ocean. CIBC would ultimately realize a gain of $2.0 billion from its relatively small equity investment in Global Crossing, representing more than 20% of the bank's profits in 2000.[4] On the back of the success in Global Crossing, CIBC backed the three heads of its CIBC Argosy Merchant Banking funds in a new private equity operation known as Trimaran Capital Partners. Trimaran closed on a $1 billion fund in April 2001, with capital provided primarily by CIBC.[3]
In June 2001, CIBC announced the construction of a new $800 million office tower at 300 Madison Avenue (At the corner of Madison Avenue and 42nd Street). The 35-story, 1,200,000-square-foot (110,000 m2) building was originally expected to house up to 3,000 employees, bringing CIBC's entire New York staff under one roof.[5] Following the crash of the dot-com bubble and the shutdown of the high yield markets in late 2000, CIBC World Markets began to suffer a series of setbacks. When the 300 Madison building was completed in 2004, CIBC's diminished workforce took up only a few floors, leasing the remainder to PriceWaterhouseCoopers.[6]
Decline of CIBC World Markets[edit]
In July 2001, the Wall Street Journal profiled CIBC World Markets, chronicling the rapid decline of the bank from the peaks of Wall Street's league table rankings.[7] At the same time, the High Yield Group was restructured with the original Argosy Group founders focusing their efforts solely on their private equity and merchant banking operations, known as Trimaran Capital Partners. Bloom, Heyer and Kehler were replaced by managing directors Edward Levy and Bruce Spohler. The Trimaran operations would subsequently spinout completely from CIBC World Markets.
By 2002 CIBC was forced to set aside C$1.5 billion for bad corporate loans, primarily from CIBC World Markets and the bank was linked two of the most famous victims of the corporate accounting scandals of the early 2000s: Enron Corporation and Global Crossing.[4] As a result of these developments, the parent bank implemented a strategy to reallocate resources away from the riskier CIBC World Markets division in favor of its retail operations.[4]
As part of this strategy, in 2003, CIBC sold an asset management division along with retail brokerage to Fahnestock Viner along with the Oppenheimer & Co. name. Upon doing so CIBC Wood Gundy (in Canada) and CIBC Oppenheimer (in US) became jointly known as CIBC World Markets. The Wood Gundy nomenclature lives on today as the retail brokerage division of CIBC World Markets Inc., however only operates in Canada; the U.S. operation lacking a retail arm. Also in September 2003, a jury found that CIBC had failed to provide complete financial information to investors in a high-yield bond offering. Just a few months later, at the end of 2003, CIBC reached an $80 million settlement with the Securities and Exchange Commission over its various financings for Enron, representing far more than the bank had earned in fees.[4]
Sale to Oppenheimer & Co. (Fahnestock Viner)[edit]
By 2004, CIBC had begun winding down much of its investment banking business in the United States. CIBC World Markets reduced its staff by two-thirds from 2001 through 2004.
In November 2007, the new Oppenheimer & Co. (Fahnestock) announced that it would purchase a major part of CIBC World Markets' U.S. Investment Banking, Corporate Syndicate, Institutional Sales and Trading, Equity Research, Options Trading and a portion of the Debt Capital Markets business which includes Convertible Bond Trading, Loan Syndication, High Yield Origination and Trading as well as related operations located in the UK, Israel and Hong Kong. The deal closed January 14, 2008 and essentially reunited the original Oppenheimer & Co. which CIBC divided in the sale to Fahnestock.
On February 29, 2008, CIBC World Markets Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Brian Shaw (Encana Corp) was replaced in both capacities by Richard Nesbitt, a former TSX Group CEO.[8][9]
Notable current and former employees[edit]

Geoff Belsher and Harry Culham, Co-Chair of CIBC World Markets
Victor Dodig, President and CEO of the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce
Henry Blodget, Equity Research Analyst.
Meredith Whitney, Equity Research Analyst.
Guy Adami, TV personality, author, financial analyst and professional investor
Jeff Rubin, former chief economist, author of Why Your World Is About to Get a Whole Lot Smaller.

See also[edit]


Companies portal



Oppenheimer & Co.
Wood Gundy Inc.
CIBC Wood Gundy

References[edit]



^ a b c CIBC 2016 Annual Report
^ Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce Profile
^ a b Trimaran Capital Partners Announces Formation of Trimaran Fund II at $1.043 Billion
^ a b c d Bank Works To Improve Its Image In Canada
^ 300 Madison/CIBC World Markets
^ Pricewaterhouse Moving to Madison Ave. Tower
^ "CIBC World Markets Trips in Big Leagues." The Wall Street Journal (Friday, August 3, 2001)
^ The Globe and Mail, Report on Business, by Virginia Galt and Tara Perkins – January 7, 2008 at 10:44 AM EST – Subprime woes lead to shakeup at CIBC
^ CIBC World Markets Executive Biographies - Richard Nesbitt










v
t
e


Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce






Chief Executive Officer: Victor G. Dodig








Fiscal year 2016 statistics
Net income: $4.3 billion CAD[1]
Market capitalization: $39.9 billion CAD[2]
Assets: $501.4 billion CAD[3]
Employees: 43,213 (FTE, 2016)[4]
Stock symbols: TSX: CM NYSE: CM
Website: www.cibc.com












Major brands by financial service








Master: CIBC
Financial group: CIBC
Canadian banking: CIBC
Caribbean banking: CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank
International banking: CIBC Private Wealth Management
Canadian mutual funds: CIBC Mutual Funds
Canadian brokerage: CIBC Investor's Edge and CIBC Wood Gundy
Canadian insurance: CIBC Insurance
Capital markets: CIBC World Markets
Custodial: CIBC Mellon















v
t
e


Investment banks




Bank



Divisions of
universal banks





Bulge bracket




Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Barclays
Citi Institutional Clients Group
Credit Suisse
Deutsche Bank Corporate and Investment Bank
J.P. Morgan & Co. (J.P. Morgan Cazenove)
UBS Investment Bank






Other




Berenberg Bank
BMO Capital Markets
BOC International
BNP Paribas Corporate & Institutional Banking
Brown Shipley
CIBC World Markets
CITIC Securities (CLSA)
Commerzbank Corporates & Markets
Crédit Agricole Corporate and Investment Bank
Daiwa Securities Capital Markets
EverBank World Markets
Harris Williams & Co.
HSBC Global Banking and Markets
ING Commercial Banking
Is Investment
KBC Bank
Korea Development Bank (Daewoo Securities)
Lloyds Bank Corporate Markets
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities
Mizuho Corporate Bank
Natixis
Nomura Securities
RBC Capital Markets
RBS Markets & International Banking
Sberbank CIB
Société Générale Corporate & Investment Bank
Standard Chartered
TD Securities
UniCredit Corporate & Investment Banking
VTB Capital
Wells Fargo Securities








Independents





Bulge bracket




Goldman Sachs
Morgan Stanley






Other




Allen & Company
Blackstone Group
Brewin Dolphin
BTG Pactual
Centerview Partners
China International Capital Corporation
Close Brothers Group
China Everbright Group

China Everbright Limited
Everbright Securities


Evercore Partners
FBR Capital Markets
Galaxy
Greenhill & Co.
Guosen Securities
Haitong Securities
Houlihan Lokey
Investec
Jefferies
Keefe, Bruyette & Woods
Lazard
Lincoln International
Macquarie Group
Mediobanca
Moelis & Company
N M Rothschild & Sons
Oppenheimer & Co.
Perella Weinberg Partners
Piper Jaffray
Raymond James Financial
Renaissance Capital
ROTH Capital Partners
Salam Investment Ltd.
Sandler O'Neill and Partners
Stifel Nicolaus
Stone Key Partners
William Blair & Company











 Category
 List







^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=CIBC_World_Markets&oldid=785034957"					
Categories: Canadian Imperial Bank of CommerceStock brokerages and investment banks of CanadaCompanies based in TorontoHidden categories: Pages using deprecated image syntaxArticles needing additional references from September 2009All articles needing additional references 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


Bahasa Indonesia 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 11 June 2017, at 08:20.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 










Creative Commons — Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported
— CC BY-SA 3.0 






















Skip to content








 Menu















Help us build a vibrant, collaborative global commons
Donate Now














Creative Commons


Creative Commons License Deed







Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported

(CC BY-SA 3.0)








This is a human-readable summary of (and not a substitute for) the license.


Disclaimer.






You are free to:


Share — copy and redistribute the material in any medium or format


Adapt — remix, transform, and build upon the material


for any purpose, even commercially.

















The licensor cannot revoke these freedoms as long as you follow the license terms.




Under the following terms:



Attribution — You must give appropriate credit, provide a link to the license, and indicate if changes were made. You may do so in any reasonable manner, but not in any way that suggests the licensor endorses you or your use.




Attribute this work:












ShareAlike — If you remix, transform, or build upon the material, you must distribute your contributions under the same license as the original.








No additional restrictions — You may not apply legal terms or technological measures that legally restrict others from doing anything the license permits.






Notices:



You do not have to comply with the license for elements of the material in the public domain or where your use is permitted by an applicable exception or limitation.


No warranties are given. The license may not give you all of the permissions necessary for your intended use. For example, other rights such as publicity, privacy, or moral rights may limit how you use the material.








Learn more about CC licensing, or use the license for your own material.






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
Make a Donation






This page is available in the following languages:


Castellano
Castellano (España)
Català
Dansk
Deutsch
English
Esperanto
français
Galego
hrvatski
Indonesia
Italiano
Latviski
Lietuvių
Melayu
Nederlands
Norsk
polski
Português
Português (BR)
română
Slovenščina
Suomeksi
svenska
Türkçe
íslenska
česky
Ελληνικά
Беларуская
русский
українська
العربية
پارسی
中文
日本語
華語 (台灣)
한국어






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
When you share, everyone wins.





Contribute today to Creative Commons




$100



$50



$25



$5































Disclaimer

This deed highlights only some of the key features and terms of the actual license. It is not a license and has no legal value. You should carefully review all of the terms and conditions of the actual license before using the licensed material.
Creative Commons is not a law firm and does not provide legal services. Distributing, displaying, or linking to this deed or the license that it summarizes does not create a lawyer-client or any other relationship.




What does "Attribute this work" mean?


The page you came from contained embedded licensing metadata, including how the creator wishes to be attributed for re-use. You can use the HTML here to cite the work. Doing so will also include metadata on your page so that others can find the original work as well.




The applicable mediation rules will be designated in the copyright notice published with the work, or if none then in the request for mediation. Unless otherwise designated in a copyright notice attached to the work, the UNCITRAL Arbitration Rules apply to any arbitration.
More info.




If supplied, you must provide the name of the creator and attribution parties, a copyright notice, a license notice, a disclaimer notice, and a link to the material. CC licenses prior to Version 4.0 also require you to provide the title of the material if supplied, and may have other slight differences.
More info.




In 4.0, you must indicate if you modified the material and retain an indication of previous modifications. In 3.0 and earlier license versions, the indication of changes is only required if you create a derivative.
Marking guide.
More info.




You may also use a license listed as compatible at https://creativecommons.org/compatiblelicenses
More info.




A commercial use is one primarily intended for commercial advantage or monetary compensation.
More info.




Merely changing the format never creates a derivative.
More info.




The license prohibits application of effective technological measures, defined with reference to Article 11 of the WIPO Copyright Treaty.
More info.




The rights of users under exceptions and limitations, such as fair use and fair dealing, are not affected by the CC licenses.
More info.




You may need to get additional permissions before using the material as you intend.
More info.






















Redirect








CIBC World Markets - Wikipedia






















 






CIBC World Markets

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


CIBC World Markets





Type

Subsidiary


Industry
Investment bank


Predecessor
Wood Gundy
The Argosy Group
Oppenheimer Holdings


Founded
1988 (acquisition of Wood Gundy)


Headquarters
Toronto, Ontario, Canada



Key people

Richard Nesbitt, CEO of World Markets


Products
Mergers and acquisitions, Capital markets, Financial services


Revenue
 C$2.90 billion (2016) [1]



Net income

 C$1.08 billion (2016)[1]


Total assets
C$162.8 billion (2016)[1]



Number of employees

1,100


Parent
Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce


Website
www.cibcwm.com


CIBC World Markets is the investment banking subsidiary of the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce. The firm operates as an investment bank both in the domestic and international equity and debt capital markets. The bank provides a variety of financial services including credit and capital market products, mergers and acquisitions, merchant banking and other investment banking advisory services.
Established via a series of acquisitions, including Canadian brokerage Wood, Gundy & Co. and U.S.-based Oppenheimer & Co. CIBC World Markets has been a leading investment bank in Canada with a notable presence in various international markets at times over the years.
CIBC World Markets is headquartered in Toronto with offices in Calgary, Montreal, Vancouver, Ottawa, New York City, Atlanta, Boston, Chicago, Houston, Salt Lake City, Beijing, Dublin, Hong Kong, London, Shanghai, Singapore, Sydney and Tokyo.



Contents


1 History

1.1 CIBC Wood Gundy
1.2 Acquisition of the Argosy Group
1.3 CIBC Oppenheimer
1.4 Creating the CIBC World Markets platform
1.5 Decline of CIBC World Markets
1.6 Sale to Oppenheimer & Co. (Fahnestock Viner)


2 Notable current and former employees
3 See also
4 References



History[edit]





This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (September 2009) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)






CIBC Wood Gundy
(1988 - 1997)


CIBC Wood Gundy[edit]
See also: CIBC Wood Gundy and Wood, Gundy & Co.
CIBC purchased a majority stake in Wood, Gundy & Co. in June 1988 for C$203 million.[2] Wood Gundy was established in Toronto in 1905 by George Herbert Wood and James Henry Gundy. At the time of its acquisition, Wood Gundy was the leading Canadian investment dealer. Following the acquisition, the CIBC formed CIBC Wood Gundy, which offered primarily asset management services for corporate and institutional clients. Two years later, in 1990, they continued to expand the Canadian securities business by acquiring much of Merrill Lynch & Company's Canadian business.
For a period of time, CIBC Wood Gundy operated as CIBC Eyers Reed in Australia following the acquisition of the broker-dealer.
Acquisition of the Argosy Group[edit]
Main article: The Argosy Group
In April 1995, CIBC's investment banking subsidiary, then known as CIBC Wood Gundy announced the acquisition of The Argosy Group, a New York-based investment banking firm involved primarily in the high yield debt market. Argosy had been founded by three Drexel Burnham Lambert alumni: Jay Bloom, Andrew Heyer and Dean Kehler who had worked together in Drexel's New York office in the 1980s. Argosy was founded in 1990 as a 9-person advisory firm.
The acquisition of Argosy marked an aggressive push by CIBC into the US investment banking business. Prior to that point, CIBC had never done a junk bond deal. Argosy's three major principals had worked on some of the biggest junk bond deals of the 1980s while at Drexel Burnham Lambert. The 52 Argosy employees constituted the core of what would become CIBC's High Yield Group and CIBC Argosy Merchant Banking funds that were responsible for, among other things, the $1 billion windfall that CIBC would earn from its early investments in Global Crossing. The Argosy principals also managed two collateralized debt obligation vehicles known as Caravelle Funds I and II.[3]




CIBC Oppenheimer
(1997 - 1999)


CIBC Oppenheimer[edit]
See also: Oppenheimer & Co.
In 1997, CIBC Wood Gundy (New York) under the direction of Michael S. Rulle acquired the U.S. brokerage house Oppenheimer & Co. CIBC wanted to expand its brokerage business and was interested in the New York-based firm which had annual revenues of $800 million and a network of 680 brokers, primarily selling stocks and bonds. Oppenheimer also included a small investment banking group.
Negotiations began talks with Oppenheimer in July 1997 and CIBC closed on the transaction in November 1997, paying $525 million over the next three years, including $175 million in retention payments to key Oppenheimer professionals. After the acquisition the U.S. division took the name CIBC Oppenheimer, eliminating the use of the Wood Gundy brand through much of the bank.
Creating the CIBC World Markets platform[edit]
By 1999, CIBC would scale back the usage of the Oppenheimer name in favor of CIBC World Markets. The business in Canada was centered around providing mergers and acquisitions advisory services and various equity offerings for large Canadian companies. However, with the acquisition of Argosy, the center of gravity of the investment bank began to shift toward the United States.




CIBC World Markets
(1998 - 2002)


Although initially intended to represent a foray into a variety of global markets, CIBC World Markets ultimately focused on three markets: Canada, the United States and to a lesser extent the United Kingdom. The CIBC World Markets unit suffered a net loss of C$186 million during the fourth quarter of fiscal 1998 which dragged down the performance of the parent bank's stock by almost one-third. The loss in 1998 was due primarily to very rapid expansion into regions impacted by the various financial crises in 1998 in Asia. As a result, CIBC World Markets refocused its efforts primarily on the U.S. and Canadian markets, despite the seemingly global ambitions implied in the unit's name.
CIBC World Markets reached a peak in 1999 and 2000, when the investment bank cracked the top ten of U.S. issuers of high yield bonds and the top twenty in mergers and acquisitions advisory. In 1999, CIBC World Markets, backed Gary Winnick and his company Global Crossing to build optical fiber cable connections under the ocean. CIBC would ultimately realize a gain of $2.0 billion from its relatively small equity investment in Global Crossing, representing more than 20% of the bank's profits in 2000.[4] On the back of the success in Global Crossing, CIBC backed the three heads of its CIBC Argosy Merchant Banking funds in a new private equity operation known as Trimaran Capital Partners. Trimaran closed on a $1 billion fund in April 2001, with capital provided primarily by CIBC.[3]
In June 2001, CIBC announced the construction of a new $800 million office tower at 300 Madison Avenue (At the corner of Madison Avenue and 42nd Street). The 35-story, 1,200,000-square-foot (110,000 m2) building was originally expected to house up to 3,000 employees, bringing CIBC's entire New York staff under one roof.[5] Following the crash of the dot-com bubble and the shutdown of the high yield markets in late 2000, CIBC World Markets began to suffer a series of setbacks. When the 300 Madison building was completed in 2004, CIBC's diminished workforce took up only a few floors, leasing the remainder to PriceWaterhouseCoopers.[6]
Decline of CIBC World Markets[edit]
In July 2001, the Wall Street Journal profiled CIBC World Markets, chronicling the rapid decline of the bank from the peaks of Wall Street's league table rankings.[7] At the same time, the High Yield Group was restructured with the original Argosy Group founders focusing their efforts solely on their private equity and merchant banking operations, known as Trimaran Capital Partners. Bloom, Heyer and Kehler were replaced by managing directors Edward Levy and Bruce Spohler. The Trimaran operations would subsequently spinout completely from CIBC World Markets.
By 2002 CIBC was forced to set aside C$1.5 billion for bad corporate loans, primarily from CIBC World Markets and the bank was linked two of the most famous victims of the corporate accounting scandals of the early 2000s: Enron Corporation and Global Crossing.[4] As a result of these developments, the parent bank implemented a strategy to reallocate resources away from the riskier CIBC World Markets division in favor of its retail operations.[4]
As part of this strategy, in 2003, CIBC sold an asset management division along with retail brokerage to Fahnestock Viner along with the Oppenheimer & Co. name. Upon doing so CIBC Wood Gundy (in Canada) and CIBC Oppenheimer (in US) became jointly known as CIBC World Markets. The Wood Gundy nomenclature lives on today as the retail brokerage division of CIBC World Markets Inc., however only operates in Canada; the U.S. operation lacking a retail arm. Also in September 2003, a jury found that CIBC had failed to provide complete financial information to investors in a high-yield bond offering. Just a few months later, at the end of 2003, CIBC reached an $80 million settlement with the Securities and Exchange Commission over its various financings for Enron, representing far more than the bank had earned in fees.[4]
Sale to Oppenheimer & Co. (Fahnestock Viner)[edit]
By 2004, CIBC had begun winding down much of its investment banking business in the United States. CIBC World Markets reduced its staff by two-thirds from 2001 through 2004.
In November 2007, the new Oppenheimer & Co. (Fahnestock) announced that it would purchase a major part of CIBC World Markets' U.S. Investment Banking, Corporate Syndicate, Institutional Sales and Trading, Equity Research, Options Trading and a portion of the Debt Capital Markets business which includes Convertible Bond Trading, Loan Syndication, High Yield Origination and Trading as well as related operations located in the UK, Israel and Hong Kong. The deal closed January 14, 2008 and essentially reunited the original Oppenheimer & Co. which CIBC divided in the sale to Fahnestock.
On February 29, 2008, CIBC World Markets Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Brian Shaw (Encana Corp) was replaced in both capacities by Richard Nesbitt, a former TSX Group CEO.[8][9]
Notable current and former employees[edit]

Geoff Belsher and Harry Culham, Co-Chair of CIBC World Markets
Victor Dodig, President and CEO of the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce
Henry Blodget, Equity Research Analyst.
Meredith Whitney, Equity Research Analyst.
Guy Adami, TV personality, author, financial analyst and professional investor
Jeff Rubin, former chief economist, author of Why Your World Is About to Get a Whole Lot Smaller.

See also[edit]


Companies portal



Oppenheimer & Co.
Wood Gundy Inc.
CIBC Wood Gundy

References[edit]



^ a b c CIBC 2016 Annual Report
^ Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce Profile
^ a b Trimaran Capital Partners Announces Formation of Trimaran Fund II at $1.043 Billion
^ a b c d Bank Works To Improve Its Image In Canada
^ 300 Madison/CIBC World Markets
^ Pricewaterhouse Moving to Madison Ave. Tower
^ "CIBC World Markets Trips in Big Leagues." The Wall Street Journal (Friday, August 3, 2001)
^ The Globe and Mail, Report on Business, by Virginia Galt and Tara Perkins – January 7, 2008 at 10:44 AM EST – Subprime woes lead to shakeup at CIBC
^ CIBC World Markets Executive Biographies - Richard Nesbitt










v
t
e


Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce






Chief Executive Officer: Victor G. Dodig








Fiscal year 2016 statistics
Net income: $4.3 billion CAD[1]
Market capitalization: $39.9 billion CAD[2]
Assets: $501.4 billion CAD[3]
Employees: 43,213 (FTE, 2016)[4]
Stock symbols: TSX: CM NYSE: CM
Website: www.cibc.com












Major brands by financial service








Master: CIBC
Financial group: CIBC
Canadian banking: CIBC
Caribbean banking: CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank
International banking: CIBC Private Wealth Management
Canadian mutual funds: CIBC Mutual Funds
Canadian brokerage: CIBC Investor's Edge and CIBC Wood Gundy
Canadian insurance: CIBC Insurance
Capital markets: CIBC World Markets
Custodial: CIBC Mellon















v
t
e


Investment banks




Bank



Divisions of
universal banks





Bulge bracket




Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Barclays
Citi Institutional Clients Group
Credit Suisse
Deutsche Bank Corporate and Investment Bank
J.P. Morgan & Co. (J.P. Morgan Cazenove)
UBS Investment Bank






Other




Berenberg Bank
BMO Capital Markets
BOC International
BNP Paribas Corporate & Institutional Banking
Brown Shipley
CIBC World Markets
CITIC Securities (CLSA)
Commerzbank Corporates & Markets
Crédit Agricole Corporate and Investment Bank
Daiwa Securities Capital Markets
EverBank World Markets
Harris Williams & Co.
HSBC Global Banking and Markets
ING Commercial Banking
Is Investment
KBC Bank
Korea Development Bank (Daewoo Securities)
Lloyds Bank Corporate Markets
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities
Mizuho Corporate Bank
Natixis
Nomura Securities
RBC Capital Markets
RBS Markets & International Banking
Sberbank CIB
Société Générale Corporate & Investment Bank
Standard Chartered
TD Securities
UniCredit Corporate & Investment Banking
VTB Capital
Wells Fargo Securities








Independents





Bulge bracket




Goldman Sachs
Morgan Stanley






Other




Allen & Company
Blackstone Group
Brewin Dolphin
BTG Pactual
Centerview Partners
China International Capital Corporation
Close Brothers Group
China Everbright Group

China Everbright Limited
Everbright Securities


Evercore Partners
FBR Capital Markets
Galaxy
Greenhill & Co.
Guosen Securities
Haitong Securities
Houlihan Lokey
Investec
Jefferies
Keefe, Bruyette & Woods
Lazard
Lincoln International
Macquarie Group
Mediobanca
Moelis & Company
N M Rothschild & Sons
Oppenheimer & Co.
Perella Weinberg Partners
Piper Jaffray
Raymond James Financial
Renaissance Capital
ROTH Capital Partners
Salam Investment Ltd.
Sandler O'Neill and Partners
Stifel Nicolaus
Stone Key Partners
William Blair & Company











 Category
 List







^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=CIBC_World_Markets&oldid=785034957"					
Categories: Canadian Imperial Bank of CommerceStock brokerages and investment banks of CanadaCompanies based in TorontoHidden categories: Pages using deprecated image syntaxArticles needing additional references from September 2009All articles needing additional references 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


Bahasa Indonesia 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 11 June 2017, at 08:20.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 











CIBC World Markets - Wikipedia






















 






CIBC World Markets

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


CIBC World Markets





Type

Subsidiary


Industry
Investment bank


Predecessor
Wood Gundy
The Argosy Group
Oppenheimer Holdings


Founded
1988 (acquisition of Wood Gundy)


Headquarters
Toronto, Ontario, Canada



Key people

Richard Nesbitt, CEO of World Markets


Products
Mergers and acquisitions, Capital markets, Financial services


Revenue
 C$2.90 billion (2016) [1]



Net income

 C$1.08 billion (2016)[1]


Total assets
C$162.8 billion (2016)[1]



Number of employees

1,100


Parent
Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce


Website
www.cibcwm.com


CIBC World Markets is the investment banking subsidiary of the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce. The firm operates as an investment bank both in the domestic and international equity and debt capital markets. The bank provides a variety of financial services including credit and capital market products, mergers and acquisitions, merchant banking and other investment banking advisory services.
Established via a series of acquisitions, including Canadian brokerage Wood, Gundy & Co. and U.S.-based Oppenheimer & Co. CIBC World Markets has been a leading investment bank in Canada with a notable presence in various international markets at times over the years.
CIBC World Markets is headquartered in Toronto with offices in Calgary, Montreal, Vancouver, Ottawa, New York City, Atlanta, Boston, Chicago, Houston, Salt Lake City, Beijing, Dublin, Hong Kong, London, Shanghai, Singapore, Sydney and Tokyo.



Contents


1 History

1.1 CIBC Wood Gundy
1.2 Acquisition of the Argosy Group
1.3 CIBC Oppenheimer
1.4 Creating the CIBC World Markets platform
1.5 Decline of CIBC World Markets
1.6 Sale to Oppenheimer & Co. (Fahnestock Viner)


2 Notable current and former employees
3 See also
4 References



History[edit]





This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (September 2009) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)






CIBC Wood Gundy
(1988 - 1997)


CIBC Wood Gundy[edit]
See also: CIBC Wood Gundy and Wood, Gundy & Co.
CIBC purchased a majority stake in Wood, Gundy & Co. in June 1988 for C$203 million.[2] Wood Gundy was established in Toronto in 1905 by George Herbert Wood and James Henry Gundy. At the time of its acquisition, Wood Gundy was the leading Canadian investment dealer. Following the acquisition, the CIBC formed CIBC Wood Gundy, which offered primarily asset management services for corporate and institutional clients. Two years later, in 1990, they continued to expand the Canadian securities business by acquiring much of Merrill Lynch & Company's Canadian business.
For a period of time, CIBC Wood Gundy operated as CIBC Eyers Reed in Australia following the acquisition of the broker-dealer.
Acquisition of the Argosy Group[edit]
Main article: The Argosy Group
In April 1995, CIBC's investment banking subsidiary, then known as CIBC Wood Gundy announced the acquisition of The Argosy Group, a New York-based investment banking firm involved primarily in the high yield debt market. Argosy had been founded by three Drexel Burnham Lambert alumni: Jay Bloom, Andrew Heyer and Dean Kehler who had worked together in Drexel's New York office in the 1980s. Argosy was founded in 1990 as a 9-person advisory firm.
The acquisition of Argosy marked an aggressive push by CIBC into the US investment banking business. Prior to that point, CIBC had never done a junk bond deal. Argosy's three major principals had worked on some of the biggest junk bond deals of the 1980s while at Drexel Burnham Lambert. The 52 Argosy employees constituted the core of what would become CIBC's High Yield Group and CIBC Argosy Merchant Banking funds that were responsible for, among other things, the $1 billion windfall that CIBC would earn from its early investments in Global Crossing. The Argosy principals also managed two collateralized debt obligation vehicles known as Caravelle Funds I and II.[3]




CIBC Oppenheimer
(1997 - 1999)


CIBC Oppenheimer[edit]
See also: Oppenheimer & Co.
In 1997, CIBC Wood Gundy (New York) under the direction of Michael S. Rulle acquired the U.S. brokerage house Oppenheimer & Co. CIBC wanted to expand its brokerage business and was interested in the New York-based firm which had annual revenues of $800 million and a network of 680 brokers, primarily selling stocks and bonds. Oppenheimer also included a small investment banking group.
Negotiations began talks with Oppenheimer in July 1997 and CIBC closed on the transaction in November 1997, paying $525 million over the next three years, including $175 million in retention payments to key Oppenheimer professionals. After the acquisition the U.S. division took the name CIBC Oppenheimer, eliminating the use of the Wood Gundy brand through much of the bank.
Creating the CIBC World Markets platform[edit]
By 1999, CIBC would scale back the usage of the Oppenheimer name in favor of CIBC World Markets. The business in Canada was centered around providing mergers and acquisitions advisory services and various equity offerings for large Canadian companies. However, with the acquisition of Argosy, the center of gravity of the investment bank began to shift toward the United States.




CIBC World Markets
(1998 - 2002)


Although initially intended to represent a foray into a variety of global markets, CIBC World Markets ultimately focused on three markets: Canada, the United States and to a lesser extent the United Kingdom. The CIBC World Markets unit suffered a net loss of C$186 million during the fourth quarter of fiscal 1998 which dragged down the performance of the parent bank's stock by almost one-third. The loss in 1998 was due primarily to very rapid expansion into regions impacted by the various financial crises in 1998 in Asia. As a result, CIBC World Markets refocused its efforts primarily on the U.S. and Canadian markets, despite the seemingly global ambitions implied in the unit's name.
CIBC World Markets reached a peak in 1999 and 2000, when the investment bank cracked the top ten of U.S. issuers of high yield bonds and the top twenty in mergers and acquisitions advisory. In 1999, CIBC World Markets, backed Gary Winnick and his company Global Crossing to build optical fiber cable connections under the ocean. CIBC would ultimately realize a gain of $2.0 billion from its relatively small equity investment in Global Crossing, representing more than 20% of the bank's profits in 2000.[4] On the back of the success in Global Crossing, CIBC backed the three heads of its CIBC Argosy Merchant Banking funds in a new private equity operation known as Trimaran Capital Partners. Trimaran closed on a $1 billion fund in April 2001, with capital provided primarily by CIBC.[3]
In June 2001, CIBC announced the construction of a new $800 million office tower at 300 Madison Avenue (At the corner of Madison Avenue and 42nd Street). The 35-story, 1,200,000-square-foot (110,000 m2) building was originally expected to house up to 3,000 employees, bringing CIBC's entire New York staff under one roof.[5] Following the crash of the dot-com bubble and the shutdown of the high yield markets in late 2000, CIBC World Markets began to suffer a series of setbacks. When the 300 Madison building was completed in 2004, CIBC's diminished workforce took up only a few floors, leasing the remainder to PriceWaterhouseCoopers.[6]
Decline of CIBC World Markets[edit]
In July 2001, the Wall Street Journal profiled CIBC World Markets, chronicling the rapid decline of the bank from the peaks of Wall Street's league table rankings.[7] At the same time, the High Yield Group was restructured with the original Argosy Group founders focusing their efforts solely on their private equity and merchant banking operations, known as Trimaran Capital Partners. Bloom, Heyer and Kehler were replaced by managing directors Edward Levy and Bruce Spohler. The Trimaran operations would subsequently spinout completely from CIBC World Markets.
By 2002 CIBC was forced to set aside C$1.5 billion for bad corporate loans, primarily from CIBC World Markets and the bank was linked two of the most famous victims of the corporate accounting scandals of the early 2000s: Enron Corporation and Global Crossing.[4] As a result of these developments, the parent bank implemented a strategy to reallocate resources away from the riskier CIBC World Markets division in favor of its retail operations.[4]
As part of this strategy, in 2003, CIBC sold an asset management division along with retail brokerage to Fahnestock Viner along with the Oppenheimer & Co. name. Upon doing so CIBC Wood Gundy (in Canada) and CIBC Oppenheimer (in US) became jointly known as CIBC World Markets. The Wood Gundy nomenclature lives on today as the retail brokerage division of CIBC World Markets Inc., however only operates in Canada; the U.S. operation lacking a retail arm. Also in September 2003, a jury found that CIBC had failed to provide complete financial information to investors in a high-yield bond offering. Just a few months later, at the end of 2003, CIBC reached an $80 million settlement with the Securities and Exchange Commission over its various financings for Enron, representing far more than the bank had earned in fees.[4]
Sale to Oppenheimer & Co. (Fahnestock Viner)[edit]
By 2004, CIBC had begun winding down much of its investment banking business in the United States. CIBC World Markets reduced its staff by two-thirds from 2001 through 2004.
In November 2007, the new Oppenheimer & Co. (Fahnestock) announced that it would purchase a major part of CIBC World Markets' U.S. Investment Banking, Corporate Syndicate, Institutional Sales and Trading, Equity Research, Options Trading and a portion of the Debt Capital Markets business which includes Convertible Bond Trading, Loan Syndication, High Yield Origination and Trading as well as related operations located in the UK, Israel and Hong Kong. The deal closed January 14, 2008 and essentially reunited the original Oppenheimer & Co. which CIBC divided in the sale to Fahnestock.
On February 29, 2008, CIBC World Markets Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Brian Shaw (Encana Corp) was replaced in both capacities by Richard Nesbitt, a former TSX Group CEO.[8][9]
Notable current and former employees[edit]

Geoff Belsher and Harry Culham, Co-Chair of CIBC World Markets
Victor Dodig, President and CEO of the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce
Henry Blodget, Equity Research Analyst.
Meredith Whitney, Equity Research Analyst.
Guy Adami, TV personality, author, financial analyst and professional investor
Jeff Rubin, former chief economist, author of Why Your World Is About to Get a Whole Lot Smaller.

See also[edit]


Companies portal



Oppenheimer & Co.
Wood Gundy Inc.
CIBC Wood Gundy

References[edit]



^ a b c CIBC 2016 Annual Report
^ Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce Profile
^ a b Trimaran Capital Partners Announces Formation of Trimaran Fund II at $1.043 Billion
^ a b c d Bank Works To Improve Its Image In Canada
^ 300 Madison/CIBC World Markets
^ Pricewaterhouse Moving to Madison Ave. Tower
^ "CIBC World Markets Trips in Big Leagues." The Wall Street Journal (Friday, August 3, 2001)
^ The Globe and Mail, Report on Business, by Virginia Galt and Tara Perkins – January 7, 2008 at 10:44 AM EST – Subprime woes lead to shakeup at CIBC
^ CIBC World Markets Executive Biographies - Richard Nesbitt










v
t
e


Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce






Chief Executive Officer: Victor G. Dodig








Fiscal year 2016 statistics
Net income: $4.3 billion CAD[1]
Market capitalization: $39.9 billion CAD[2]
Assets: $501.4 billion CAD[3]
Employees: 43,213 (FTE, 2016)[4]
Stock symbols: TSX: CM NYSE: CM
Website: www.cibc.com












Major brands by financial service








Master: CIBC
Financial group: CIBC
Canadian banking: CIBC
Caribbean banking: CIBC FirstCaribbean International Bank
International banking: CIBC Private Wealth Management
Canadian mutual funds: CIBC Mutual Funds
Canadian brokerage: CIBC Investor's Edge and CIBC Wood Gundy
Canadian insurance: CIBC Insurance
Capital markets: CIBC World Markets
Custodial: CIBC Mellon















v
t
e


Investment banks




Bank



Divisions of
universal banks





Bulge bracket




Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Barclays
Citi Institutional Clients Group
Credit Suisse
Deutsche Bank Corporate and Investment Bank
J.P. Morgan & Co. (J.P. Morgan Cazenove)
UBS Investment Bank






Other




Berenberg Bank
BMO Capital Markets
BOC International
BNP Paribas Corporate & Institutional Banking
Brown Shipley
CIBC World Markets
CITIC Securities (CLSA)
Commerzbank Corporates & Markets
Crédit Agricole Corporate and Investment Bank
Daiwa Securities Capital Markets
EverBank World Markets
Harris Williams & Co.
HSBC Global Banking and Markets
ING Commercial Banking
Is Investment
KBC Bank
Korea Development Bank (Daewoo Securities)
Lloyds Bank Corporate Markets
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities
Mizuho Corporate Bank
Natixis
Nomura Securities
RBC Capital Markets
RBS Markets & International Banking
Sberbank CIB
Société Générale Corporate & Investment Bank
Standard Chartered
TD Securities
UniCredit Corporate & Investment Banking
VTB Capital
Wells Fargo Securities








Independents





Bulge bracket




Goldman Sachs
Morgan Stanley






Other




Allen & Company
Blackstone Group
Brewin Dolphin
BTG Pactual
Centerview Partners
China International Capital Corporation
Close Brothers Group
China Everbright Group

China Everbright Limited
Everbright Securities


Evercore Partners
FBR Capital Markets
Galaxy
Greenhill & Co.
Guosen Securities
Haitong Securities
Houlihan Lokey
Investec
Jefferies
Keefe, Bruyette & Woods
Lazard
Lincoln International
Macquarie Group
Mediobanca
Moelis & Company
N M Rothschild & Sons
Oppenheimer & Co.
Perella Weinberg Partners
Piper Jaffray
Raymond James Financial
Renaissance Capital
ROTH Capital Partners
Salam Investment Ltd.
Sandler O'Neill and Partners
Stifel Nicolaus
Stone Key Partners
William Blair & Company











 Category
 List







^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "2016 Annual Report" (PDF). CIBC. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=CIBC_World_Markets&oldid=785034957"					
Categories: Canadian Imperial Bank of CommerceStock brokerages and investment banks of CanadaCompanies based in TorontoHidden categories: Pages using deprecated image syntaxArticles needing additional references from September 2009All articles needing additional references 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


Bahasa Indonesia 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 11 June 2017, at 08:20.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






Data Dumps  |  Freebase API (Deprecated)
       |  Google Developers
    
    
      
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
      
    
    
    All Products
  
  Sign in

  
  Send feedback
  





            Hey there! Are you maybe looking for Firebase instead?

            







    Data Dumps
  


The Freebase API will be completely shut-down on Aug 31 2016. This page provides access to the last available data dump. Read more.
Data Dumps are a downloadable version of the data in Freebase. They constitute a snapshot of the data stored in Freebase and the Schema that structures it, and are provided under the same CC-BY license. The Freebase/Wikidata mappings are provided under the CC0 license.

Freebase Triples
Freebase Deleted Triples
Freebase/Wikidata Mappings
License
Citing

Freebase Triples


This dataset contains every fact currently in Freebase.

Total triples: 1.9 billion
Updated: Weekly
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC-BY

22 GB gzip250 GB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.date> "2001-02"^^<http://www.w3.org/2001/XMLSchema#gYearMonth>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.source> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11x1gf2m6>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/type.object.type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.rate> 4.5 .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://www.w3.org/1999/02/22-rdf-syntax-ns#type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .


If you're writing your own code to parse the RDF dumps its often more efficient to read directly from GZip file rather than extracting the data first and then processing the uncompressed data.
<subject>  <predicate>  <object> .
Note: In Freebase, objects have MIDs that look like /m/012rkqx. In RDF those MIDs become m.012rkqx. Likewise, Freebase schema like /common/topic are written as common.topic.
The subject is the ID of a Freebase object. It can be a Freebase MID (ex. m.012rkqx) for topics and CVTs or a human-readable ID (ex. common.topic) for schema.
The predicate is always a human-readable ID for a Freebase property or a property from a standard RDF vocabulary like RDFS. Freebase foreign key namespaces are also used as predicates to make it easier to look up keys by namespace.
The object field may contain a Freebase MID for an object or a human-readable ID for schema from Freebase or other RDF vocabularies. It may also include literal values like strings, booleans and numeric values.
Topic descriptions often contain newlines. In order to make each triple fit on one line, we have escaped newlines with "\n".
Freebase Deleted Triples
We also provide a dump of triples that have been deleted from Freebase over time. This is a one-time dump through March 2013. In the future, we might consider providing periodic updates of recently deleted triples, but at the moment we have no specific timeframe for doing so, and are only providing this one-time dump. 

The dump is distributed as a .tar.gz file (2.1Gb compressed, 7.7Gb uncompressed). It contains 63,036,271 deleted triples in 20 files (there is no particular meaning to the individual files, it is just easier to manipulate several smaller files than one huge file).


Thanks to Chun How Tan and John Giannandrea for making this data release possible.




Total triples: 63 million
Updated: June 9, 2013
Data Format: CSV
License: CC-BY

2 GB gzip8 GB uncompressed

Download



The data format is essentially CSV with one important caveat. The object field may contain any characters, including commas (as well as any other reasonable delimiters you could think of). However, all the other fields are guaranteed not to contain commas, so the data can still be parsed unambiguously.

The columns in the dataset are defined as:

creation_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
creator
deletion_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
deletor
subject (MID)
predicate (MID)
object (MID/Literal)
language_code



CSV
1352854086000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,1352855856000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,/m/03r90,/type/object/key,/wikipedia/en/$B816,en
1355171076000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364258198000,/user/turtlewax_bot,/m/0nncp9z,/music/recording/artist,/m/01vbfm4,en
1176630380000,/user/mwcl_images,1335928144000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/029w57m,/common/image/size,/m/0kly56,en
1292854917000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364823418001,/user/mbz_pipeline_merge_bot,/m/0fv1vl8,/type/object/type,/common/topic,en
1205530905000,/user/mwcl_images,1336022041000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/01x5scz,/common/licensed_object/license,/m/02x6b,en
1302391361000,/user/content_administrator,1336190973000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/0gkb45y,/type/object/type,/type/content,en
1176728962002,/user/mwcl_images,1335954186000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/08430h,/common/topic/image,/m/02cs147,en
1172002568007,/user/mwcl_chefmoz,1283588560000,/user/delete_bot,/m/01z4c1z,/type/object/name,La Casa Rosa Mexican Restaurant,en


Freebase/Wikidata Mappings


The data has been created based on the Wikidata-Dump of October 28, 2013, and contains only those links that have at least two common Wikipedia-Links and not a single disagreeing Wikipedia-Link. Furthermore, the lines are sorted by the number of common Wikipedia-Links (although in Turtle this does not really matter).

Total triples: 2.1M
Updated: October 28, 2013
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC0

21.2 MB gzip242.9 MB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0695j>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q6718> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.05nrg>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs7>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q538> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0jgd>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q414> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0d_23>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q2537> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.04g7d>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q315> .


License
Freebase Data Dumps are provided free of charge for any purpose with regular updates by Google. They are distributed, like Freebase itself, under the Creative Commons Attribution (aka CC-BY) and use is subject to the Terms of Service.
The Freebase/Wikidata ID mappings are provided under CC0 and can be used without restrictions.
Citing
If you'd like to cite these data dumps in a publication, you may use:

Google, Freebase Data Dumps, https://developers.google.com/freebase/data, <month> <day>, <year>

Or as BibTeX:


BibTex

@misc{freebase:datadumps,
  title = "Freebase Data Dumps"
  author = "Google",
  howpublished = "\url{https://developers.google.com/freebase/data}",
  edition = "<month> <day>, <year>",
  year = "<year>"
}




Except as otherwise noted, the content of this page is licensed under the Creative Commons Attribution 3.0 License, and code samples are licensed under the Apache 2.0 License. For details, see our Site Policies. Java is a registered trademark of Oracle and/or its affiliates.

      
      Last updated February 10, 2017.
    




Send feedback about...
          
          This page
        
            
            Documentation feedback
          
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
        
            
            Product feedback
          
        
        Cancel
      
